Chapter 62 To Chapter 120.

Lake Rheinen in northwestern Inghel this time of year was considered one of the best social spots on the island.

 

The weather wasn’t too hot yet, the scenery was nice, and most importantly, it was closed. Allowing only people of certain social classes to enter.

 

During the social season, nobles visited the lake to walk and go boating.

 

While sophisticated social gatherings were taking place here and there, a murmur was heard from the entrance.

 

Usually, this situation meant an important person had appeared, so everyone craned their necks to find the main character.

 

“He is the Duke of Vassenberg, right?”

 

“The woman next to him is…”

 

Oh my! Exclamations of surprise began to flow.

 

The focus of the rumours, the woman who had recently appeared in all kinds of social gossip, was next to the Duke.

 

“Hasn’t it been a while since she broke off her engagement with the Little Marquis of Hartmann? But she is already with His Excellency the Duke…”

 

“They are probably not dating with marriage in mind, right?”

 

“That can’t be right.”

 

There was even a strange sense of defeat in the voice that murmured, “Of course, she’s his mistress.”

 

“But you never know, just look at that face.”

 

Everyone’s eyes focused on the woman.

 

The woman was beautiful. She looked like a bright white butterfly, a swan gracefully flapping its wings, or a noble deer.

 

Of course, they couldn’t have guessed someone was listening to the conversation they were whispering among themselves.

 

Cardale lowered his head and looked at Elise walking next to him.

 

Even though she couldn’t hear the conversation, she was completely cowed just by the oppressive gazes.

 

“Raise your head.”

 

Elise was startled and looked up at him. Her deep blue eyes were pure and fathomless.

 

“They can’t do anything to you. So raise your head.”

 

“…Yes, Duke.”

 

The woman answered softly then hesitated before she straightened her back and raised her head. Her face was still a little nervous, but she looked much better.

 

Cardale lightly squeezed then released his escort’s hand.

 

“Ah…”

 

He felt the woman’s gaze again, but pretended not to notice as he looked ahead.

 

Elise lowered her head again to look at her clasped hands. Even with gloves, she could still feel his warmth.

 

‘A few hours ago… Did you hold my hand on purpose?’

 

It probably meant she should act natural and not embarrass him. But strangely enough…

 

‘I feel like he gives me courage…’

 

Elise was startled by her own thoughts.

 

‘That can’t be possible. What kind of delusion are you having, Elise?’

 

She quickly shook off the idle thoughts.

 

As she walked down the lawn, she saw several docks at the edge of the lake. There were boats tied up at each dock with several leisurely floating on the lake.

 

Cardale led her to a secluded dock. There was a boat tied that was bigger, stronger, and better finished than the others.

 

The boat had four pillars and a roof like an awning to provide shade. There was a large space to sit and rest underneath with a curtain-like screen on all sides between the pillars to block sunlight.

 

‘This is the boat I will ride with the Duke.’

 

She was a little embarrassed to be on a boat alone with him, but she didn’t hate the idea.

 

“Hold my hand.”

 

Elise took his hand and just as she was about to step onto the boat.

 

“How dare you bring that woman to this place?”

 

Surprised, she turned her head towards the voice and saw an unforgettable face.

 

‘Her Royal Highness, Princess Theresia…’

 

Elise’s face paled as she saw her opponent.

 

Her body trembled as she remembered Theresia’s cruel and harsh hands. Elise had healed, but her cheeks strangely started throbbing.

 

Just seeing Princess Theresia approaching filled her with fear. Elise had curled up like prey thrown before a wild beast.

 

“Elise.”

 

Cardale said, tightening his hold on her hand.

 

“Get on the boat first.”

 

“But…”

 

The Princess had already seen Elise. Elise, who had been humiliated by greetings alone several times, could not help but hesitate.

 

“I told you to go inside.”

 

“That’s not possible. She saw the royal family, yet didn’t give a greeting. Maybe she doesn’t yet know that she can be accused of insulting the royal family for that, right?”

 

Suddenly, Theresia was in front of them and raised her voice.

 

Cardale stood diagonally in front of Elise. Elise bent over, half-covered by his body.

 

“I see, I see Her Highness the Princess.”

 

Tsk, Theresia clicked her tongue in disapproval. However, before Theresia could lash out with harsh accusations, Cardale took Elise to board the boat.

 

“You are going in with the curtains drawn. Don’t plan on coming out.”

 

Elise was afraid of the Princess, glaring at her with such a vicious spirit, but she did not want to disobey Cardale’s words.

 

So, as he said, she quickly went under the awning and untied the straps holding the screen the side the Princess was. The screen closed like a curtain as the Princess clicked her tongue, astonished.

 

Elise held a corner of her dress and cast a worried look as she peeked outside.

 

“I wonder if it will be okay with the Duke…”

 

The Princess could not be seen, hidden by Cardale’s broad back.

 

Elise realised that he had naturally moved her behind him just a moment ago. She couldn’t deny that she felt reassured by his strength that was protecting her.

 

However, what bothered her was that her opponent was a princess. In the Empire, the status of the royal family was tantamount to omnipotence.

 

‘Of course, the Duke will be different…’

 

The noble head of Vassenberg, protector of the great empire, and master of the vast fiefdom of Brillion. He couldn’t say anything to support her.

 

Still, Elise was worried about him. Even more so because she felt that the current situation was her fault.

 

“Please don’t worry.”

 

Elise suppressed her nervousness and clasped her hands together.

 



 

Despite Elise’s worries, the only emotions Cardale felt while dealing with Theresia were annoyance and displeasure.

 

Theresia looked at the man blocking her view and laughed, dumbfounded.

 

“Ha, she is really going places.”

 

“Is there any reason not to?”

 

Theresia felt even more defeated and humiliated by Cardale’s answer.

 

‘Are you supporting her now? You’re siding with that woman?’

 

Theresia chewed her lip. As she clenched her fists, her long, manicured nails dug into her palms, leaving marks.

 

She was angry. She was more annoyed, and her pride was hurt. But because she wanted something more, Theresia decided to come to terms with reality.

 

She folded her fan.

 

“Great. I approve of that girl.”

 

Theresia continued as if she were doing Cardale a great favour.

 

“Having a mistress? I can turn a blind eye to that. It’s not uncommon in this empire.”

 

Theresia grabbed Cardale’s hand tightly.

 

For an instant, a look of strong displeasure flashed across Cardale’s face. It was a disgusting sensation, like being covered in dirt.

 

However, even though Theresia knew that Cardale adamantly avoided contact with others, she did not care.

 

“So marry me.”

 



 

“I am proposing to the Duke.”

 

Cardale looked at Theresia blankly. His indifferent eyes were so dry that no emotion could be found.

 

“Cardale.”

 

She called out to him, waving the hand she was holding like a princess begging. Cardale slapped her hand away.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

He hit her hand so hard that the Princess let out a short scream and glared at him, nursing her numb hand.

 

“What are you doing?!”

 

“That’s funny.”

 

“What’s funny?”

 

Theresia reacted sharply to how he seemed to go from indifferent to ridicule. But Cardale responded calmly.

 

“How can it not be funny when you are alone in a delusion?”

 

Suddenly, the man’s eyes cooled.

 

“Marriage?”

 

With a face cold as ice, he lowered himself and made eye contact with the Princess. Then he whispered softly so only she could hear.

 

“However, what should she and I do… It shouldn’t bother you at all.”

 

“What now, what?”

 

Cardale straightened himself. He had such an elegant and neat appearance, it was hard to believe he had just made such explicit and vulgar remarks.

 

Then, as if to show off, he took out a handkerchief from his chest pocket and wiped the hand that Theresia had just been holding.

 

With a thud, his smooth shoes trampled the handkerchief that fell to the floor.

 

“Don’t touch me. It’s disgusting.”

 

Before she could say anything, Cardale finished speaking and got into the boat.

 

Theresia saw the small woman approaching him through the blinds.

 

‘Because of that woman.’

 

Theresia grit her teeth and clenched her shaking hands. 

 

She had never experienced such an insult before in her life. Especially since the reason was for a lowly and insignificant illegitimate child.

 

“Royal Highness, are you okay?”

 

The Princess’s bodyguard, Dietrich Klein, who had retreated far behind her. Now approached and called out to her when she seemed strange,

 

Theresia chewed and spat, not taking her eyes off the boat gliding across her lake.

 

“That girl, I can’t leave her alone.”

 

‘If I don’t take care of her as soon as possible…’ Theresia’s pupils contracted like snakes and sparkled with evil.

 

“I need to make it clear what happens when you covet what belongs to others.”


Elise quickly approached Cardale as he boarded the ship and carefully examined his complexion.

 

“Duke… Are you okay?”

 

“And if I’m not okay?”

 

When he narrowed his eyes, as if he had heard something absurd, Elise stopped.

 

“Well, I think Her Royal Highness is angry because of me…”

 

‘I was worried she might have taken out her anger on the Duke.’

 

She couldn’t bear the words and swallowed them to the back of her throat. She just looked at him with helpless eyes.

 

“The person you should pay attention to is not the Princess. It’s me.”

 

Then came back a cold and firm answer. Elise’s heart sank when she saw his unpleasant expression.

 

‘I guess I made a mistake again.’

 

She belatedly remembered Vanessa and the Count’s instructions to keep her mouth shut since her speaking skills were so poor.

 

She was so excited to look around that she forgot something important.

 

Elise was at a loss since she didn’t know how to handle this, but Cardale added with a soft exhale.

 

“It means don’t worry about it.”

 

Elise raised her head as his voice softened slightly. His face was still so calm that it was almost expressionless, but he looked less scary than before.

 

Only then did she feel a little relieved, so Elise nodded. It was then.

 

“Oh…!”

 

Suddenly, the boat moved. Elise lost her balance and stumbled. As she was about to fall to the floor, Cardale caught her body and pulled her into his arms.

 

‘Ah…’

 

Elise held her breath while being held in Cardale’s arms. Even through her clothes, she could feel the man’s heavy body and higher body temperature.

 

Knowing how firm his arms were and how strong his body was, Elise blushed without realising.

 

“I told you to stay still.”

 

A low voice reached her ear, and as his breath hit the shell of her ear, her hair stood up on end.

 

“Uh, I was quiet.”

 

“Then was that you sneaking around and spying on us like a cat?”

 

“That…”

 

Elise hesitated. She was afraid that if she went too far with telling the truth, she would not be able to avoid criticism.

 

But she couldn’t overcome Cardale’s penetrating gaze, and confessed.

 

“I’m worried about the Duke…”

 

She didn’t get an answer back from him. Elise shrank into herself, even though she wasn’t that much smaller.

 

‘How dare I worry about the Duke…?’

 

So, he must have been displeased. He might kick her out for being so arrogant. It frightened her to the point of trembling and she parted her lips.

 

“I… Ah!”

 

At that moment, she was lifted. Elise hung her arms around Cardale’s neck in disarray, then she heard his soft laugh.

 

Even in the midst of her hesitation, Elise thought it was nice to hear that low, resonant voice.

 

“Please sit down until the boat returns to the dock.”

 

Her body was lowered onto the soft seat.

 

Elise watched blankly as Cardail hand-tied the covering to the pillar, but when he turned back to her, she quickly turned her head.

 

She faced an unobstructed view of the landscape.

 

“Ah…”

 

The sunrise on the lake sparkled in the late spring sunlight.

 

The vegetation surrounding the small lake showed off a variety of greenery with a mixture of lighter and darker shades, as if to prove that it was thriving. White clouds floated in the deep blue sky, as clear as the weather.

 

‘This is really pretty…’

 

Elise was fascinated by the scenery outside.

 

And Cardale just stared at her.

 



 

Between late spring and early summer, the sunlight was strong enough to make someone sweat a little during the day.

 

Because her eyes were dazzling, the woman made a sunshade with her hands. The moment passed again and again, captured in big eyes full of excitement. Her cheeks were flushed.

 

Cardale’s bright red eyes deepened slightly.

 

“Would you like to go boating on a lake in the northwest soon?”

 

This was a time where appropriate rumours were needed.

 

That was why he brought Elise to the lake in person. He needed to make it widely known that he had a woman.

 

To prevent the Esteemed Lady from interfering in his useless marriage business, and to prevent the Princess from ever mentioning marriage again.

 

That was how he decided to go out today. Therefore, Elise Schuvan’s thoughts and feelings were not considered from the beginning. However…

 

“Duke.”

 

Cardale suddenly stirred from his thoughts when he heard a voice calling him.

 

For some time now, Elise had been looking at him with her deer-like gentle eyes, blinking.

 

“This is my first time doing something like this. On a boat or looking at the lake.”

 



 

“Thank you so much.”

 

The moment Cardale looked up at her, those blue gems shining brightly, he felt an uncontrollable thirst. It also led to some destructive and violent impulses.

 

He answered, suppressing his rising desire.

 

“Hmm.”

 

Then, a shy smile appeared on Elise’s face.

 

Like a tightly closed white flower, gently opening its delicate buds. Just like that.

 

She turned her head to the lake again.

 

Cardale stared at her small white face for a long time.

 

Only the wind could see the glimmer of warmth passing through his red eyes.

 



 

After their cruise was over, Elise got off the boat with a red face.

 

Cardale held her hand as she got off the boat and into the carriage.

 

When his large hand wrapped around hers, Elise’s heart pounded strangely, and her cheeks became hot.

 

“Thank you…”

 

As she spoke in a hushed voice, Cardale nodded.

 

While riding in the carriage, Elise glanced at Cardale looking out the window.

 

He had downturned eyelashes and beautiful sunset-coloured eyes half-revealed beneath them. A straight, pointed nose, and his lips closed in a straight line.

 

The man with an elegant and noble face was handsome as always.

 

It was so perfect Elise couldn’t find any flaws. It felt like he wasn’t even a human being.

 

Just then, she completely forgot about the encounter that she had with the Princess. 

 

The carriage rocked loudly with the harsh sound of horses neighing.

 

“!!”

 

The coachman suddenly slowed the carriage, and Cardale caught Elise’s body as it was about to jump out of the seat.

 

He glanced quickly outside the window and said to her, “Don’t get off, stay here.”

 

Before he could hear her answer, he opened the carriage door and left.

 

Elise swept away her frightened heart and followed the direction Cardale was walking through the window of the carriage.

 

Another carriage was in front of the huge iron gate leading to the Duke’s residence.

 

Near the carriage stood a beautiful lady with wavy golden hair braided high. Cardale approached at a frighteningly fast speed.

 

‘Who is she…?’

 

Elise leaned closer to the window. As she was quietly looking at the lady, the lady’s features seemed somewhat familiar.

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise let out a soft sigh.

 

The lady’s sharp eyes resembled Cardale’s.

 

‘That lady… she’s the Duke’s mother.’

 

Just as she found her answer, the Esteemed Lady’s cool eyes suddenly looked straight at the window where Elise was. Elise was so startled that she unknowingly pulled back and hid.

 

At that time, the lady’s high-pitched voice was heard through the walls of the carriage.

 



 

Before arriving at the mansion, Cardale wasn’t in that bad of a mood.

 

It was a bit of a hassle for him, but the benefit was sufficient. He had expected the Princess to approach, so the friction didn’t even get on his nerves.

 

However, the sight of someone completely unwelcome blocking his carriage in front of the Duke’s residence was enough to ruin his mood.

 

“It’s been a while.”

 

The woman who gave birth to the man, greeted him.

 

Cardale spoke to Victoria with an indifferent expression.

 

“Do you have business with me?”

 

“What has to happen for a mother to come visit her son?”

 

Victoria said, waving her fan gently. Perhaps because she lived a prosperous life in the Imperial Palace, she appeared quite relaxed.

 

But Cardale knew such abundance came at a price, and this was just a laughable performance.

 

She had to wait in front of the mansion several times before returning without anything to show for it, so the Princess’s support must have been formidable.

 

He twitched his lips sarcastically.

 

“Wouldn’t it be better to use your limited time effectively? You must be very thirsty for attention.”

 

Victoria’s face crumpled when Cardale pointed out that she had not been able to attend a proper social event for some time.

 

However, like an aristocrat accustomed to speaking as a socialite, she kept her countenance and answered calmly.

 

“As a mother, shouldn’t I find you a marriage partner this year?”

 

“I’m not getting married…”

 

Cardale frowned softly. It was truly a move that did not deviate from expectations. And there was nothing she said that bothered him so much.

 

It was a fitting remark for someone so tired of being troubled, that he inwardly scoffed.

 

“If you want to become a worthy head of a family, you need to get married quickly.”

 

“I have already been the Duke of Vassenberg for several years.”

 

“Those who are not married, are not treated as proper adults.”

 

“Haha,” Cardale laughed.

 

“In the Empire, there is a tendency to treat unmarried men and women as those who are not doing their jobs properly.”

 

“So?”

 

“So.”

 

In an instant, the smile disappeared from Cardale’s face. He asked back with a cold face.

 

“Who would dare say that to me?”

 

The sharp, subdued voice was a clear warning.


Victoria swallowed dryly and rubbed her arms where goosebumps were forming.

 

But she held her head upright, pretending that nothing was wrong.

 

The only shield from her son covered her fears.

 

“Having a successor is the most important duty of the head of a family.”

 

“And it’s none of your business.”

 

Cardale cut her off as he had no intention of continuing this meaningless conversation.

 

“Especially as a disowned mother.”

 

Victoria’s face, with her barely maintained smile, cracked.

 

She took off the elegant mask she wore for the outside world, and threw it away. Then she blatantly revealed her true purpose for coming.

 

“I was shocked when I heard the news. How dare you embarrass this mother? A mistress before even getting engaged…?”

 

But she couldn’t finish her sentence.

 

“So, is it okay for me to have a mistress after the engagement?”

 

It was a serious, sarcastic remark. Victoria’s face immediately hardened as she realised what Cardale was implying.

 

“Like my mother?”

 

“W-what now…”

 

“Even after having a child after marriage. You never doubted the seed, did you?”

 

As he brought the long-buried secret to light, Victoria’s face turned an indescribable pale.

 

“You surely didn’t expect me to be ignorant of that, did you?”

 

If you believed so, weren’t you too careless? Victoria’s composure shattered at Cardale’s cold ridicule.

 

But she still managed to shout.

 

“You, you have Vassenberg’s blood!”

 

“That’s right. You are stating the obvious.”

 

Victoria, whose premarital affair was exposed right after her wedding, had to endure suspicion about the paternity of her child throughout her pregnancy.

 

It was hellish for Victoria.

 

Fortunately, the baby was born with distinct Vassenberg features. With black hair and fiery red eyes.

 

The mother of the heir had her past quietly buried by the hands of her husband, the then Duke.

 

However, her relationship with her husband never recovered.

 

He did not forgive his wife for betraying and deceiving him, and as if out of revenge, he would bring countless other women to his bedroom.

 

Victoria was furious. And that anger was naturally directed at her young son. Yet, to rationalise her abuse, she blamed it on the child.

 

“Because of you, I’ve suffered so much…!”

 

Words that had become as common as dirt in his ears no longer stirred any emotion in Cardale.

 

It was just as exhausting as the years went by.

 

“Wouldn’t you rather have left and given up on being a mother to the son you hate for resembling his father so much?”

 

Cardale’s voice was dark, as if it came from hell itself.

 

“It was all for you…!”

 

Victoria, who was shouting erratically, stopped mid-sentence. Because Cardale was smiling. The expression was so creepy that cold sweat ran down her spine.

 

“You may leave now.”

 

But Victoria did not allow herself to admit that she felt afraid of her son.

 

Instead of Cardale, she found a scapegoat to vent her anger onto and protect her pride.

 

“The woman the princess mentioned….”

 

Her intuition moved. Naturally, her eyes turned to the Duke’s carriage.

 

Sure enough, while secretly looking out the window, she saw a startled woman disappearing.

 

‘She’s hiding like a rat.’

 

While she was being humiliated like this…!

 

Just thinking about how the low-born wench was comfortably sitting in the carriage, observing her disgrace. Her pride was wounded, and her anger surged.

 

‘It’s just some lowly wench trying to seduce a man. Her actions are cunning and treacherous beyond comparison.’

 

Disgust appeared in Victoria’s eyes as she glared at the carriage, as if she were looking at the dirtiest thing in the world.

 

Yet her vision was suddenly blocked.

 

Victoria raised her head, and there stood her son, blocking the carriage. His face was so cold, as if it wouldn’t bleed if pricked with a needle.

 

‘Are you really trying to prevent me from seeing that girl?’

 

Victoria was so annoyed that she deliberately raised her voice.

 

“As an illegitimate child of a maid, it is obvious that she gave herself to you like any other desperate woman.”

 

The high-pitched, piercing voice was loud enough to flow into the carriage.

 

“How long has it been since you held her in your arms and cuddled her? It must have been a while. It’s probably been quite a while since that fire started. Your actions are just the same as your father’s!”

 

Cardale, noticing Victoria’s deliberate shouting, sneered.

 

Such a tiresome and boring melodrama.

 

To him, Victoria was truly nothing. If one were to make a comparison, she was nothing more than a parasite. Sucking the essence of his family and lineage, falsely claiming a love of kinship he had never experienced.

 

Moreover, she would dare to lay her vile and filthy hands on his possessions, especially his toys.

 

Thus, he decided to end this farce, in the most humiliating way possible for Victoria.

 

“I’ve put the villa up for sale. It seems like you don’t need it anymore.”

 

Victoria jerked her back to him.

 

“There was someone who wanted to buy it at a good price.”

 

She glared at Cardale.

 

“Are you planning on threatening me with that?”

 

“Of course not. Is this something to be threatened by?”

 

Cardale laughed, then his face turned cold. Leaning slightly closer to Victoria, he parted his lips.

 

“Wouldn’t it be considered a threat? At least to the extent of making everyone aware of my mother’s dirty and secret pleasures?”

 

The low voice was dark and sluggish, as if he would grab her by the ankles and drag her into the mire at any moment.

 

A distraught Victoria shouted.

 

“W-what do you mean? You are talking nonsense!”

 

She stormed out in a fuss. But in her haste, she didn’t realise that her reaction proved Cardale’s words were closer to the truth than he may have suspected before.

 

“Do you need witnesses? If you wish, I can arrange that.”

 

He lowered his voice so only Victoria could hear.

 

“Moreover, one of them happens to be Helmutian. Did you know I’ve been tracking them under the Emperor’s orders?”

 

His whisper was as chilling as a snake. The sensation akin to damp, cold scales clinging to her skin. Victoria’s face turned pale.

 

“When doing this kind of work, there are times when you appreciate how much easier it is to create evidence than find it.”

 

Implying he could manipulate evidence to accuse her of treason. However, the calmness on Cardale’s face only heightened Victoria’s fear.

 

“You wouldn’t dare conspire against your own mother, would you? You’re my son! If I’m in the wrong, you’ll be in trouble too-“

 

“What I’m saying is to continue enjoying your stay at the villa with those men.”

 

Cardale called out to her in a calm tone.

 

“It must be difficult just holding onto what you have, why do you keep reaching for more?”

 

No matter how hard you try, Mother. You won’t get what you want. Cardale’s assertion cut through Victoria’s rationality.

 

“Then are you going to marry a lowly, illegitimate woman? You’re going to give that bitch the title of a duchess?”

 

Victoria, having abandoned all polite decorum, resorted to malice.

 

It was a hidden side of her that others did not know about, but Cardale was all too familiar with it.

 

He looked impassively at his mother as she was screaming almost hysterically. Then he lifted his hand.

 

“Escort the Esteemed Lady.”

 

The waiting soldiers stood on either side of Victoria, as if they had been waiting. Trembling with anger and humiliation, she could no longer resist.

 

Cardale added one last thing, turning his body to face Victoria’s back.

 

“I hope you stay at the villa for a long time. After all, who knows what cruel and villainous deeds I, resembling my father as I do, may commit.”

 

Victoria grit her teeth and clenched her hands, her body shaking with anger.

 

But after taking a few deep breaths, she raised her head proudly. Before returning to her carriage as if nothing had happened.

 

Not responding to her son was her last attempt to maintain her dignity.

 



 

Elise looked up at Cardale as he returned to the carriage with a blank face.

 

‘Duke…’

 

Sitting across from Elise, Cardale remained silent.

 

Until they reached the main building of the mansion and got out of the carriage, Elise only looked at his complexion.

 

“You have arrived, Your Excellency the Duke.”

 

Even as servants bowed to greet him from both sides, Cardale didn’t respond.

 

Elise followed him at a brisk pace. Eventually, they entered the Duke’s bedroom.

 

Since Elise had just been watching him the whole time, she carefully spoke.

 

“So, the Esteemed Lady-”

 

“Don’t worry about her. You won’t have to see her again.”

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise closed her mouth. But the conversation she heard in the carriage flashed through her mind.

 

“Wouldn’t you rather have left and given up on being a mother to the son you hate for resembling his father so much?”

 

Perhaps the Duke…

 

Looking at him now, it was hard to imagine, but he too must have been a child once.

 

A time when escaping the torrents of violence was impossible, a helpless period where resistance was even more unimaginable.

 

As she imagined the young child, who must have endured loneliness and suffering, a pang of sympathy welled up inside of her.

 

Elise looked up at Cardale. She didn’t even know what kind of expression she was making.

 

Then Cardale furrowed his brow.

 

“Why are you looking at me like that?”
‘Oh, no.’

 

Embarrassed, Elise quickly shook her head.

 

But when she did not dare to look at Cardale again, she told him the truth.

 

“I… I was a little worried…”

 

Her answer was enough to touch the man’s noble pride. He couldn’t tolerate the woman who served him that night saying such things to him.

 

Step by step, Cardale approached Elise. She squeezed her eyes shut as he extended his large hand.

 

His straight mouth twisted awkwardly.

 

‘You are so naive that you can’t even hide what you saw and heard.’

 

Cardale leaned his head close to her and whispered.

 

“Why do you have any sympathy?”

 

Then Elise’s body flinched.

 

“How dare I, the Duke–”

 

“Elise.”

 

Cardale gently placed his hand around Elise’s neck. He could feel Elise’s fluttering pulse through their skin touching.

 

“I told you not to lie.”

 

The long silver eyelashes beneath her closed eyes fluttered at his soft warning.

 

“Open your eyes.”

 

Cardale compelled softly. Elise lifted her eyes at his command and the irresistible authority it contained.

 

He saw the sadness in her blue eyes.

 

“It just…”

 

Perhaps it was because of the faint vibrations she felt through his palms in response to the soft echo of his voice, but she was possessed by an unknown feeling.

 

It felt like a new and strange feeling she could not explain as her own.

 

“…It just broke my heart.”

 

At that moment, all of Cardale’s movements stopped. His eyes fixed on Elise, as if piercing through her.

 

She trembled, her lips quivering like a deer caught in the rain.

 

“Because those wounds don’t easily heal, and can even remain for a long time…”

 

The calmness that had always remained like a smooth surface, was gradually cracking at the edges. Unfamiliar and unsettling.

 

Cardale keenly sensed this and felt uneasy.

 

To alleviate the strange sensation, he resorted to his usual approach.

 

“After eavesdropping on my past, you suddenly gain a courage that you never had before? Do you think you and I are in the same situation?”

 

The tone of threats and foreboding was quite fierce.

 

Elise shook her head desperately, but Cardale did not stop. He knew she was afraid, yet he continued.

 

“Or do you think something changed because you spent the night with me?”

 

It was a cold, sobering reminder of her place so she can grasp the topic at hand.

 

“That’s not… I mean…”

 

She stammered out the words in a desperate attempt to keep her voice from wavering.

 

Cardale looked at the corners of Elise’s eyes, which had just become moist.

 



 

All she could do was cry out for his mercy, and she was the only woman allowed to do so.

 

Was it even possible for someone to dare to sympathise with him?

 

Cheap pity and unbecoming sympathy were not what Cardale Vassenberg wanted from Elyse Schuvan.

 

A toy to be obediently mounted in his bed whenever he desired, prey to be toyed with until he got bored, or until her neck was bitten and snapped.

 

‘Mine. My possession.’

 

Cardale bent his fingertips ever so slightly. The white, delicate skin pressed in mercilessly by his touch.

 

‘If only I were a little less interested…’

 

Yes, if the woman had been a little less interesting, he might have grabbed her delicate neck and snapped it.

 

But unfortunately for himself, Cardale had not yet grown tired of Elise. He liked having her around, and she was still fun to play with.

 

No, to be a little more honest with himself, she was a very enjoyable woman. Especially in bed.

 

He let out a long breath as he remembered that night with Elise.

 

He felt as if all his cruel impulses and desires were being suppressed a little.

 

“Elise.”

 

“Yes…”

 

There had been more than a few times when he wanted to drag her to the ground with each blink of those flickering eyes. To break her down and render her incapable of doing anything on her own.

 

But if that happens, there would be no turning back.

 

“Tell me something.”

 

Therefore, this patience was not a mercy for Elise, but was born out of pure selfishness on his part.

 

“It’s not sympathy, and if you’re not trying to be arrogant, then what on earth were you thinking?”

 

Then he obsessively searched Elise’s face.

 

If even the smallest lie or deception were discovered, no matter how insignificant, he would seize upon it as an excuse for punishment.

 

But unlike the capriciousness of a wicked woman, Elise looked up at him with infinitely clear eyes.

 

“I just…”

 

Her voice was as thin as a whisper when it came out from her small lips.

 

“Even I… if I could be of some comfort to the Duke…”

 

Cardale’s hand, which was holding Elise’s neck, lost strength. Lowering his arm, he stared at her quietly before speaking as if chewing on his words.

 

“Then give it a try.”

 

“Me…?”

 

“That so-called comfort, give it a try.”

 

Cardale clearly guessed that Elise would be embarrassed.

 

She was a woman who trembled at the slightest touch. He expected her to stammer and hesitate, perhaps even cry and claim she couldn’t do it when he asked.

 

But Elise hesitated for a moment, then cautiously stretched out her arms.

 



 

For a moment, a fine crack appeared in the man’s eyes.

 

The sensation that seemed to have disappeared for a moment slowly began to return.

 

The gentle touch of feeble arms enveloped his back, the warmth against his chest, the subtle and refreshing scent like a blade of grass brushing the tip of his nose…

 

Suddenly, he felt a small hand patting his back. Cardale lowered his gaze to the woman’s small, round crown.

 

It was funny.

 

This was a situation where a woman who seemed to be less than half his size hugged him and patted his back.

 

It was like the woman tried to comfort him without even thinking about her own situation.

 

However, Cardale did not push Elise away in the end.

 



 

Elise released her arms from her tight embrace and took a few steps back.

 

Perhaps because she was nervous, her heart was beating much harder than before. She could hear a pounding in her ears.

 

‘Did he like it…?’

 

It would be nice if he could tell her what to say, but she couldn’t hear anything from him.

 

‘Maybe he didn’t like it.’

 

Although he had asked her to try, she couldn’t help but wonder if he was displeased after seeing his reaction.

 

In a way, it was like a maid touching a nobleman’s body without permission.

 

Elise held onto her hands tightly, unable to lift her head. She uttered an apology.

 

“I-I’m sorry if I overstepped.”

 

It was a meagre expression of courage, but still no response.

 

Elise’s heart sank.

 

Her fear, which she had forgotten for a moment, came rushing back like an angry wave and engulfed her.

 

She must have made a big mistake. She could almost imagine his face, colder than ice, looking down at her with disdain.

 

“I’m sorry. I was wrong…”

 

How uncomfortable and humiliated must he have felt? Someone like her, who didn’t even understand boundaries, trying to comfort him…

 

Her nose tingled, and tears welled up in her eyes. Elise bit her lip hard, trying not to hold back the tears.

 

‘Why did I… get so excited that the Duke went out with me alone… like a fool?’

 

‘I shouldn’t have done that. Why did I do that?’

 

Her belated regret washed over herself.

 

But Elise wasn’t sure if she could have made a different choice even if she could go back a few minutes.

 

Because this was the first time in her life that she had seen his eyes with such extreme loneliness in them.

 

So she wanted to do something. She even wanted to give something insignificant. She did it even if it was a comfort he didn’t deserve.

 

But it was only now that Elise painfully realised that she was not qualified to comfort anyone.

 

“Please forgive me…”

 

Her legs became weak. It was then that as she was about to collapse, she was caught and pulled up.

 

Elise raised her head through the sway of her emotions, and his face reflected in her blue eyes.

 

“From now on.”

 

His eyes appeared a deeper, darker red than usual. Like flames burning beneath deep ashes.

 

“Comfort me the way I want.”

 

Cardale deeply swallowed Elise’s lips.


Under the candlelight, two figures intertwined.

 

The large shadows cast on the flickering walls wrapped around what lay beneath, moving dynamically.

 

The room, now uncomfortably warm, was filled with nothing but obscene noises.

 

“Ah… Anng! Tsk…!”

 

With each collision of moist flesh, moans escaped Elise’s lips uncontrollably. She couldn’t bring herself to close her already open mouth. Pleasure had already left her head spinning.

 

“Yes, so tight. Just how I like it.” 

 

Cardale said through gritted teeth. His movements became faster and more intense. He was particularly rough in his handling of Elise today.

 

“Ah, yes, oh… Oh!”

 

With each vigorous thrust of his hips, his cock penetrated her deeply. Repeatedly slamming and clawing at the inner walls. The sensation was electrifying, almost too overwhelming to endure.

 

“Ugh!”

 

A large hand tightly gripped her breast. Elise instinctively turned her head sideways. Tears of pleasure blurring her vision.

 

“Oh, no… Ah… Ah! Ah!”

 

Nevertheless, explosions of stars continued to relentlessly pass before her eyes. The sensation of her breasts being kneaded like dough and her nipples being teased brought such pleasure, making her head spin.

 

She couldn’t help but cry out when the hot penis pressed in deeply, overwhelming her senses.

 

“Ah! Uhh! Ugh, stop…”

 

“You just want to be fucked. You’re drooling down there, and you’re asking me to stop?”

 

Elise’s eyes turned red at his mocking words.

 

“Ugh, ah, no… Uhh!”

 

“No. You fawned over me this whole time because you wanted to be fucked like this.”

 

Elise tried to push him away, desperately shaking her head.

 

But his rough thrusts only made her head involuntarily bob up and down.

 

“Oh, oh, that’s… ah!”

 

She wanted to say no. She wanted to say she wasn’t such a lewd and promiscuous woman, and that she wasn’t fawning because she wanted to impress him.

 

‘I really… I wanted to comfort you.’

 

Her feelings were sincere.

 

But as if he didn’t want to hear Elise’s response, Cardale pushed harder against her.

 

“Stop with the useless talk and spread your legs. That’s what you’re here for.”

 

The tears that had accumulated under her bright blue eyes cascaded down the corners of her eyes and down her face. Cardale lowered himself to her face, licked the tears, then bit her earlobe.

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

As Elise writhed from her sensitive nerves being stimulated, her flesh already slick and yielding, eagerly enveloping him once more. Cardale let out a sigh of satisfaction.

 

“That’s it, just like that.” 

 

He praised, as if speaking to a well-trained pet, and grabbing Elise’s thighs to spread them wide.

 

In a position exposing where their genitals were joined, Elise hurriedly tried to lower her hand to cover herself, but instead, her wrists were grabbed and bound.

 

“Behave. Don’t get on my nerves.”

 

Then, Cardale began to move his waist mercilessly, as if he wouldn’t spare her any kindness.

 

In an instant, intense pleasure consumed her, and Elise became unable to think of anything else.

 

She simply remained trapped in his embrace, moaning loudly throughout the night.

 

It was exactly as Cardale had desired.

 



 

Unlike the woman who fainted from exhaustion, the man was in good spirits.

 

With his body seemingly more energised than usual, he left the bedroom.

 

“Your Excellency, Gerhard Schuvan has sent you another letter.”

 

Cardale twitched his mouth when he saw the envelope Michael had brought.

 

“He seems impatient.”

 

“Furthermore, he also requests permission for a visit. What shall we do?”

 

Cardale lowered his gaze lazily. The beast, once greedy just a moment ago, was feeling quite full now.

 

“I was quite satisfied.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Never mind.”

 

Now that he was satisfied for the first time, he felt more generous than usual.

 

Meaning he was willing to at least throw breadcrumbs to the person who gave him his new favourite prey.

 

Of course, ensuring loyalty was necessary.

 

Cardale ordered while looking at Michael.

 

“Make an appointment.”

 



 

When Gerhard first received permission from Michael to visit the Duke’s residence, he was very excited.

 

But as if to laugh at him, Cardale made him wait in the drawing room for hours.

 

Of course, Gerhard did not know that this was the amount of time Elise had had to wait alone and anxious for the Duke in the past.

 

That was when he wasted an unknown amount of time, pointlessly suppressing his frustration.

 

“The master will come down soon.”

 

At those words, Gerhard suddenly stood up. Then he bowed his head to the perfectly dressed man.

 

“Your Grace, the Duke. It’s an honour to meet you.”

 

“We finally meet after so long, Count Schuvan.”

 

Cardale didn’t even apologise for keeping him waiting, even if it would just be empty words. Gerhard was upset, but could not express his dissatisfaction.

 

“Now that I think about it, I heard that the Little Count is still attending the academy.”

 

As soon as he heard his son mentioned by the Duke, Gerhard’s frown crumpled.

 

Although other peers had already graduated from the academy, Fritz failed the graduation screening twice.

 

He then crawled back to the mansion, saying he could just graduate later. But instead of studying, he was busy spending time with useless people.

 

Anyway, Gerhard didn’t want to talk about his lousy son, so he just gave a rough explanation.

 

“I advised him to take a break from the academy and travel to broaden his horizons. He plans to return for schooling soon.”

 

“Okay.”

 

Even when Cardale was the one who asked Gerhard about the topic, he nodded as if he had no real interest in the matter.

 

As Gerhard suppressed his boiling rage, the topic fortunately changed.

 

“You wanted to see me.”

 

As he got to the point, Gerhard sat down and opened his mouth.

 

“Well, as a father, isn’t it natural for me to be worried about my daughter?”

 

“It is indeed natural. It seems like there were many who coveted her because of how small and beautiful she is.”

 

Then, as Cardale’s lips drew a graceful line, Gerhard secretly looked excited.

 

‘It seems like the Duke really likes Elise.’

 

Even though he foolishly threw away his luck and almost went astray. In the end, his plan worked out just fine.

 

Gerhard even felt joy at that.

 

He was so absorbed in his success that he ended up revealing his true intentions.

 

“Your Excellency the Duke, isn’t it time for you to take on a hostess?”

 

Cardale’s lips pursed, as if he had heard something very interesting.

 

Gerhard Schuvan’s intentions were so obvious that they were clearer than a transparent river.

 

“If you are too greedy, you will end up in trouble.”

 

From those words, Gerhard realised that all the Duke wanted from Elise was limited to pleasure. However, because his greed blinded him, he once again took another chance.

 

“Shouldn’t you take responsibility for ruining the life of a young lady who could have become a Marchioness?”

 

It was a question that subtly revealed he knew who spread the rumour that Elise was his illegitimate daughter.

 

But the attempt only made Cardale laugh.

 

“You must be mistaken.”

 

The relaxed yet heavy voice was somewhat chilly.

 

“If you’re going to blame me, shouldn’t I blame you for your unjust actions first?”

 

For a moment, Gerhard felt an eerie, unknown chill.

 

“I didn’t mean to blame you, Your Excellency.”

 

Gerhard answered, trying to shake off the frost running down his spine.

 

However, the sharp sensation that made his skin tingle only intensified.

 

“…I was presumptuous. Please forgive me.”

 

Only after Gerhard got down on one knee, bowed his head deeply and offered his apology, was his body set free.

 

As Gerhard sat down again, Cardale asked in a low voice.

 

“Is it your daughter’s safety that you are worried about, or is it the interests and wealth that the Count’s daughter will earn?”

 

His words were vague, so Gerhard would have to answer carefully.

 

Cardale added. Gerhard’s brow furrowed slightly.

 

‘You’re asking me to choose.’

 

Will he endure the torture of hope that someday Cardale will get himself engaged with Elise, or will he receive a certain benefit in exchange for handing over Elise?

 

Gerhard’s mind spun furiously.

 

‘Based on what just happened, it would be better to give up any expectations that the Duke will marry Elise.’

 

In that case, it would have been better to sell her for a generous price.

Gerhard came to a quick conclusion and answered.

 

“The Schuvan family will not forget Vassenberg’s cooperation and support.”

 

“That’s a smart idea.”

 

Michael placed contract documents in front of Gerhard as if he had been waiting for his queue.

 

Gerhard was so oblivious he didn’t even know Michael was in the living room, he was so startled he almost screamed.

 

“Please read it carefully and sign at the bottom.”

 

Michael placed high-quality ink and a quill next to the document, then stepped back.

 

Gerhard started to check the contract a little nervously.

 

Starting now was important. He had to be careful and prudent to complete the transaction successfully. Even more so if his opponent was Cardale Vassenberg.

 

[First, this contract may be terminated at the discretion of Cardale Vassenberg, and Elise Schuvan shall abide under all circumstances.

 

Second, Elise Schuvan shall be subject to the authority of Cardale Vassenberg for the duration of this contract.

 

Third, Elise Schuvan shall not disclose any confidential information, including the inner workings of the Vassenberg family, without permission.

 

Fourth, Elise Schuvan shall not request anything beyond the funds invested in the Schuvan family, according to the contract.

 

Fifth, any consequences for breaching the above terms shall be solely at the discretion of Cardale Vassenberg.]

 

Gerhard’s face became increasingly hard as he read.

 

‘This is bullsh!t.’

 

The provisions consisted entirely of those favourable to the Duke. He could not agree to such a contract.

 

If his opponent had been someone other than the Duke, he would have already expressed his displeasure and jumped from his seat.

 

Gerhard exercised his patience and turned to the next page of the document. Where the amount of investment was written.

 



 

At that moment, he trembled as if he had been struck by lightning and his eyes widened.

 

His eyes wavered at the enormous number. He thought he had misread them and counted again, but they were still the same. The hand holding the contract trembled slightly.

 

“I wanted to pay generously, but what do you think?”

 

When a low voice without intonation was heard, Gerhard raised his head. His eyes were full of excitement and anticipation like never before.

 

“Is this enough?”

 

“Of… Of course.”

 

Gerhard took out a business plan from his bag.

 

Michael handed the paper to Cardale, but he didn’t even look at the document, as if it didn’t matter.

 

“Bring it here.”

 

At Cardale’s order, Michael placed a dark oak wooden box in front of Gerhard. The arch-shaped lid and body had sturdy locks.

 

Michael unlocked it with a key himself and opened the box lid, revealing the gold coins filled inside.

 

Gerhard’s eyes lit up when he saw that ecstatic sparkle. Even the humiliation he felt for a moment before disappeared as if his eyes were melting.

 

“They say you are expanding your textile business. Perhaps Vassenberg’s trading company could help?”

 

Cardale’s next words were enough to solidify his choice.

 

Gerhard wasted no time in picking up his quill and placing it in his inkwell to sign.

 

‘Wait.’

 

He looked at the Duke as a thought occurred to him. Cardale lightly gestured with his chin as if asking him to say something.

 

Gerhard swallowed dry and asked a question.

 

“If the contract ends, what will happen to Elise?”

 

Perhaps because it was an unexpected question, the Duke fell silent for a moment. No thoughts could be read on this arrogant and indifferent man’s face.

 

After a while, Cardale opened his mouth.

 

“That will be up to Elise Schuvan to take care of herself.”

 

Gerhard was satisfied with those words.

 

Cardale Vassenberg seemed to like Elise quite a bit now, but it was only a matter of time before he got tired of his toy.

 

‘After the Duke kicks out Elise, she can be brought back to my house.’

 

If that happens, Elise will be able to be useful to the family again.

 

Even though she was the Duke’s mistress, she was still quite beautiful, so there was sure to be a man who would want her. He intended to use his daughter as much as he could while she was available.

 

He played with his quill, not even trying to hide his sneaky joy. Soon, Gerhard’s signature was written next to Cardale’s signature.

 

Gerhard stood up, taking one of the two completed contracts.

 

“Thank you for your generous terms, Your Excellency.”

 

“Please take a look.”

 

“Before that, there is one last thing I would like to ask of you.”

 

Instead of leaving, Gerhard looked at Cardale and said, “Since I have come this far, shouldn’t I go and see Elise’s face at least once?”

 

The man’s eyes, which had been lazily open, suddenly sank coldly. Cardale’s lips twitched.

 

“Is this amount of gold not enough to sell your precious, beautiful, illegitimate daughter?”

 

It was a blatant sarcastic remark.

 

“Answer me. Why do you need to see what now belongs to me?”

 

A cold voice echoed through the quiet room. Gerhard felt as if his breathing was being suffocated by an intangible force grabbing and pressing down on his throat.

 

He was filled with a fear of this unknown power. Gerhard quickly retracted his statement.

 

“I only asked for Elise because I thought she might want to see her father. Please don’t misunderstand.”

 



 

“If you allow me, I would like to return now.”

 

Only then did his body, feeling like it was tied up, free itself. Gerhard hurriedly caught his breath.

 

“I’ll just go back now.”

 

Gerhard parted politely and turned around, straightening his back and pulling his chin. He followed Michael out of the living room as if nothing had happened.

 

Cardale, now left alone, looked down at the completed contract with a vague gaze.

 

It was the perfect leash to put on his prey, which he had painstakingly tamed and taught to obey.

 

‘What kind of face will you make if I show you this?’

 

‘Are you going to cry because you can’t bear to accept the fact that you have been sold, or are you going to tremble because you’re afraid of what’s to come?’

 

It didn’t matter either way. Rather, he thought it would be more fun if it were both.

 

He intended to firmly imprint his position on the insolent woman who dared to speak words of comfort to him without knowing her place.

 

Once he reminded her of her near-slave status, she would grovel at his feet, begging forgiveness for what she did wrong.

 

‘She must have woken up by now.’

 

His blood rushed beneath him as he thought of the woman, naked and in tears, begging for his mercy.

 

Outside the window, he could see the daylight setting. The night was going to be dark and with no end in sight, just like his desire.

 

Cardale stood up.

 

He was planning on teaching her more tonight. It was a special pleasure to see a woman struggling in shame and pleasure before finally giving in and melting away.

 

‘How much will you cry tonight, and how much will you tolerate?’

 

He left the living room with the contract on the table.

 

An elegant, beautiful, yet somehow cruel smile was hanging on his lips.

 



 

Picking up tea for his master was one of Norman’s important daily tasks.

 

He left the tea at the Duke’s office as usual. 

 

As the blue-coloured tea poured into the teacup, a unique, pungent scent spread throughout the room.

 

When the tea was finished, Norman placed a saucer under the teacup and placed it on one side of the Duke’s desk.

 

Cardale naturally grabbed the handle and lifted the teacup.

 

The man’s lips parted and swallowed the tea.

 

It was then that the owner’s brow furrowed slightly.

 

“Couldn’t it taste a little better?”

 

“Yes…?”

 

Norman, who was confused, asked again with a slightly embarrassed expression, and Cardale gave a short answer.

 

“No.”

 

But the Duke’s expression remained impassive as he sipped his tea, leaving Norman even more perplexed.

 

Unable to inquire further into his reasoning behind the refusal, Norman could only speculate.

 

‘Does the tea taste strange…?’

 

He brewed the tea as usual. Having done this countless times before. He had even mastered the angle at which to tilt the teapot.

 

In any case, the Duke finished his tea, and Norman skillfully cleared away the cup. Then with a polite gesture, he stood upright while holding his hands together.

 

“Master.”

 

Norman took a letter from his arms and placed it on his desk. Cardale’s eyebrows twitched as he immediately recognised Elise’s handwriting.

 

“I told her not to write responses for the time being.”

 

Cardale forbade Elise from writing a response to the invitation. It was to make her keenly aware of her position and circumstances.

 

‘Did you disobey my command?’ 

 

It was just as Cardale’s anger was about to sharpen–

 

“This is a letter addressed to Your Grace, not sent from somewhere else.”

 

Cardale’s indifferent expression changed a little when he heard it was written for him.

 

Norman noticed that he was showing interest, then quickly spoke up.

 

“I don’t know how many times she rewrote it. But she seemed as if this was the only thing she could do.”

 

Cardale responded icily, “Do I need to know the affairs of a mere maid?”

 

Norman swallowed dry at the unexpectedly cold response. He recalled the delicate expression of the young lady, on the verge of tears as she pleaded for the letter to be delivered.

 

But there were limits to what Norman could say.

 

“…I was careless.”

 

“Leave.”

 

After Norman gave a worried look after the obvious order to leave, silence fell in the office.

 

Cardale looked down at the letter in front of him.

When Norman had just taken it out, the handwriting he recognised came into view.

 

[To His Excellency, Duke Cardale Vassenberg.]

 

The soft yet delicate handwriting resembled that of a woman. She put so much effort into making sure that each and every letter was neat.

 

Cardale opened the envelope and took out the letter. His arrogant red eyes slowly read what was written on the paper.

 

After checking the last sentence, he pursed his lips.

 

The submissive message, displaying the prey’s obedience, though beautiful, irritated him. It was inevitable that the hunting prey, originally tender and obedient, would be completely awakened by this incident.

 

The inherently weak and obedient woman must have realised this for sure.

 

The reason he brought her to his mansion was solely for his pleasure in bed.

 

“Michael.”

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

Things were done the way he wanted, so Cardale decided to loosen his leash, which had been holding Elise rather tight at this point.

 

“Get tickets to the opera. Something that Elise would like.”

 



 

The first thing Count Schuvan’s coachman did at the start of the day was clean the carriage.

 

The owner, the Count, had a very picky eye and placed as much importance on maintenance as the quality of the items he used.

 

He had heard his predecessor had been kicked out because of a small stain on the seat, so the coachman was even more careful.

 

‘We went to the Duke’s residence yesterday, so I should check the condition of the wheels.’

 

He kept wiping the carriage with a cloth, carefully inspecting it for anything broken or dirty.

 

It was then. A small box placed under the carriage seat caught the man’s eye.

 

“I didn’t see that before…”

 

He stretched his arm and pulled the box from the floor. It was wrapped in luxurious fabric.

 

Even at a glance, it didn’t seem like a big deal.

 

“Did the Count leave it behind yesterday?”

 

The coachman lifted the box with both hands. It was quite heavy. When he shook it slightly, something hit the wall of the box and a dull sound.

 

“Oh, it would be a big problem if it broke for no reason.”

 

The coachman quickly came to his senses and packed the box.

 

“I have to take it to the Count.”

 

If he left it in the carriage and it disappeared, he would be the one in trouble.

 

Therefore, the coachman took the box to the main building of the mansion. He planned to quickly hand the box to the Count’s aide, Vanessa.

 

“Hey, you. Come here.”

 

If only he hadn’t met Fritz, the owner’s son, first.

 

“Did you call for me, Little Count Fritz?”

 

The coachman bowed excessively.

 

Fritz’s temperament and cruel hands were an open secret among the mansion’s employees. The way for employees to survive was to please the Little Count as much as possible.

 

“What are you holding in your hand?”

 

“Oh, this is… Master visited the Duke of Vassenberg’s residence yesterday, and there was this box in the carriage, so I wanted to bring it back for you.”

 

The coachman explained what he knew.

 

“The Duke of Vassenberg?”

 

Fritz’s eyes sparkled at the words that came from the coachman’s mouth.

 

“The Duke gave it to Father?”

 

The coachman didn’t say that, but he didn’t bother to correct Fritz. He didn’t want to offend anyone, and he also didn’t want to draw Fritz’s attention.

 

However, the coachman’s wish did not come true.

 

“Give it to me.”

 

“Yes?”

 

The coachman was startled and asked back. Then Fritz suddenly distorted his face and scolded him.

 

“Give me that box.”

 

“B-but I have to report this to the Count…!”

 

“Ah, sh!t!”

 

The coachman was startled by the outburst of swear words. Fritz shouted at the trembling man.

 

“Why are you insisting that you will bring it to my father so much?”

 

“Well, then…”

 

The coachman would be lying if he said he wasn’t worried. He was strongly convinced that the son of the owner, who was such a fool, was going to steal the box.

 

But the coachman was more worried about his immediate safety, so he quickly handed over the box.

 

“Please do me this favour, Little Count.”

 

“Of course, I should. I’m doing the work for you, you lazy bastard.”

 

The coachman simply bowed his head. Then, as soon as he was out of Fritz’s gaze, he ran away.

 

Meanwhile, Fritz had taken the box, and felt its weight before laughing evilly.

 

‘I don’t know what’s inside, but it’s pretty heavy.’

 

In Fritz’s experience, the heavier something was, the more likely it was to be valuable. He unlocked the box with an expectant look on his face.

 

With a clicking sound, the fastener was released, and the lid was opened.

 

“A pigeon?”

 

Inside was a jet-black stuffed pigeon.

 

“I think I’ve seen this somewhere before.”

 

Fritz frowned and looked inside the box for a long moment. And then ah! And he burst out in exclamation.

 

“It was my father’s ex-messenger!”

 

Fritz chuckled, wondering what was so funny about the fact that he got it right.

 

“Did it get killed after being sent to the Duke’s residence? So the Duke sent it to you as a stuffed animal? Tsk, that’s very funny!”

 

Fritz wondered what kind of expression his father, who always felt sorry for him, would make when he saw this.

 

“Oh, I guess I should just bring this to you, Father.”

 

That was when he was about to close the lid again.

 

“Wait a minute, were these eyes originally red?”

 

As far as he knew, Gerhad’s former messenger had purple eyes. Fritz, puzzled, pressed his face against the box so close that his nose touched it.

 

After a moment, Fritz’s expression brightened.

 

“It’s a gem…!”

 

The red sparkling jewel was clearly a ruby. It was of the highest quality, judging by its deep red colour, like blood.

 

“These are rubies of the highest quality!”

 

Fritz completely forgot what he had just thought, and his greedy eyes shone.

 

“It’s better if Father doesn’t know about this. If he sees this for no reason, he will only feel bad.”

 

Fritz returned to his room, thinking that he would have to feel better as soon as his restraint was lifted.

 

Then he pulled out the jewels from the pigeon’s eyes.

 

“Anyway, I need to contact ‘that side’. I can’t use a messenger after all.”

 

When Fritz looked at the pigeon, he remembered something he had forgotten and grumbled. But he soon grinned at the sight of the gem rolling in his palm.

 

The carcass of the animal was thrown into the fireplace and burned, emitting a foul odour. But nothing touched the nose of the greedy man.

 

Fritz rubbed his forehead as he visited the clubhouse for the first time after so long.

 

“I wonder if they’re talking about handing her over to the Duke.”

 

In a way, it was as if he had just received a gift. Fritz lost his temper by kicking a stone on the floor as hard as he could.

 

“Damn it, it’s not like I wanted that to happen. Do they thinkshe likes the bastard too?”

 

As much as Fritz harboured anger towards Gerhard, he also held a strong resentment towards Duke Cardale.

 

In truth, it was an emotion born from inferiority, but Fritz refused to acknowledge that.

 

“Howdy Fritz! Long time no see!”

 

Someone tapped Fritz’s shoulder as he stood alone, lost in thought.

 

“Do you know how much everyone has been waiting for you? Come on in, I’ll buy you a drink!”

 

For some reason, the attitude toward him was more favourable than before, so Fritz followed the person in confusion.

 

“Welcome back, Fritz!”

 

The acquaintances he met welcomed him even more. On the desk where they played their card games was a newspaper with Cardale Vassenberg’s name written in large letters.

 

“I heard that the Duke of Vassenberg made a huge investment in the Count Schuvan estate?”

 

“Uh? Oh! Yes.”

 

It was the first time he had heard of it, but Fritz quickly pretended otherwise.

 

“Yeah, your life has completely changed now! You’re being looked after by none other than Cardale Vassenberg himself!”

 

Fritz was flattered by the compliments he received here and there. Yet, at the same time, he felt dirty.

 

‘What’s all the fuss about the Duke? He’s just lucky to be born into that noble family!’

 

Fritz had a deep-seated sense of superiority as a noble. He didn’t treat commoners as human beings and he hated nobles of a higher class than himself.

 

“With Vassenberg’s influence growing by the day, imagine how many people will want to curry favour with him! You’ve struck gold with your current position!”

 

“I am so envious of you these days. You’re wealthy and have the rank of Count!”

 

Fritz thought to himself, ignoring behind their fuss.

 

‘Satisfied with just being a Count? Ridiculous.’

 

Fritz believed there was a more worthy position for him. He also felt that he did not necessarily need to receive the title in the name of the Nordrat Empire and the Oldenhilt House.

 

‘I need to intercept my father’s correspondence somehow to make contact.’

 

They said crackdowns have been strengthening these days, but communication has become less frequent. Not knowing how things were going made his patience slowly run out.

 

In this noisy atmosphere, a newspaper hit someone’s elbow and fell to the floor. Only Fritz saw it.

 

Kuuk. His shoe landed squarely on the name ‘Cardale Vassenberg.’

 

Even if it meant salvaging his wounded pride.

 



 

At the same time, a tabloid featuring the Duke of Vassenberg was lying on an old-fashioned table.

 

Cardale glanced at the title and chuckled.

 

The boutique employee who was serving tea and refreshments looked at him in surprise and put away the newspaper.

 

Of course, that was because he didn’t know that was Cardale’s intention.

 

Now, the Nodrat social circle has no choice but to acknowledge that, at least for this social season, Elise Schuvan is his partner.

 

‘And the Princess, too.’

 

That was when Cardale twisted his mouth into a wry smile.

 

“Your Excellency, let me close the curtain.”

 

At the employee’s polite words, the man, who was sitting gracefully with a leg crossed, nodded.

 

The heavy purple velvet curtains shielded the fitting room gracefully and slid shut on either side.

Elise appeared through the open curtain.

 

She was looking down at the hem of her dress with an awkward expression, up in surprise when the employee whispered next to her.

 

Cardale and Elise’s eyes met. Those eyes, which seemed to be made from compressed beads of a deep blue lake, shook but did not look away.

 

Cardale was very satisfied with the results of his extensive training, raising a corner of his mouth.

 

“Your Excellency, how does it look?”

 

The boutique madam asked him cautiously.

 

Cardale sat with his legs crossed and carefully looked down at the woman standing in front of him.

 

But what he stumbled with was not the matching dress, but Elise herself.

 

After taking a close look at her pure white neck and slender arms, alongside her voluptuous body hidden below her dress, he opened his lips and answered.

 

“It’s good.”

 

The madam was happy to hear those words.

 

“Would you choose this dress?”

 

“Of course. Including the ones she wore earlier.”

 

“Yes? Yes! All right!”

 

The madam repeatedly bowed at the unexpected request.

 

Her staff began to move busily in response to her gestures.

 

They took Elise back inside a dressing room with a mirror. Then drew the curtains to hide her appearance.

 

“Your Excellency, if you could wait a moment…”

 

But instead of listening to the madam, Cardale stood.

 

Step by step, his shoes made a regular sound as he crossed the dressing room, just like when he was a soldier.

 

As the Duke’s hand grabbed the curtain and opened it, the madam sensed what the man was about to do.

 

There were many cases where men who took mistresses, wanted to receive pleasure from those women while they were beautifully decorated to their own taste.

 

In response to these customer demands, high-end boutiques each have spacious fitting rooms.

 

Here as well, luxurious and spacious sofas, cushions, and blankets were placed inside the dressing room, alongside a rug made of expensive animal fur on the floor.

 

‘Everyone, please come out quickly.’

 

As the madam winked, the employees noticed the situation and left the space like an ebb.

 

Finally, the madam also left, putting a lock on the reception room connected to the dressing room, and closing the door.

 

Now, the door could not be opened until the couple had finished their fun and left the room.

 



 

Meanwhile, Elise had been standing in front of the mirror under the guidance of the employees, and was taken aback when the people who were helping her undress suddenly left. Leaving her alone.

 

“Oh, hey…?”

 

Elise faltered in confusion, but turned her head when she heard the sound of a man’s shoes.

 

“Duke…”

 

The man leisurely walked towards her. His red eyes glowed in fascination, appreciating the sight of his prey, caught in a trap and unable to escape.

 

Meanwhile, Cardale came up behind Elise and squeezed her chin, making her look at the mirror. As the two people’s gazes intertwined through the mirror, the tips of Elise’s ears turned red.

 

“Do you like the clothes?”

 

“Yes. They’re really pretty.”

 

Elise nodded, her face held against him. She then carefully revealed her innermost concerns that she had been worrying about earlier.

 

“Um, but can I really accept such an expensive dress…?”

 

The muslin clothes, so light and soft you couldn’t even tell she was wearing them. They felt like they were of the highest quality, even to Elise, who didn’t know much about fabric.

 

Lace painstakingly woven by skilled craftsmen decorated the neckline, under the sleeves, and the hem of the dress. As well as a waist strap embroidered with gold thread.

 

Moreover, this dress wasn’t the only thing Cardale bought.

 

“There are too many…”

 

Elise recalled how many dresses she had changed into in total.

 

She didn’t even know that her worried expression would be clearly visible to Cardale.

 

He chuckled. A mockery directed at the pitiful and insignificant woman who couldn’t even hide her humble background and destitute circumstances.

 

“Are you dissatisfied even with so much?”

 

“No, it’s not that…”

 

Elise was embarrassed and tried to make an excuse, but Cardale grabbed her arm and squeezed.

 

In the blink of an eye, Elise’s wrist was adorned with a bracelet made of intricately woven pearls.

 

“It suits you well.”

 

Eventually, his calloused fingers began to gently brush the delicate skin on the inside of her wrist, and Elise swallowed her breath.

 

The touch tickled and felt strange as he gently pressed against her pulse point. Looking at Cardale with a puzzled look on her face, she saw him in the mirror, where he pursed his lips and let go of her wrist.

 

‘Thank God.’

 

She felt relief for a moment.

 

“Ah…”

 

In an instant, her earlobe became heavy. Elise’s eyes widened when she saw the tear drop shaped pearl hanging from her ear.

 

“This also suits you well.”

 

He commented, slowly touching the earlobe where the earring was hanging. It was a gentle yet strangely intimate touch. As the heat began to rise from somewhere within her, Elise urgently opened her mouth.

 

“Ah, Duke. Wait… ah!”

 

“But is it okay if I leave out the most important thing?”

 

Suddenly, Elise let out a short gasp as something cold touched her neck between her clavicles. When she came to her senses, she saw a necklace made of pearls, clear diamonds, and blue sapphires.

 

“As soon as I saw this, I knew I had to put it around your pure white neck.”

 



 

“If you’re going to sell yourself, shouldn’t you pretty yourself up and smile brightly to please your owner? Or are you still trying to maintain some pathetic sense of dignity in such a situation?” 

 

Cardale’s hand pressed against her neck. Then he began to caress the pale and tender skin slowly. A strange feeling of heat gradually intensified.

 

Sensing her fear as Elise unconsciously grabbed for Cardale’s hand, he pressed firmly along the most vulnerable part of her neck.

 

“Tsssk!”

 

With a short gasp, Elise’s head involuntarily tilted back, revealing her neck completely.

 

Cardale lowered his head and lips to the perfectly exposed area.

 

The sensation of his lips, the softest part of the man, touching her most vulnerable spot, was unsettlingly exquisite.

 

But how could such a simple act feel so depraved?

 

“Do you like these as well?”

 

His low voice penetrated her ear, sending shivers down her spine.

 

“Y-yes, I do.”

 

Elise urgently nodded.

 

“But this is also a burdensome gift for you, right?”

 

As Cardale’s hand toyed with the necklace around her neck and his lips lingered near her ear, her body tensed. She couldn’t bear this strange sensation any longer.

 

‘No, this can’t be.’

 

Elise closed her eyes tightly and barely opened her mouth to reply.

 

“Huh, a little…”

 

“A little?”

 

“N-no, a lot….”

 

As his lips left her earlobe, they marked a trail of kisses along her pulse points, leaving imprints like stamps. Finally pressing his lips firmly against the centre of her neck, before pulling away, whispering subtly.

 

“Would you like to say thank you for this favour?”

 

‘Isn’t that what you are good at?’

 

As soon as those words were finished, the strap around Elise’s waist was loosened and fell to the floor.

 

The man’s large hand grasped her left breast through the thin fabric.

 

“Huh!”

 

Elise, now realising what he was trying to do, urgently shook her head.

 

This wasn’t a bedroom. This certainly wasn’t the place for such obscene acts.

 

‘If someone else comes in…!’

 

It was a changing room where employees came and went until just a little while ago. She didn’t know if someone would come back in. Heat gathered around her eyes from shame as she thought of the vulgar sounds that would definitely leak through the curtain.

 

“The employees have all left by now.”

 

Before she knew it, her dress had been pulled down from her shoulders, leaving half of her breasts exposed. As his hand slowly rubbed her mound, Elise’s blue eyes suddenly filled with fear.

 

“Oh, no… I don’t like it here…”

 

Without realising it, she grabbed Cardale’s arm with both her hands and pushed him away. Before she knew it, her eyes were blurry.

 

“I don’t want this….”

 

The moment she pleaded again, her body felt free, as if it were a lie.

 

The man let her go and didn’t even flinch. There was no answer. As a sudden silence filled the dressing room, Elise suddenly came to her senses.

 

She quickly blinked away the tears that had formed in her eyes, and sure enough, the man’s face in the mirror was frozen cold.

 

The expression he made when he was angry. Elise knew that, and excused herself by covering her lips.

 

“Your Grace, I-I mean…”

 

A cold, subdued voice cut her off.

 

“It seems you’ve already forgotten what you promised.”

 

“No, no, I haven’t.”

 

Elise shook her head vigorously. She felt like she was suffocating from her mistakes again.

 

‘Rather than keeping a toy that can’t be played with as he desired, it’s better to smash it and throw it in the trash. Isn’t that right, Elise?’

 

During the few days she spent confined in Cardale’s bedroom to receive him, Elise came to realise with devastating certainty her value and purpose.

 

“I didn’t forget. Really.”

 

Elise repeatedly pleaded earnestly, tears welling up under her eyes.

 

Cardale looked down at the sight, then offered the intended mercy.

 

“Say it.”

 

Elise, barely allowed to speak otherwise, pursed her lips and answered.

 

“…I will do whatever the Duke asks me to do…”

 

“I see. Then you haven’t forgotten.”

 

He responded coldly before he gave an overbearing command.

 

“Then take it off.”


Elise looked at the man in the mirror with wet eyes.

 

His blood-red eyes were flashing so cruelly that it was scary. She trembled slightly, knowing how merciless he was at times like this. She didn’t have the option to refuse.

 

‘But…’

 

Elise’s eyes turned to the mirror, then to the closed purple curtain in the distance. Her anxiety that someone might be there made her hesitate.

 

Cardale noticed her hesitation, and gave a low warning.

 

“If I do this, it won’t be graceful. If your wish is to climb into the carriage wearing rags, then so be it.”

 

It wasn’t difficult to know his words were sincere.

 

Elise began to take off her clothes with trembling hands. As each layer covering her body disappeared, Cardale’s eyes sank sinisterly.

 

She disrobed until she was left with only a layer of underwear covering her privates.

 

“Ah…!”

 

The man’s large hand grabbed her thigh and lifted it to the side.

 

Cardale let out a soft gasp as the small, thin piece of cloth covering the gap between her legs pulled taut.

 

He wrapped his arms around Elise’s thighs and lightly brushed her underwear with his free hand.

 

“Ugh!”

 

“Look at me.”

 

As he gave a firm command, wrapping his arms around her body from behind, Elise raised her head.

 

The woman in the mirror was almost naked, with her legs spread wide.

 

The only things on her body were the sparkling jewellery and a piece of underwear. But the soaked cloth was no longer doing its job very well.

 

“I can already feel it, you’re getting wet for me.”

 

“Ah, ahhh!”

 

Cardale’s fingers began to move slowly across the wet cloth.

 

Every time his fingers slipped into the crack, the area below became hot and excited.

 

Since she had no right to refuse his touch, Elise curled her lips and tried to suppress her moans.

 

However, the moment the man raised his finger and scratched her clitoris with his nail, an exhilarating sensation spread throughout her body.

 

“Huh!”

 

Her back suddenly bounced. He could feel her lower body, soggy and twitching, becoming even wetter with the sticky liquid.

 

“Down below, you listen so well.”

 

Cardale, his eyes wide open in satisfaction, put his lips close to her ear and whispered. At the same time, he used his hand to press the centre of her underwear, the especially hollow part.

 

“Huh!”

 

The wet cloth stuck to his fingers and pushed into her private part.

 

No matter how soft the fabric was, it was nothing compared to her soft inner flesh, and Elise arched her back and moaned at the feeling of friction as it was rubbing against her ticklish entrance.

 

“Tsk… Hmm, uhh…!”

 

His fingers moved in earnest.

 

With a layer of cloth between them, he lightly penetrated her hole and pressed her clit, which was swollen like a ripe fruit.

 

“Ah, yes! Haah, anngg… Ugh, ah…!”

 

In the dizzying pleasure, Elise forgot the rule about not disturbing him and grabbed Cardale’s hand. However, his movements did not change.

 

“What’s wrong? Ah, are you upset because I haven’t touched your breasts?”

 

His other hand grasped her bouncing breasts as if to support them. Her protruding nipples became more erect as he applied force. Feeling like they were to the point of bursting.

 

“Ah!”

 

He massaged her breasts as if they belonged to him and tormented her deliciously rising nipples.

 

As he twisted the protrusion between his thumb and index finger, a tingling pain spread throughout her chest, and her vision became dizzy.

 

Elise tossed her head back in pleasure and continued to let out vulgar sounds.

 

While Cardale’s other hand, which had been pressing down on her, had already pushed the cloth aside and was pressing into the vaginal opening. His middle finger, thicker than the others, pushing into her hole.

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

“Even though I fuck you like this, it’s still so tight for me…”

 

Cardale clicked his tongue lightly. But at the same time, he was excited by the feeling of her inner flesh clinging so tightly to him. Even a single finger. He could feel his own bulge threatening to burst inside his pants.

 

His fingers rubbed Elise’s curved inner walls and pressed the smooth parts as if crushing them. It was a point she felt sensitive to.

 

“Haaaah!”

 

Elise gushed, her body shaking and spilling fluid. He was masterful and knew her body better than even Elise did.

 

He pushed his index finger into the loosened hole and moved it like scissors, widening her inner walls. The fingers quickly stretched with an obscene wet sound.

 

“Taking three now should be easy, right?”

 

“Ah, ah, ah, ah…!”

 

The movement of his penetrating hand became faster. The fingers pushing in and out of the hole were soaked in her vaginal fluid and glistening.

 

Elise’s vision continued to blur from the rising pleasure.

 

‘Strange. My body keeps…’

 

A dizzying sensation started from between her legs and travelled up her spine. It was proof that her climax was approaching. At times like this, even though it was her own body, she couldn’t control it as she wanted.

 

Tears welled up from under Elise’s eyes from the uncontrollable pleasure. Cardale wiped away the tears and whispered.

 

“Don’t cry, just let go.”

 

“Haaah!”

 

As he quickly removed his hand, her body reached a climax. Elise arched her back as her inner walls tightened.

 

“You did well.”

 

Her body trembled as she fell after reaching the end. Cardale lowered her raised thighs so she could place both her feet on the ground.

 

“Hah… Hah…”

 

Elise stumbled, leaning her body against the mirror in front of her, and moaned. As the coolness of the mirror touched her cheeks and her chest, her dazed senses slowly returned.

 

‘Would you please stop now? If I ask the rest to go back to the mansion, will you listen?’

 

Elise barely lifted her cheeks, flushed with pleasure, and opened her mouth.

 

“Well, Duke, now… Huh!”

 

“Still not satisfied. Hmm?”

 

When she tried to look behind her, her head was caught and turned forward. At the same time, he took off the underwear she had barely had on until now.

 

Cardale ordered in a terribly low voice as he exposed her.

 

“Stand straight.”

 

Elise whimpered but spread her legs with her hands holding onto the mirror.

 

He took out his penis while admiring the back of her curvaceous body. A thick bead of pre-cum flowed down from the swollen glands on the shaft, showing how excited he was.

 

“Huuu….”

 

He lightly pressed his shaft near her vagina and gently pressed the woman’s back with his other hand.

 

“Huh.”

 

Her breasts pressed against the mirror as her hips sank back. Soon, something hot and hard touched her nether regions.

 

“Haah…”

 

As the rough shaft rubbed against her entrance, Elise’s body ignited with heat, as if asking when it would fully penetrate.

 

Her lower parts, which had been tormented this whole time, soon made a wet sound and writhed.

 

“Tsssk.”

 

Cardale, who coated his penis with her love juices, grabbed Elise’s buttocks tightly and spread them.

 

“Ahhh!”

 

As he aligned his glans with her slick and swollen entrance, and thrust his hips upward, his penis plunged deeply into her with one swift motion.

 

“Ah, huh, uhm…”

 

Elise moaned, shaking her back at the dizzying pleasure from having her inner walls penetrated.

 

Even though she’s had sex with him several times before, the first penetration was still difficult.

 

When something the size of her forearm crashed underneath her, she felt like her organs were being pushed up.

 

But at the same time, her body trembled in anticipation of the pleasure he would soon give her. And that reaction was fully conveyed to Cardale.

 

“It’s because you love every time I fuck you.”

 

Despite the somewhat teasing tone, his voice held a hint of laughter.

 

He lowered his hand to stroke Elise’s stomach as if praising her. He could faintly feel his shaft under the thin skin.

 

“Yet, every time, you resist as if you dislike it.”

 

“Huh, ah…!”

 

As Cardale gently pressed Elise’s stomach, her slender body bounced up.

 

“Nu, huh, don’t press, don’t… Ahh!”

 

“Why shouldn’t I?”

 

Elise whimpered with teary eyes. It was clear how slutty she must have looked.

 

Cardale slowly pulled out his cock as he felt it getting harder underneath her. Her taut inner walls clung to it as if reluctant to let him go.

 

“Huh? Answer me, Elise.”

 

He spread her narrow inner walls apart and pressed the blunt tip of his penis where she felt the most sensitive, then slowly pulled out of her vagina and repeated.

 

“Ah, ah… Tsk…”

 

Elise was anxious about the tantalising movement. She moaned, pressing her cheek against the sleek mirror.

 

“Huh, huh, just a little bit…”

 

Without realising it, her inner thoughts spilled out of her mouth. She quickly covered her mouth with her hand, but Cardale had already heard her.

 

“Just a little bit of what?”

 

Cardale leaned his body closer, pressing against her tightly. As the angle of penetration changed with the shift in position, Elise whimpered and squirmed as her hips lifted.

 

“You have to answer. I’m asking.”

 

Cardale gently turned her waist. As his thick penis rubbed against her inner walls and pressed against her deepest point, Elise couldn’t stand it anymore and couldn’t resist this interrogation.

 

“Just a little bit, huk, faster… ugh!”

 

“Faster? You want me to fuck you faster?”

 

“Yeah, huk, yes, yes… ah!”

 

His penis, from tip to the base, plunged deeply into her again to the root.


With each forceful thrust that seemed to crush her cerv!x, Elise’s head tilted back with her mouth gaping open.

 

A soundless whimper echoed from her mouth before dissipating.

 

“Did you climax?”

 

Cardale whispered, hugging her twitching body.

 

Elise couldn’t answer. She simply trembled beneath his weight, her nether regions pulsating lightly.

 

Still feeling the contracting and relaxing walls of the woman beneath him. Cardale held onto her hips, refusing to let go.

 

“To barely reach this point so quickly.”

 

The man’s lips trailed along the sweaty neck of the woman, a sensitive place.

 

With a sob, Elise clenched him again. She couldn’t help but react truthfully, her body betraying her.

 

“Come to think of it, you like to be fucked, Elise.”

 

Even with her clouded mind, Elise was a little scared.

 

“N-no, that’s not true.”

 

She shook her head urgently and stretched one of her hands behind herself. The bracelet he had wrapped around her wrist with his own hands dangling pathetically.

 

Cardale let out a low laugh at that pitiful gesture and began to pull and push her hips roughly.

 

“Uh, huh… ah! Ahh!”

 

Every time the penis penetrated her delicate mucous membrane, a moan was pushed out of Elise’s mouth.

 

The sight before her eyes turned white as the thick, veiny pillar penetrated her narrow passage and touched the deep peak with its thick glans.

 

When the cap of his glans scraped against her throbbing vagina and pulled out, a cool, dizzying feeling of pleasure hit her head.

 

The obscene creaking friction heated up the space.

 

“You’re tightening up better today. Is it because you received a gift?”

 

“Huh, ah… Ah!”

 

Elise couldn’t even respond to the insulting words while he bit her earlobe. She just let out a wet moan.

 

There was a constant slapping sound of flesh coming from where they were connected, where it was being kneaded promiscuously.

 

Below, her nether regions were in disarray, busy leaking fluids. Puck, puck, puck. Even contractions began to occur involuntarily.

 

‘No, no, ah, no…’ 

 

Elise, foreseeing the shameful end, urgently shook her head.

 

However, the hands holding her hips were firm, and the thick cock continuously thrusted in and out of her through the narrow hole. Throbbing and stimulating her inner walls.

 

That was when Elise raised her fingers and scratched at the mirror, twisting her waist to try and get free.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Ahhh!

 

Her white buttocks turned red alongside the sound of flesh clinging to each other.

 

“I told you to stand straight.”

 

Her hand that was scratching the mirror seemed to drop, but her arms were grabbed by Cardale and pulled behind her.

 

As her torso straightened, her head lifted. With a posture that seemed to be offering her breasts for inspection, Elise’s ears flushed with embarrassment.

 

He stepped behind her with his penis still inside her. Then he grabbed her chin and made her look in the mirror.

 

“How do you look?”

 

Elise looked into the mirror with unfocused eyes.

 

Her wet eyes, her lips dripping with saliva, her breasts sticking out and bouncing, and even though it’s hard to see, her genitals fully visible through her spread legs—everything was on display.

 

Her wet eyes turned towards Cardale. He was fully clothed, unlike her naked body.

 

The stark difference in their positions was not something that could be narrowed down with any effort.

 

All she had to do was realise again what she already knew, and Elise’s eyes reddened. For some reason, a corner of her chest felt tingly, and her throat felt tight.

 

‘What if…’

 

A dreamlike assumption floated in her mind.

 

‘What if… I wasn’t a lowly, illegitimate child…?’

 

But her distraction didn’t last long.

 

“Who told you to have other thoughts?”

 

“Ah, ah!”

 

The thrusting, which had paused for a moment, had started again. The meaningless thoughts were eroded by pleasure and quickly evaporated.

 

“Ugh!”

 

In addition to the strong thrust, her body held by his arms was pulled back, and his penis was plunged deeper. Their sticky junction clinging and parting with each repetition.

 

“Ah, yes! Tsk… Ahhhh!”

 

Elise let out a string of cries, her body writhing with each thrust.

 

With every plunge that seemed to pierce her lower body, the hot and firm penis teased her, promising to melt her mind with pleasure.

 

Her sparkling jewelled earring and necklace moved like a pendulum as she swayed back and forth.

 

It wasn’t long before the pleasure raked down her spine and hit her like a tidal wave.

 

“Ah, ah! Ugh… Ahhh!”

 

Elise craned her neck and screamed. As the narrow vaginal walls contracted and squeezed his cock, Cardale also let out a moan and poured out his load deep inside her.

 

Through her climax that came at the same time, Cardale held Elise as if trapping her in his arms, as she was about to collapse.

 

He let her body be within his firm embrace, moaning with her hazy, unhinged eyes.

 

Cardale enjoyed the pleasure of slowly shaking her waist without removing his penis from inside her.

 

“Hahh…”

 

After squeezing out every last drop of semen, he slowly pulled out his cock.

 

Elise trembled at the sharp sensation of her inner walls being scratched. When the penis that had pierced her body and held it in place finally slipped out, her weak legs gave out and she stumbled.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

But before she could sit down, Cardale picked her up and set her down on the sofa. Big enough for him to lie down her small body on, then took out his handkerchief.

 

“Ugh!”

 

When the cloth touched her sensitive areas, Elise startled and closed her legs. When he caught between her thighs, Cardale had no trouble wiping her wet underside with the handkerchief.

 

After that, he started dressing Elise in her clothes piece by piece, except for the soaked undergarments.

 

“You should dress properly. The garments might still fetch a good price later.”

 

“Uh…”

 

“Or do you want to be paid in gold coins like your father?”

 

At those words, Elise recalled that Gerhard had received a huge amount of money as an investment for selling her.

 

“Whether it’s jewellery or money, take it when you can. I will pay you the right price.”

 

Those words struck Elise’s heart. But instead of showing her feelings that she couldn’t understand, she lowered her head to hide her tear-filled eyes and answered.

 

“Yes… Duke.”

 

Looking at Elise like that, Cardale pulled his lips.

 

Now that he has given the woman a leash of debt, she will not dare to think of running away.

 

In fact, Cardale’s current actions were quite contradictory, considering he had always scorned the act of keeping women by paying them money.

 

However, rather than recognising that fact, Cardale considered his current act to be a fair price for what he had already paid.

 

After dressing Elise completely, he held her in his arms. Then covered her carefully with a blanket.

 

He did not want anyone to see any lingering traces of their erotic activities.

 

“Let’s finish the rest at home.”

 

But let alone an answer from her, there was not even movement. When he lowered his gaze, he saw the woman asleep in his arms, probably from exhaustion.

 



 

Cardale looked at the woman’s sunken eyes and pulled up the blanket to hide her head.

 

Finally, the man left the dressing room, stuffing a soggy handkerchief and underwear into his coat pocket.

 



 

The rumour that the Duke of Vassenberg had a woman has now spread to the extent that there were no social circles who did not know about it.

 

It was no longer a rumour. The Duke carried this woman around as if showing her off, completely oblivious to what people thought.

 

Because of this, the two were frequently seen in high-end restaurants, dressing rooms, opera houses, and downtown areas together.

 

This in itself was surprising, but there was one more thing that shocked the nobles.

 

The Duke, famous for being cold and ruthless, was quite kind to his mistress. He even seemed gentlemanly at times in the amount he was seen.

 

His attitude was as if she were his fiancée rather than his mistress.

 

Such facts were naturally spread to the Imperial Palace through word of mouth.

 

And like all news in the Imperial Palace, Emperor Johann was the first to hear of this fact.

 

He realised through a series of reports that his daughter’s situation had become quite ridiculous.

 

So Johann called Theresia and gave her some serious advice.

 

“That’s enough. Give up on the Duke.”

 

“What are you talking about!?”

 

Theresia shouted in a shaky voice. But this time, Johann did not back down.

 

“If you marry a man like that, the dignity of the Imperial family will be ruined. Besides, how can you keep by your side someone who rejected and pushed you away?”

 

Johann persuaded Theresa.

 

“I’ll find another suitor. There will be someone worthy of you among the princes of other countries.”

 

At the mention of a new suitor, Theresa’s patience snapped.

 

“What’s wrong with a man with wealth and power having a mistress? Besides, my father has had many mistresses.”

 

For a moment, Johann was speechless. Theresa did not miss this opportunity and continued speaking.

 

“You know. If it’s Cardale Vassenberg, it wouldn’t even be a flaw.”


Theresia was stubborn. Johann felt tired and irritated by his daughter not doing as he wanted.

 

“Well then, do whatever you want. But don’t expect my help in the future.”

 

“Father!”

 

Theresia shouted.

 

“Father, you also needed the Duke, so you put me forward. Are you trying to back out now?”

 

“If that’s the case, you should have pursued him properly. You were the one who was unable to capture a man’s heart, pushed aside for an illegitimate child. Are you trying to blame your father for that?”

 

Hah, Theresia’s eyes shot up fiercely. She raised her head, her buried feelings of anger and betrayal seeping out.

 

She opened her mouth with a heavily suppressed voice.

 

“That’s why I hate illegitimate children.”

 

Theresia had never spoken to the Emperor like that before, nor had she revealed this secret she wanted to keep hidden.

 

“How could I not? They always take what’s mine.”

 

There was bitterness in her words. And Johann noticed that fact.

 

The Emperor’s face gradually hardened.

 

“You, surely–”

 

“Did you think I would never find out? How long were you planning on hiding such a secret?”

 

“Keep your voice down.”

 

Johann immediately warned with a stern look, but Theresia could not bear it.

 

“Why should I? Despite my efforts to reveal this injustice and my anger, it remains unresolved. Why should I? Marius, no, that filthy–”

 

“Shut your mouth!”

 

Johann shouted and stood up, his fist shaking as he hit the armrest of his throne.

 

“Theresia von Oldenhilt.”

 

The Emperor wanted to be seen as a good father to everyone in the Empire and acted accordingly, but he was merciless to anyone who tried to threaten his authority and power.

 

Even if Theresia was a royal princess, she was no exception.

 

“Don’t ever mention that name again. If you disobey this command, it will be considered treason. Do you understand?”

 

Theresia’s face was cruelly distorted.

 

However, it was clear whose will was stronger, and Theresia still had the ability to recognise that.

 

“Yes, Your Majesty.”

 

That’s why she knelt and bowed, even as she tightened her hands along the hem of her dress.

 

“Do not engage in actions you cannot bear the weight of. If any cross that line, no matter who they are, I cannot prevent the consequences.”

 

It was unclear whether the Emperor was referring to the Duke or her brother, the Crown Prince. It was humiliating either way.

 

“Leave.”

 

Theresia swallowed her anger and left the throne room. She didn’t know how to get rid of this dirty feeling. 

 

Would she feel relieved if she destroyed everything?

 

‘I want to kill them all.’

 

She was just about to leave the Emperor’s room, barely holding onto her life.

 

“Theresia.”

 

As soon as she confirmed the identity of the man who appeared at the end of the hallway, Theresia’s face froze.

 

Because he was one of the people she thought of killing.

 

But he was someone she couldn’t ignore right now, so she had to greet him.

 

“Brother Marius.”

 

Then, a smile appeared on the face of the man with red hair and grey eyes like hers.

 

“Were you going to see Father?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Because of your business with the Duke?”

 

Theresia’s eyes twitched. She looked at the Crown Prince with sharp eyes.

 

Sure enough, there was a sneer in his round, curved eyes.

 

As if it was funny to see her chasing a man.

 

‘A bastard like him should not raise his head, much less live in this empire.’

 

Theresia answered, hiding her disgust and hatred for him, as he was her brother and should be treated with begrudging respect.

 

“Father must be waiting. Please, go in quickly.”

 

Relieved that he didn’t want to engage in further conversation, Theresia bowed her head, and the Crown Prince didn’t detain her.

 

“Very well. Be on your way.”

 

Instead, the smile containing faint mockery only grew deeper.

 

She turned her body, raising her chin and straightening her back, even as she trembled from her humiliation and misery.

 

Theresia’s low mood was also conveyed to her loyal guard, who was waiting for her.

 

“Your Royal Highness.”

 

“Don’t say a word, Dietrich.”

 

There was a heavy silence between the two all the way back to the Princess’ palace.

 

Then, only after entering her room, Theresia opened her mouth.

 

“He told me to give up on the Duke. First, he insisted on capturing him by any means necessary, but now he’s worried about his reputation being tarnished.”

 



 

Dietrich Klein listened to the Princess in silence.

 

“Like a blind fool, I gave up my position as the successor, and now even my right is being taken by a bastard. I don’t understand why my situation has become like this.”

 

Her self-mocking words were as cruel as if she was vomiting her own blood.

 

Dietrich’s eyes darkened.

 

“Dietrich.”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Can you help me?”

 



 

“Whether it’s killing that woman or making her disappear, by any means necessary.”

 

Dietrich looked at the Princess. She was arrogant, selfish and cruel, but she was his only master.

 

“Yes, Your Royal Highness.”

 

The answer was already determined.

 



 

The opera house in the capital city of Ingel was a space thoroughly designed for the upper class.

 

The ticket prices reflected that, and visitors were selected based on certain criteria.

 

Especially on days when popular performances were staged, getting a reservation was not easy.

 

“I couldn’t sleep a wink because I was so excited to see Werner Rieden in the lead role.”

 

“Me too. You don’t know how hard I worked to get tickets for this first performance.”

 

Today in particular a highly anticipated work was being put to the stage for the first time. Thanks to this, the theatre sparkled with colourful lights and was as crowded as an imperial palace banquet.

 

The characters were equally dazzling.

 

However, even among the so-called elite, there was one who stood unrivalled.

 

“Oh my, look over there.”

 

“They are here again.”

 

The two main characters to set the social world ablaze recently were getting off their carriage.

 

The man who left first and held the woman’s hand even seemed friendly at first glance.

 

The two leisurely passed the nobles and then upstairs.

 

The box seats on the second floor and up were expensive, but there was definitely a level within them.

 

Cardale and Elise entered the exclusive box seats, reserved just for them.

 

It was a space with sturdy walls, doors, and thick velvet curtains that not only had a panoramic view of the stage and audience, but also allowed for any private activities.

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise paused as she entered.

 

The inside had changed. The fur rug on the floor became richer, and the sofa covered in red velvet cloth was replaced with a more spacious one.

 

“I should be able to leave it covered in your traces.”

 

Cardail stood behind her and breathed hot breath into her ear as he whispered. Elise’s neck and ears turned bright red.

 

“Oh, Duke…”

 

Her face red with shame, Elise looked up at him. There was even a little fear in her eyes.

 

Seeing her scared, Cardale responded with a sigh.

 

“There’s nothing to worry about. I’m not going to do anything today.”

 

“Really…?”

 

Elise did not easily believe him and hesitated in the doorway. Then he twitched his eyebrows.

 

“Unless you want me to change my mind, you’d better sit down.”

 

The voice was somewhat soft, but contained a hint of menace.

 

Elise, knowing this was her only warning, calmly went and sat down on the sofa. It was surprisingly soft and fluffy.

 

“Why didn’t you go for a walk today?”

 

Cardale asked as he sat down next to her, Elise turned her head and looked at him.

 

“Why did you skip what you usually do every day?”

 

“Ah…”

 

She opened her mouth slightly and blinked.

 

‘I didn’t know the Duke knew about such trivial things.’

 

Even more so, she never thought he would ask her about that.

 

She was a little embarrassed, but also surprised. But that wasn’t everything. Elise parted her lips, feeling her heart pounding.

 

“When I was told we were going to the opera house… Linda said we didn’t have enough time to prepare…”

 

Cardale frowned slightly. He muttered inaudibly, trying to show off to someone, and then looked at Elise again.

 

“Just ignore that from now on. You don’t have to accept everything those who serve you say.”

 

“Okay…”

 

But even as she gave her answer, Elise became a little confused.

 

Because he was the one who had suddenly ordered her to get ready because they were going to the opera house.

 

Moreover, not that long ago, she was embarrassed to receive so much clothes and jewellery from him. And now he says this to her.

 

“If you’re going to sell yourself, shouldn’t you pretty yourself up and smile brightly to please your owner? Are you trying to maintain some pathetic sense of dignity in such a situation?”

 

‘That’s why I paid more attention…’

 

Elise wiggled her fingers, glancing at the face of the man whose thoughts she could not tell.

 

‘Perhaps you didn’t like the way I dressed?’

 

She looked down at her attire. The dress, with a shimmering water-like hue, was beautiful. She had adorned herself with the necklace, earrings, and headpiece he had instructed.

 

No matter how much Elise thought about it, it didn’t seem like this was a matter of attire.

 

‘Then maybe I…’

 

Just as a terrifying thought crossed her mind.

 

“The days are getting hotter, you’ll need a parasol.”

 

Cardale spoke.


“A parasol… Is that okay?”

 

Elise’s eyes widened at the unexpected words.

 

“If you want to take a walk in the afternoon.”

 

Only then did Elise realise that what he was taking issue with was not her appearance but something else.

 

“Um, then…”

 

Elise hesitantly parted her lips.

 

“Can I take a walk in the garden every day?”

 

“Whatever suits you.”

 

The answer was brief, but Elise could tell she had given the correct answer. This was because the corners of his mouth were slightly pulled to the sides.

 

Just then, a sound was heard announcing the start of the opera. Elise’s head slowly turned towards the stage.

 

Because today was the premiere, the plot was still shrouded in mystery. All that was known was that it was a love story between a man and a woman.

 

However, because the composer who wrote the opera was famous, and the actors who played the main characters were also well known, the tickets sold like hotcakes.

 

‘I’m looking forward to this. What is it about?’

 

Elise clasped her hands together and looked to the stage.

 

Although she couldn’t tell anyone, she loved watching performances at the opera. It was a taste she had no idea about until Cardale brought her along.

 

She still vividly remembers the emotion she felt when she saw an opera with him for the first time in her life.

 

Elise cherished that memory.

 

Not just because she enjoyed the performance, but also for other reasons that were drowned out by her subconscious before she knew it.

 



 

While Elise was immersed in the drama as if she was bewitched, Cardale looked at her casually.

 

Her blue eyes sparkled like stars, and her cheeks were flushed with a peach colour. A face rarely seen on Elise.

 

Cardale really liked this look on the woman’s face as much as when her eyes filled with pleasure, or her cheeks flushed with shame. So much so that he thought she was pretty even when she was not in his bed.

 

No one knew, but this was why a huge donation was sent to the opera house in Vassenberg’s name just a few days ago.

 



 

“If your love is sincere, I have nothing more to wish for. Even the birds flying in the sky bless my happiness.”

 

Elise was fascinated by the story. When the two main characters walked hand in hand or kissed for the first time under the beautiful tree, she felt excited without even realising it.

 

Then, she remembered this was the beginning of the play. Act 1, Scene 1 had not yet been completed.

 

Once she recognised that, the warm and peaceful scene seemed like the calm before the storm.

 

‘They look so happy.’

 

Elise watched their movements with an anxious heart.

 

As expected, the relationship between the two that was so happy, began to deteriorate as a small misunderstanding spread uncontrollably.

 

“I will not forgive this betrayal. There is only punishment for deception!”

 

“I was just a moment of pleasure to him. Broken promises, trampled hearts, and even the mice on the ground sing of my despair.”

 

The woman who was cruelly abandoned without knowing the reason why could not overcome her sadness and pain, throwing her body into the flowing river.

 

“Gasp…!”

 

Elise covered her mouth with both hands. People gasped for breath or sighed throughout the audience. The play continued into the next chapter.

 

“I fell into a dirty trap and lost someone dear to me. Where did we go wrong, my dear? Where are you?”

 

He tried to find her belatedly, but all the news he heard about her was hopeless.

 

‘Ah…’

 

The sound of the man sobbing as he tore out his heart in regret was so heartbreaking that Elise unconsciously placed her hand on her chest.

 

“I will not accept your death until I see you sleeping with my own eyes.”

 

Act 1 ended with the man’s song. The curtain closed on the stage, and a short intermission was given.

 

“Hah…”

 

Elise, who had been anxious and holding her chest tight the whole time she was watching, finally let out the breath she had been holding. Her heart was beating a little faster.

 

‘How is the Duke?’

 

Elise cautiously looked up at Cardale, who was sitting next to her.

 

But somehow, his atmosphere felt cooler than before. His expression seemed the same as usual, but it was strange.

 

As Elise looked at him, Cardale felt her gaze and turned to her.

 

Flinching, Elise hurriedly lowered her head, but he grabbed her chin and lifted it up.

 

“Why?”

 

Elise was unable to answer readily and hesitated because she knew he wouldn’t like it.

 

But lying or keeping quiet would only make him more angry, so she opened her mouth with difficulty.

 

“I was wondering if you were in a bad mood…”

 

“Me?”

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

Elise lowered her gaze, her silver eyelashes quivering. She could feel his eyes looking at her persistently.

 

She couldn’t bear to look at him and stuttered out.

 

“Can… Can I go to the break room for a moment?”

 

Cardale stared at Elise quietly. Then, after caressing her cheek with his hand that was holding her chin, he let go.

 

“Okay.”

 

“Okay, thank you.”

 

After receiving Cardale’s permission, Elise left the box seat.

 



 

The lone man’s eyes turned to the curtains on the stage. He suddenly returned to his expressionless face and smiled.

 

“It’s a piece of work.”

 

He only brought Elise because he liked people seeing him with his mistress in love. But for a man who doesn’t believe in love, he found this kind of story ridiculous.

 

Today’s performance was especially pathetic.

 

This was especially true in that the main character behaved foolishly, lost something, and later regretted it.

 

To Cardale Vassenberg, regret was something only weak losers felt. Whether the opponent was a person or a business, he never once failed to target his hunt.

 

That was why the man was arrogant, and therefore, was willing to laugh at the foolishness and weakness of the man in the story.

 

‘…’

 

But he couldn’t figure out why he was feeling strangely low.

 

An unpleasant sensation, as if there were a very small, invisible crack. That slight annoyance.

 

‘Annoying.’

 

Cardale stood up, roughly brushing his loose hair.

 

Then he saw the back of someone walking out another box seat on the side of the concert hall.

 

‘The author.’

 

‘Didn’t they say he was going down to the estate?’

 

Cardale’s eyes sank coldly.

 



 

The lounge was filled with gorgeously dressed women.

 

It was also a very difficult place for Elise, who was afraid of crowded places.

 

She straightened her back, pressing down on her heart, which was still beating loudly. Because Cardale told her not to appear insignificant to others.

 

She lifted her head and tugged up her chin, hiding her shaking hands by clutching a hand fan. She steeled her resolve one last time and slowly began to walk towards the lounge.

 

She was nervous that someone might start a fight or step on her.

 

But contrary to her worries, no one touched her.

 

They just noticed her and she walked away, whispering quietly among themselves.

 

Thankfully, nothing happened to Elise even after came out from checking her clothes.

 

As soon as she got out of the break room and into a less trafficked passage, she let out a sigh of relief.

 

“Thank god…”

 

She was a little shaken but okay.

 

‘I think I can do better next time. At least the Duke won’t hate me…’

 

Although it was a secret she kept to herself, Elise would look forward to the times she and Cardale would go out, like today.

 

She loved having new experiences, and she also loved the warm hand she held every time she was escorted. Only occasionally did she feel her heart flutter when he treated her affectionately.

 

That’s why she wanted to do well. She didn’t want to go against his wishes. She remembered even the smallest instructions and orders he gave her and she made sure to follow them.

 

‘If I do that, of course, I have been sold to him, but the Duke also becomes a little–’

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

Elise’s thoughts were broken by the sudden voice.

 

“…Long time no see.”

 

As soon as she raised her head, what he saw were light veridian eyes that seemed to be filled with greenery.

 

“Little Marquis Hartmann…”

 

Raymond’s face was more gaunt than when she last saw him. Moreover, he had a very distressed expression.

 

‘Why…?’

 

At that sight, the guilt she had buried for so long reared its head again. Unable to bear to face him, Elise dropped her gaze.

 

“Well… How are you doing? No, that’s not right to inquire… I’m sorry for asking this.”

 

Elise hastily shook her head.

 

She said it was her fault. She was guilty of deceiving him and lying to him from the beginning. So he deserved an apology from her.

 

“I am really sorry. Because of me, you…”

 

Raymond couldn’t even speak. Elise’s trembling voice made him feel like she was about to cry.

 

He was going to blame himself for deceiving her, but no sound came out as if his throat was clogged.

 

“I’m sorry…”

 

“No.”

 

Raymond interrupted the words she could barely get out. He spoke clearly even though his face was a mixture of pain, frustration, and sadness.

 

“Lady Elise, you have done nothing wrong to me.”

 

Raymond extended his hand towards her.

 

The tip of the man’s white, fair, calloused finger was about to touch Elise’s cheek.

 

Raymond’s arm was violently thrown away with force, making a dull crash.

 

“What business do you have with my mistress?”


Elise was startled by the eerily cold voice and raised her head.

 

The Duke, with a neutral face, was standing in front of them.

 

Raymond answered calmly.

 

“It’s been a while since I saw Lady Elise. I was asking how she was doing.”

 

“Lady, huh…”

 

Cardale’s mouth quirked up.

 

“Quite an extravagant title for a woman who serves one in the night, isn’t it?”

 

Raymond’s face contorted as if he had heard something he shouldn’t have.

 

“Duke, your words are too harsh.”

 

“What?”

 

But Cardale was nonchalant, even seeming intrigued as he glanced at Elise.

 

“The Little Marquis also has ears, so he must have heard. This woman-”

 

“Ah…!”

 

Cardale grabbed Elise’s chin and lifted it up.

 

“Lady!”

 

Cardale looked at Raymond in astonishment and continued speaking without blinking.

 

“The fact that she warms my bed every night.”

 

Elise’s face turned pale.

 

Elise’s face turned pale.

 

“What audacious behaviour is this?”

 

Raymond shouted as if he couldn’t bear it anymore.

 

“How can you treat her so carelessly? Let the Lady go, now!”

 

“What does it matter to the Little Marquis what I do with what is mine?”

 

“Your Grace!”

 

This was when Raymond moved to free Elise from Cardale’s grasp, even if by force.

 

“Please stop…!”

 

Raymond’s movements stopped at Elise’s urgent cry. His green eyes shook when he saw her.

 

“…Lady.”

 

“I’m fine. So…”

 

Elise almost cried.

 

“Please leave. Please, please…”

 

Raymond’s fists were tightly clenched. His whole body trembled with indescribable despair and helplessness.

 

Cardale looked at them as if this were ridiculous.

 

“What are you doing? Your lady is kindly asking you to leave, but you’re not granting her wish.”

 

Raymont glared fiercely at him in blatant mockery, but Elise quickly shook her head.

 

That sight tortured Raymont terribly.

 

“The Lady doesn’t deserve such treatment.”

 

The reason he finally spoke up was out of a desire to help Elise, even a little bit. But it only backfired.

 

“What an amusing remark.”

 

Cardale’s voice became cold. He ordered, letting go of his hold on Elise’s chin.

 

“Go back in first.”

 

“Oh, Duke…”

 

Elise looked up at him with a frightened face, but the answer she received was cruel.

 

“I told you not to make me repeat myself.”

 

Elise looked helplessly between Cardale and Raymond before she eventually lowered her head.

 

“…Yes.”

 

As Elise left the corridor, the raw energy that he suppressed burst straight towards Raymont.

 

It was a fierce energy, as if tens of thousands of sharp blades had been raised.

 

“Raymond Hartmann.”

 

“Ugh…”

 

Raymond fell to a knee, unable to withstand the force that threatened to crush his body. It was a force demanding submission.

 

But Cardale’s mood hardly improved. He was still overcome by a feeling of extreme discomfort.

 

‘What about this ex-fiancé?’

 

Still, there was no way for him to get upset.

 

Cardale looked down at him and sarcastically said.

 

“If she was that precious and special to you, you should have done whatever it took to have her by your side.”

 

“That’s…!”

 

“Because of your family’s opposition and because you did not get permission from your parents. Anyone can make a cowardly excuse. But.”

 

Cardale sneered coldly and lowered himself to make eye contact with Raymond.

 

“Did you really not expect Elise Schuvan to end up like this?”

 



 

Raymond’s eyes fluttered violently. Seeing that reaction, Cardale straightened up, twisting his lips as if he didn’t need an answer from him.

 

“I hope you never come close to what’s mine again. I’m very possessive, so if I see something like this again, I don’t know what kind of cruelty I’ll do to my toy.”

 

Raymont’s eyes widened. His lips trembled as if he was about to say something.

 

But realising that any wrong word from him could ultimately result in Elise paying the price, he lowered his head deeply.

 

Cardale scoffed at another pitiful weakling and turned away.

 



 

Elise was unable to see the second act of the opera and was dragged out of the theatre by Cardale by the hand.

 

As she entered the carriage, she lowered her head and said nothing. Tears naturally formed at the corners of her eyes.

 

“Look up.”

 

As the cold command that fell over her head, Elise quickly blinked to erase any traces of crying. But her colour drained faster.

 

Cardale’s eyes grew cold when he saw that her eyes were moist.

 

“Why are you crying?”

 

His questioning was relentless. Overwhelmed with fear, she couldn’t even bring herself to answer. Elise had to endure his fierce gaze as if she were a criminal, hugging her body.

 

“Because I called you my mistress to that man? Because I showed him how I treat you?”

 

Elise’s eyes grew redder. Even though she knew crying would only annoy him, the tears kept coming.

 

There were times when he said harsh things. But today, he was especially cruel, and it was hard to bear.

 

“When you came to me, begging to be taken back. Did you suddenly remember your former fiancé when you felt like you couldn’t survive?”

 

“T-that’s not…”

 

She managed to utter, but before she could deny anything further,

 

“If that were the case, you should have thought twice before offering yourself to me in the first place.”

 

His callous tone and cruel words lashed at her, leaving her reeling.

 



 

In an instant, the tears welling up in her eyes overflowed. She felt like she was swallowing a large boulder, choking her throat and rendering her speechless.

 

Elise bit her lip to stifle any sounds of sobbing. But the man who had thrust her into this humiliation pushed her even more cruelly.

 

“Why cry because you did nothing right.”

 

She hadn’t done anything right. Elise knew that. She had never done anything right in her life.

 

But whenever she heard such words, it felt like being stabbed with a dagger, piercing through her chest.

 

“I-I’m sorry…”

 

Instead of showing her emotions, Elise quickly wiped her tears with her hands. She forcibly swallowed her torment and sorrow.

 

Due to her ignoring the topic and hiding her tears, he was already angry. But he didn’t want to exacerbate the situation further.

 

“Behave wisely, Elise Schuvan.”

 

“…Yes.”

 

A heavy silence fell again.

 

The carriage rode through the dark streets and eventually stopped in front of a building. It was a luxurious restaurant operating solely on reservations.

 

“Come out.”

 

Cardale stepped down from the carriage, and extended his hand to Elise.

 

Elise’s attitude was as if nothing had happened, which made her feel even sadder. But she could never show that.

 

A staff member came to the door and escorted them to the guest room.

 

Not long after Elise sat across from Cardale, their meal was served in front of them.

 

“Please enjoy.”

 

In truth, she had no appetite. Eating seemed like it would make her sick. But not eating would also upset him.

 

‘…I have to eat somehow. At least enough so that the Duke won’t be displeased…’

 

She moved the utensils around, trying not to crunch unsightly. Fortunately, Cardale didn’t say anything even though he was eating rather slowly.

 

The main course was steak. Elise’s portion was cooked well, all the way through. She hardly ate meat with blood oozing out, so it was fortunate for her.

 

‘…Can I eat half of it?’

 

Elise tightened her grip on the knife with a worried expression.

 

Scratch-

 

The knife slipped, scraping against the plate and producing an unpleasant sound.

 

She quickly let go of the utensils and reflexively apologised.

 

“S-sorry.”

 

‘Why does it have to happen now?’

 

Elise bit her lip.

 

Of all times, Vanessa’s voice was taunting her and asking when she would ever learn to use her utensils properly. Echoing in her mind.

 

Cardale would also find herself pitiful. She was expecting cold mockery when her body trembled slightly.

 

“The weather is gloomy.”

 

Was it an illusion? Strangely enough, his voice sounded softer than before.

 

When she carefully raised her bowed head, she saw the Duke taking her plate.

 

He easily sliced the meat with the dull blade.

 

Elise stared blankly at the man’s long, white fingers. The bulging joints and the graceful, agile movements of his wrist.

 

The steak was cut neatly into even sizes in an instant. He placed the plate in front of her again.

 

‘The Duke himself…’

 

Elise looked down at the plate in front of her with a dazed expression. She felt Cardale’s gaze and quickly lifted her fork.

 

Suddenly, she noticed a stain on the back of her hand. It was from when the knife slipped earlier.

 

Elise hastily wiped away the stain, wanting to hide her ugly appearance, even just a little.


Strangely, unlike just a moment ago, her appetite began to return slowly. Elise glanced at Cardale while taking small bites of the meat.

 

He continued his meal with flawless, tidy movements. His dignified and well-organised actions were so perfect that not even the smallest flaw could be found.

 

‘Really… You seem like someone from a completely different world…’

 

The fact that she was sitting across from him, sharing the same space and having a meal with such a distant man, somehow it felt like a dream.

 

But Elise blinked and realised this was her reality.

 

“Elise, lie down.”

 



 

Before she even realised what he was saying, her head was pushed down. Just before that, she saw Cardale gripping his knife.

 

“AAAAHHH!”

 

Someone fell over with a scream through the partition. Elise’s body stiffened at the horrifying sound.

 

Something scary and terrible was happening. Her slender body, faced with extreme fear, trembled uncontrollably.

 

“Get under the table.”

 

Even in the midst of the hectic scene, his low voice pierced her ears clearly. Elise barely managed to drag her body, which was fighting her to move as intended, to hide under the table.

 

Several chairs pushed forward as if shielding her, forming a barrier between her and the long white tablecloth that stretched out to the floor.

 

“Keep your eyes closed until I say otherwise.”

 

The sound of a man stalking along was accompanied by the sound of metal scraping against each other, becoming faint.

 

Elise trembled and covered her ears. However, it could not stop the sound from coming through the cracks of her palms.

 

A short silence followed as a desperate scream erupted, along with the sound of something being hit and breaking, or being crushed and twisted.

 

Elise knew that was the silence of the dead.

 

‘Please, please…’

 

Elise curled up and prayed without realising it.

 

‘Please let nothing happen to the Duke…’ 

 

For him.

 

After an endless time that was frightening and terrifying to Elise, the chairs were finally pulled away.

 

Elise looked up with her bleary eyes to see Cardale’s face revealed through the lifted tablecloth.

 

He looked clean and without any injuries.

 

The man lightly pushed the table away from her with an indifferent expression and held out his hand to her.

 

“Come out.”

 

Elise took his hand. But her body, crumpled under the table, could not be moved.

 

As Cardale looked at the bewildered woman who didn’t know what to do, he tsked, clicking his tongue. He ran his hands down Elise’s back and under her thighs, lifting her up.

 

In his embrace, she belatedly caught a whiff of an overpowering, fishy scent filling the space.

 

The strong smell stung her nose and was extremely unpleasant. Elise’s face instantly turned pale.

 

“It’s annoying.”

 

She buried her face into his chest. Only after his heavy scent penetrated her lungs was she able to come to her senses and escape her nausea.

 

As she left the restaurant with Cardale holding her in his arms, Elise remembered that Cardale was a war hero. A direct descendant of Vassenberg, known for its history of blood and tears.

 

‘But… He saved me.’

 

Even if he did treat her gently and kindly, that was still a fact.

 

‘Just like back then…’

 

Elise recalled the day she first met Cardale. She also remembered the day a year later, when she saw him again.

 

It may not have been a big deal to him, but in her desperate moment, his favour was the only thing thrown her way.

 

Next to those memories of hers, Elise also carefully collected the comfort she felt in his arms today.

 



 

Cardale lifted the woman and frowned faintly. The body, which had hardly gained any weight, was still light.

 

Her small body was shaking like an aspen, so he took a quick look, but she didn’t seem to be hurt. And there was no blood on her face.

 

“Ugh…”

 

Elise, suddenly nauseous, covered her mouth with her small hands. Only then did he recognise the smell of blood wafting through the room.

 

Cardale grabbed the back of the woman’s head with his large hand and pressed her down, forcing her to nuzzle his chest.

 

There was no special reason. He just didn’t like the idea of her smelling other men.

 

Even if they were already corpses.

 

The woman buried her face, breathing heavily as if searching for a familiar embrace. It seemed to satisfy her.

 

Cardale himself carried her to the carriage. He needed to confine her to his space to feel reassured.

 

The woman blinked her eyes as Cardale opened the carriage door and set her on her seat. Then, she reached out towards him.

 



 

Cardale remained still as Elise carefully wiped a bloodstains from his cheek.

 

She was so delicate, as if she were a small animal licking a wound.

 

She should have been reprimanded for touching her master’s body without permission, but he didn’t want to go that far.

 

But still, he felt a pang of uneasiness. Mocking words seemed to surface due to his twisted thoughts.

 

“If you’re going to act like a baby, you shouldn’t tremble.”

 

Just hearing that single sentence caused tears to well up in her eyes. They were easily moist, like any other part of her body.

 

“You’re quite demanding.”

 

He wiped away Elise’s tears with his thumb. Blinking, moist eyelashes moved up and down. He spoke softly as he looked at himself, reflected in her gentle eyes.

 

“Go back first.”

 

“…What about the Duke?”

 

Again. Those eyes looked worried.

 

The foolishness of being scolded so much and still not coming to one’s senses was both funny and pathetic.

 

What was strange, however, was that her innocence was unaware of the topic, and seemed endearing once more.

 

“You’re incredibly audacious.”

 

He was sure she truly had no idea. As her trembling eyes met his, he brushed her cheek.

 

The softness of her skin, that he dared to covet as his own, now clung to his palm as if magnetised.

 

“Go and wait quietly.”

 

“Yes…”

 

Her compliant response pleased him. Cardale withdrew and closed the carriage door.

 

The carriage departed straight for the Duke’s residence.

 

Only after the carriage had completely disappeared into the darkness, did he turn around. His subordinates were already bustling about.

 

While Cardale was covering Elise’s eyes, the troops under his command had already taken control of the surrounding area and sealed off the building, preventing entry and exit.

 

By now, they would have roughly assessed the situation.

 

“Your Grace.”

 

At that moment, Michael approached and bowed before Cardale. His expression betrayed a hint of confusion.

 

“The captured assassin-“

 

Cardale raised his hand to stop him.

 

“No one was captured. They’ve all been dealt with.”

 

Michael paused. It was quite different from his lord’s usual way of doing things.

 

There would usually be one or two captured alive for interrogation purposes, to extract information about their employers. 

 

But this time, all the assassins were eliminated.

 

Michael remembered that the bodies were not in very clean condition. He was certain their deaths hadn’t been comfortable.

 

However, instead of showing his concern, he continued his report.

 

“From the examination of the bodies, it appears that they were highly skilled assassins. They had poison concealed beneath their tongues.”

 

At the report implying that even if they were captured alive, they would have chosen death, Cardale grimaced.

 

“If they were sent by the Princess, it would be embarrassing if their skills were lacking.”

 

Michael’s eyes widened in shock and surprise.

 

He quickly looked around, lowered his voice, and asked. For an ordinary noble, this would have been a very dangerous statement.

 

“Are you saying that the person behind this is the Princess?”

 

“The target of the attack was Elise Schuvan.”

 

Cardale confirmed without blinking.

 

“The target of the attack was Elise Schuvan. My observation has led me to believe that the Emperor, having heard about her, might have tried to persuade the Princess to give up on me. Yet she moved faster than I expected, seemingly anticipating our actions.”

 

“Your Excellency, to accuse a member of the Imperial family, there must be solid evidence. Otherwise, it may backfire…”

 

“I have someone keeping an eye on the Princess.”

 

Cardale further explained for his assistant, who still didn’t fully understand the situation.

 

“By now, my operatives should have ambushed the assassins.”

 

In an instant, a cold chill spread down Michael’s spine. He swallowed dryly.

 

‘No way, my lord… Did you know that the Princess would target the Lady?’

 

‘So what, was today’s accident also a trap deliberately set up by the Duke?’

 

A chill ran down his spine.

 

“Well, perhaps it’s for the best. We might have the opportunity to deal with the Princess sooner than I thought.”

 

Michael realised how the Duke had planned to use Elise Schuvan from the very day they had met.

 

‘If Lady Schwan was used as a chess piece to deal with Princess Teresia…’ 

 

‘She would soon outlive her usefulness.’

 

And the lord was ruthless towards those whose value had expired.

 

‘But now that the Lady has become a target of the Princess. It might be difficult to guarantee her safety without protection.’

 

Michael asked, feeling his mouth go dry.

 

“…Your Excellency, does this mean you intend to send Lady Schuvan back to the Schuvan Estate?”


Blood-red eyes stared sharply at Michael, then he slowly opened his lips.

 

“No.”

 

At least not now.

 

Aside from the purpose of defeating Princess Theresia, Elise was still useful in other ways. At least she had enough value to him as entertainment.

 

“Increase Elise’s security.”

 

So, the reason Cardale looked after the woman’s safety was so his enjoyment would not be interrupted.

 

Anything that was useful needed to be nurtured and cared for.

 

“Even inside the mansion, she is not allowed to be alone and must have two or more escorts.”

 

There might be a spy involved. So there was some ambiguity in what he added.

 

Although they may be ordinary employees within the mansion, the guards directly under the Duke were subject to rigorous screening once a month. It was very difficult for a spy to mix in.

 

In any case, his worries about Elise Schuvan’s safety were in vain, as Michael ended up opening his mouth without realising it.

 

“What is that expression?”

 

“Ah… No.”

 

He wondered if his lord’s treatment was excessive, but quickly shook off his impious thoughts. It would have been fortunate if Lady Schuvan was safe.

 

Meanwhile, Cardale was taken aback by his aide’s strange reaction, but did not press further.

 

“Let’s finish this quickly.”

 

After completing the investigation, his operatives seeped into the darkness again. Just then, soldiers from the security forces received the report and rushed over.

 

“All the assassins have been dealt with, so there won’t be much danger.”

 

“Yes, thank you, Your Grace!”

 

The security guards bowed respectfully then stampeded into the building.

 

“I have horses at the ready nearby.”

 

Cardale slightly nodded his head at Michael’s report, and walked the distance.

 

“…Buy!”

 

He turned his head at the young voice, Cardale saw a boy standing on the side of the road. The boy made a trumpet with his hand and was shouting hard at the passers-by.

 

“Buy flowers! These are fresh flowers that were just picked!”

 

Cardale stared at the rough wooden box in front of the boy and the red roses inside.

 

His eyes deepened a little.

 



 

After taking a bath with warm water, Elise sat in front of the dressing table. Linda asked, gently brushing her long hair.

 

“Did you enjoy the opera?”

 

For a moment, Elise paused, but then nodded her head and answered.

 

“Yes…”

 

Elise couldn’t bear to tell her the truth. She lowered her head, fiddling with her fingers. Her worries made her feel uneasy.

 

‘Is he okay…?’

 

Just when she was relieved that her mind had been relieved, she heard him yell at her for being arrogant.

 

‘Still… He didn’t seem angry.’

 

Just before she left, Elise tried to think positively, remembering the man’s calm face.

 

“Is the Lady inside?”

 

At that time, Elise’s ears perked up when she heard Michael’s voice outside.

 

“I will go out and take a look.”

 

Linda put down the comb on the dresser and went out into the living room, which was connected to the bedroom.

 

A few words seemed to be exchanged between them, before Linda came back into the room. In her arms was a beautiful bouquet of red roses.

 

Elise’s eyes widened as Linda explained with a smile on her face.

 

“I guess Sir Walter bought these from the flower children. He is someone who often does good things.”

 

Linda brought a vase, filled it with water, and placed the roses in it. After that, she put Elise to bed and told her to rest in peace, before leaving.

 

Elise, left alone, approached the roses on the nightstand by the bed. The flowers were moist and shiny as if they were just picked.

 

“Pretty…”

 

She admired it and gently touched the petals of a rose with the tips of her fingers. She even tried to smell it sneakily. 

 

There was a faint floral scent. As if she was walking on a cliff, her anxious mind seemed to relax a little.

 

‘Sir Michael looks blunt on the outside, but it’s surprising that he has such a kind side.’

 

Elise, smiling without realising it, suddenly remembered someone.

 

‘If Sir Michael has returned… Has the Duke also returned home?’

 

Moving with her small feet, she headed to the window.

 

She opened the window, and the early summer night breeze blew inside. The lukewarm air was somehow more humid than before, it clung to her skin.

 

However, Elise did not notice the change in the weather. All her attention was focused on the outside world.

 

“He’s back.”

 

She could see the Duke’s bedroom light on. Elise approached the window without realising it. She leaned her arms on the window sill, laid her head down, and looked at the yellow light.

 

She suddenly wondered how the opera would have ended.

 

Did the woman who threw herself into the river live? What happened to the man she left alone? If they were reunited miraculously, then…

 

A drop of water fell on her cheek.

 

Rumble!

 

Suddenly, the sky cried. The sound of thunder, like always, brought about a terrible fear. Before she could escape, her body stiffened.

 

What followed was the moment her blue eyes were swallowed by darkness.

 

A long shower of rain began to fall.

 



 

A loud, cackling laughter hit her ears.

 

Elise shed tears as she felt her throat being forced shut. Even then, she could see the Countess’s happy face as clearly.

 

“Now that pest is dead.”

 

Her strange smile had a look of madness on her face.

 

‘Help me… Anyone is welcome, please…’

 

As her consciousness faded, little Elise desperately prayed.

 

She missed her mother. She wanted to live. Her life was truly insignificant but she still wanted to feel a little more of the warm sunlight, the grace of a gentle breeze, and the touch of wildflowers tickling her fingers.

 

The child who could not give up on her life was in the midst of her last struggle to survive.

 

Bang!

 

The door to the living room of the terrace opened as if the wall would break with it, and soldiers came in. Then Gerhard Schuvan appeared.

 

“Count, Count…!”

 

Those holding down Elise hastily released their hands and backed away.

 

The child, who had just regained her freedom, made strangled noises as she stuck her fingers down her throat.

 

Ugh, the sight of her vomiting up what she ate to survive was even more gruesome. However, the Count’s gaze at Elise was indifferent.

 

Gerhard’s eyes turned to the Countess as he passed the child indifferently.

 

“Where did you hide Marissa?”

 

That was his only question. He had a calm expression, not unlike someone who was interrogating someone.

 

“How would I know that?”

 

The Countess dropped her pretence, but Gerhard gave orders without even pretending to listen.

 

“Find her.”

 

“Yes!”

 

Soldiers began searching the living room. The space had been decorated to the Countess’s elegant taste, and was instantly turned into a wasteland.

 

When they searched her private bedroom, the Countess screamed in a trembling voice.

 

“What is this? You can’t do this!”

 

Then when she thought she couldn’t do anything else, she stood in front of the dressing room. That meant only one thing.

 

“No one can go in here.”

 

The soldiers could not easily step in front of the hostess, so Gerhard took action himself. Walking slowly before standing in front of his wife.

 

“Get out of the way.”

 

“Why? What can you do if I killed a filthy bitch?”

 



 

Gerhard looked at her with his dry gaze, as if he were looking at a stone, then slowly lowered himself. Terrible words poured from between lips pressed close to her ear.

 

“Do you think my wife will be satisfied if I decide to have children with another woman my wife hates so much?”

 

The Countess’ face turned pale. For a moment, she was overcome with anger and let out a roar like scream.

 

“How dare you, how dare you…!”

 

But Gerhard did not even blink.

 

“Wasn’t this a marriage for mutual benefit? I remember the contract between our families was properly kept.”

 

The Countess was unable to respond. Even though her body was shaking with rage, she stormed past him and out of her room.

 

She entered the dressing room as if the soldiers were waiting for her. Soon after, Marissa was found, locked in a closet.

 

“Count, we found her!”

 

Marissa’s body was bound with rope, her mouth gagged.

 

Her swollen cheeks and bloody body gave a clear idea of the one-sided violence she must have endured.

 

The soldiers hastily unfastened the ropes and gag that bound the woman.

 

A moment later, when Gerhard came out holding Marissa, the child recognised her mother and opened her eyes in shock.

 

“Uh, mother…”

 

Elise stretched out her hand toward her mother, trying to drag her motionless body as she lay face down.

 

“Mother…”

 

Then Marissa, hearing her daughter’s voice even through her dim consciousness, opened her eyes.


Marissa realised what happened when she saw her daughter lying on the ground, vomit around her, and food spilled on the floor.

 

‘My child…’

 

Her daughter, her child that she didn’t want to lose. The precious being she had been protecting like her own life, was dying.

 

“…Count.”

 

Marissa called out to Gerhard in a faint voice, holding the hem of his clothes pitifully.

 

“Please. Please save Elise…”

 

She saw the cold look on her master’s face. To Gerhard, there was no need to kill Elise himself, but she was also an illegitimate child with no worth to him alive.

 

“Please… I’ll do anything you ask of me, please, please…”

 

Tears fell from Marisa’s eyes. She begged, rubbing her cheek against his chest despite not being able to move properly.

 

Gerhard looked down at his mistress, who couldn’t let go of her lingering affection for her daughter even though she looked like she was dying herself, and then answered dryly.

 

“That promise is something you must never forget, Marissa.”

 



 

Elise suffered from a severe fever.

 

She lost consciousness and woke up again countless times. It was difficult, painful, and heartbreaking.

 

However, whenever she regained consciousness, she could see her mother’s blurry face. So she was relieved.

 

After several days of waking and falling asleep like that, she finally pushed past the severe fever.

 

When Elise opened her eyes, she was on a bed. She seemed to have been asleep for a long time, but her consciousness slowly returned, and she heard someone talking.

 

“Her fever has gone down, and her breathing has stabilised. So she will wake up soon.”

 

“Thank you, thank you so much…”

 

Elise’s ears perked up at Marissa’s faint voice. Her mother was safe. Lucky for her, this wasn’t a dream.

 

“But her body was so damaged by the poison. It is difficult to predict what may become a problem later…”

 

“What do you mean? What’s the problem…?”

 

“Her body is not healthy anymore…”

 

Elise couldn’t really hear what was said next because her mother started to cry.

 

Elise didn’t know why Marissa was crying, but she knew it was because of her. Marissa’s cries were so desperate and sorrowful that her heart ached.

 

So much so that she whimpered involuntarily.

 

“Elise…!”

 

Marisa, hearing her child’s voice, hurriedly approached Elise’s bed. She held her disoriented daughter in her arms and whispered to her over and over again.

 

“I’m sorry. Mother is sorry…”

 

‘No, Mother. Don’t apologise.’

 

Elise couldn’t say anything and just shed tears.

 

It was all her fault. She was the reason her mother was so sad, the reason she was beaten until she was covered in blood, the reason she had to kneel and beg the Count every time she saw him.

 

‘Rather…’

 

The Countess’ devilish whisper. The words, “If only you would die, then your mother can live,” kept coming back to her mind.

 

‘It would be better if someone like me had never been born…’

 

The Countess said her mother would have been free. She wouldn’t have had to live in pain and misery like this.

 

‘I’m sorry, Mother…’

 

‘I’m sorry. I’m sorry. Please don’t cry because of me.’

 

Elise prayed and prayed again. Tears welled up between her tightly closed eyes and flowed endlessly down her cheeks.

 

‘Don’t cry, Mother.’

 

Elise thought she should have just taken the poison and died… Just to make sure she had no regrets.

 



 

Cardale, who had just left the shower, narrowed his eyes as he tied the laces of his gown. He felt a subtle uneasiness that he couldn’t explain.

 

Moreover, he was unusually annoyed and in a foul mood.

 

His plan to trap the Princess using Elise Schuvan as bait was successful. It had gone perfectly, but he couldn’t figure out why he was so upset.

 

‘Is it because they eliminated all the assassins?’

 

He originally planned to keep one or two alive to use as witnesses, but that plan was scrapped.

 

By the time he came to his senses, he had already driven his sword through the heart of the last assassin.

 

He was a man who maintained a level head even in the midst of fierce battle with his enemy, Helmut. It wasn’t like him to lose his composure over something like this.

 

‘Everything is bothering me.’

 

Cardale crossed his room, roughly running his fingers through his hair. His eyes unconsciously looked somewhere outside the window.

 

Not far from his bedroom was the room where the woman stayed.

 

Cardale’s eyebrows twitched as he felt himself naturally checking that direction.

 

The window was open even though rain was pouring inside.

 

Instead of calling a servant, the man left the room himself. His steps down the hallway were faster and rougher than usual. He quickly reached the woman’s door and opened it.

 



 

Slightly squinted red eyes slowly scanned the room.

 

All the candles had long since gone out from the wind and rain. The table was clean, and the bed was made with no traces of anyone having used them.

 

He didn’t feel any other presence, as if the room was empty. There was only the sound of falling rain and the windows rattling.

 

“Ah…”

 

His ears were quick to pick up a small, muffled sob. Cardale turned his head towards the sound.

 

Under the desk.

 

He reached it in just a few steps.

 

“I’m sorry. I’m sorry…”

 

A faint plea was coming from below. He yanked the chair out from under the desk in one go.

 

Then, he saw a woman with her body crumpled and crying desperately. Her wet, blurred eyes looked up at him.

 

“Someone told me to stay here.”

 

“Huh…”

 

The woman was desperately covering her ears with her hands as her body trembled pathetically.

 

Like she was hearing the scariest sound in the world.

 

Cardale glanced at the open windows.

 

Click, click

 

He closed all the windows and shutters, drawing the curtains and reducing the noise to less than half it was before.

 

He bent down to one knee and stretched out his hand toward his Elise.

 

“Come out.”

 

Her small body snuggled into his arms like a child seeking warmth.

 

Cardale pressed one of the woman’s ears to his chest and covered her other ear with his large hand. His other arm supported her lower thigh and lifted her up.

 

“Your, Your Excellency…”

 

“Yes.”

 

Elise clung to him as if he were her only salvation.

 

Instead of brushing away the delicate hand tightly gripping the collar of his robe, Cardale walked towards the bed.

 

But before he could take more than a few steps, Elise’s body slumped. Her limp form felt warm against him.

 

The man’s grip on her tightened urgently. He turned towards the hastily arriving guards and ordered,

 

“Call the doctor. Right Now.”

 



 

Cardale looked down at the woman.

 

It wasn’t long before her erratic breathing became even. But her fever was still rising and falling.

 

His fingers brushed across the transparent and delicate woman’s cheek. He could feel the heat even at his fingertips.

 

“Mother…”

 

At the words that flowed from Elise’s lips, Cardale’s hand stopped.

 

That was something new.

 

Didn’t he know the circumstances that the woman was handed over to him from the beginning?

 

He willingly took advantage of this weakness to manipulate her.

 

He made it impossible for her to resist him by asking her if she knew how much money he had invested in her father. He was able to get everything he wanted from the woman just by throwing around a light threat of returning her to the Count.

 

The submission thus achieved was clearly satisfactory. He had to be satisfied.

 

But why was he feeling so low? Why was he feeling uncomfortable?

 

Cardale was silent for a moment from a question that came to mind.

 

“Save me… please…”

 

The woman wandering through her hellish dream suddenly threw her hands in the air. Suddenly, Cardale grabbed her hand. It happened instinctively.

 

He felt the touch of her delicate hand in his. Small, soft, and warm from the fever.

 

Ah, was it because of this?

 

Thanks to this realisation, he found his answer.

 

How could he not feel low when the woman, meant for his pleasure and enjoyment, lay sick in bed, neglecting her duties?

 

How could he not feel uncomfortable when the woman, who should be warming his bed, instead occupied it and inconvenienced her master?

 

The man concluded that all of these feelings were natural, and was satisfied with his judgement.

 

“Uh…”

 

He put a little pressure on the hand wrapped in his hand. As if to make his presence known.

 

Not long after, Elise fell into a restless sleep.

 

As peace finally returned to her face, free from her nightmare, Cardale blew out the remaining candle by the bedside.

 

The white cheeks, flickering in the shadow of the dying candlelight, before being immersed in the quiet night.

 

“…Mother…”

 

His eyes darkened. Embracing the darkness of a terrible past like a rotten swamp.

Actually, he didn’t understand Elise Schuvan’s attachment to her mother.

 

For a man who hated the one who gave birth to him, it was always jarring.

 

“Once again, you’ve brought lowly individuals into our bedroom. How long do you plan to continue this behaviour?”

 

The previous Duke and Duchess of Vassenberg fought often. It was hard to remember a day when they didn’t argue.

 

One would rage while the other would nonchalantly carry out their duties.

 

The Duke reacted only once. When Victoria, the Duchess, could no longer control herself. The Duke declared that he would have a mistress.

 

“If you want to regret it until the day you die, why don’t you give it a try too?”

 

Victoria’s anger, with her hands tied, naturally directed itself towards the weaker party.

 

To someone who looked just like her husband, but had less power than him.

 

That was a day like any other.

 

The Duke brought his mistress for the night as usual, and the Duchess behaved viciously. Like always he ignored her, and she was furious.

 

The reason young Cardale caught Victoria’s eye was simply because he was so unlucky.

 

She clutched her son’s arm with one hand and held a hunting gun with the other.

 

“Do you want to run away? Far away?”

 

The child ran as fast as he could with his short legs. Otherwise, the bullets fired from her gun will penetrate him.

 

Victoria laughed as she watched him desperately struggle. The voice that flowed from between her lips was laced with venom.

 

“Damn Vassenberg.”

 

It was only later that Cardale found out that even if he had not run away, Victoria would not have been able to kill him.

 

Because Cardale was Vassenberg’s only direct descendant.

 

With his appearance he inherited from his lineage, and the outstanding characteristics and qualities he showed from an early age, he was guaranteed a solid position as a Little Duke from an early age.

 

For Victoria, Cardale was the child of her hated husband, but at the same time he was the only saving grace for her as a duchess.

 

Of course, it would be difficult if something went wrong. Threatening to shoot him was ultimately a means of expressing her anger towards the Duke.

 

Knowing this, the Duke also neglected his son’s affairs.

 

The same thing was repeated whenever the Duke brought a woman into their bedroom, or that woman then changed to someone else, or the husband and his wife raised their voices and fought.

 

The gruelling event ended with Cardale deliberately getting shot by Victoria. But now, he was no longer a helpless child.

 

The Duke did not take kindly to the injury of his heir. He cut off all support he had given Victoria to maintain her dignity.

 

Even though Victoria cried and begged, it was no use.

 

However, he overlooked the lengths his wife would go to for her greed and desire for power.

 

“Little Duke.”

 

When a naked woman first climbed onto his bed. Cardale, having shed his boyish demeanour, couldn’t help but let out a bitter laugh.

 

There were so many people aiming to become the next duchess.

 

Victoria conducted secret dealings with them.

 

None of them succeeded in their intentions, but it was enough to instil a habit in Cardale.

 

From then on, he began to drink a strong contraceptive potion every day.

 



 

So, he was bothered by Elise Schuvan from the beginning.

 

To not give up on a sickly mother with nothing else to offer or present as a benefit.

 

As she struggled to survive through life like traversing mud, she even threw her life into a position where she was pushed to the edge of a cliff.

 

To a man who thought that blood ties and natural relationships were useless, a woman who gave up her life to clinging to her mother’s life seemed both foolish and naive.

 

‘You…’

 

In a dark room without even moonlight, Cardale quietly stared at the sleeping Elise. Still holding the woman’s small hand.

 

‘How much can you endure?’

 

‘Truly, even when pushed to the limit. Until body and soul completely crumble and fall apart, would you still hold on?’

 

Like the pure white deer, he saw that day.

 



 

In Cardale’s imagination, Elise was broken countless times. Shattered and defiled.

 

When the crying eyes would look at him, he would raise a blood-soaked hunting rifle and aim it at her.

 

Now, All he had to do was pull the trigger.

 

After that, this woman, like his numerous trophies, will forever remain as nothing more than a stuffed animal in his memory.

 

Not bad, Cardale thought. He preferred things to be fixed without deviating from his calculations, and the woman stuffed in his head would remain unchanging.

 

But oddly enough, when he tried to execute it, something would get stuck. As if there was a lock on the trigger.

 

It was still the same now.

 

Cardale’s eyes narrowed as he sensed that unfamiliar and uncomfortable sensation.

 

Though he didn’t want to dismiss the discomfort entirely, it was a peculiar feeling.

 

He slowly stroked the woman’s hand he held tightly, lost in thought.

 

No matter how well he preserved it, the fur of a dead animal was bound to become stiff. A body that lost its warmth and became cold was neither soft nor warm like this.

 

Cardale revised his thoughts.

 

She can’t possibly be as pretty as she is alive. So he would have to keep her around a little longer. It was enough to ruin her later.

 

His eyes darkened.

 



 

Elise, half-conscious, blinked her eyes. Her memory was vague.

 

Linda combed her hair, then she put the roses in a vase, she saw the light in the Duke’s bedroom, it was pouring rain, she hid under the desk, and…

 

“Ah…”

 

She let out a sigh. Elise remembered the one who appeared as her saviour.

 

Bright red eyes that shone red like the sun and the firm, strong arms that held her.

 

Her vision became clearer. The pattern on the ceiling was familiar, but this wasn’t her bedroom.

 

Elise slowly lifted her body. She was a little dizzy, but not so much that she couldn’t sit up against the head of the bed.

 

‘Did the Duke bring me here?’

 

It must have been uncomfortable. He gave her his bed even though they weren’t spending the night together.

 

“Maybe…”

 

‘Did he take care of me?’

 

However, she didn’t dare to let out those thoughts that did not fit into her status and worth, so they were eaten away.

 

It was then that the door opened with a click.

 

Cardale entered the room, noticed Elise awake, and stopped dead in his tracks.

 

Then he came straight towards her. He was not in any hurry, but he did not intentionally delay himself.

 

His large hand covered Elise’s forehead for a moment, and then pulled away.

 

“You still have a fever.”

 

Elise looked up at him. The face of a man was indifferent, cold, and sometimes scary because his thoughts were unknown.

 

But he closed the window against the heavy rain and covered her ears to block out the thunder. The illusion of hell created by the pouring rain was immediately erased.

 

Elise pursed her lips. She wanted to convey her feelings, but she couldn’t think of what to say.

 

Thus, from the depths of her heart, she mustered a familiar phrase, one that had become as ingrained in her as the sun rising and setting.

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

“What?”

 

“For bothering you…”

 

“Then you shouldn’t have been hurt.”

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

It was a repeat performance. Elise lowered her head, feeling her woeful lack of eloquence.

 

Her fingers holding the blanket twitched nervously. When she suddenly realised what she was doing, she startled and stopped her movements.

 

‘Another thing I haven’t learned to do.’

 

Elise grabbed the blanket again tightly. 

 

‘Please don’t be stupid this time, say anything.’

 

“Uh, Duke.”

 

He didn’t urge her further. That strangely gave her courage. Elise cleared her throat and carefully parted her lips.

 

“Thank you for saving me at the restaurant. And for caring for me afterwards.”

 

Her silent gaze turned to Cardale. It was still difficult to meet his eyes, but she held the contact. She wanted to convey her sincerity.

 

“I’m really grateful.”

 

For a moment, he seemed taken aback by her words. It seemed like he appreciated it, yet there was also a hint of embarrassment. But it passed so quickly that Elise thought she might have misread him.

 



 

Cardale’s hand touched Elise’s face.

 

Elise slowly closed her eyes as she felt his hand caressing her cheek. A man’s voice, sounding more muffled than before, flowed into her ears.

 

“If that’s how you feel, then you should get better quickly and start thinking about doing your duty.”

 

“I will…”

 

Something warm and gentle touched her forehead briefly.

 

Elise trembled but kept her eyes closed. This time, the same touch landed on her closed eyelids.

 

Then it moved to her nose, her cheeks, and finally her lips.

 

When Elise slightly parted her lips, their mouths interlocked even more deeply. His hands firmly held the back of her head and her waist, pulling her closer.

 

Elise willingly opened her body to Cardale, whom she had become accustomed to and felt a sense of comfort. 

 

Somehow, it seemed like his body emitted a scent of rich roses.


“Why on earth are you replacing windows that are still in good condition?”

 

The young worker shook his head with an expression of complete incomprehension.

 

An older worker answered in a low voice as he inserted thick glass plates into the newly assembled lattice frame.

 

“They want thicker glass installed, that’s why.”

 

“But why? There are no broken ones, and they’re not dirty.”

 

“Do you understand the whims of the upper class? As long as we get paid well, it doesn’t matter to us. Stop with the pointless chatter and focus on the job!”

 

Michael passed by the workers who were busy working again.

 

He glanced at the room where the window replacement was in progress then headed straight to the Duke’s office.

 

To report to his lord quickly.

 

“This is the evidence recovered from the assassins’ hideout.”

 

As Michael placed a stack of documents on the desk, Cardale’s long fingers began to leaf through them carefully.

 

There were secretly written contracts and details of funds flowing from the Princess’s personal safe.

 

“It seems the Princess went through several rounds of laundering to make it look like they had no connection with the assassins…”

 

“The other side must have left evidence intentionally.”

 

There were many cases where, if something went wrong, a person would cut off their tail. Or even if a request were completed safely, the liability would be eliminated to silence them.

 

Considering that the Princess was the client this time, it was a precise assumption that these safety measures were hidden away as part of their agreement.

 

Cardale checked the documents and pursed his lips in satisfaction.

 

“This should suffice.”

 

Somehow, Michael’s spine chilled at the jagged smile.

 

He dared to assert that it was impossible for the Princess to escape this trap. The net woven by the Duke was excessively tight for that.

 

Although he was familiar with the ruthless and meticulous ways of the Duke in handling matters like these. This time felt particularly merciless.

 

‘Is it because it’s related to Lady Schuvan?’

 

Michael remembered the one who had been staying in the Duke’s bedroom for several days after the attack.

 

She was receiving the utmost care from the employees, including the head maid Linda and the butler Norman. Even after her body recovered, the doctor examined her once a day.

 

‘She suffered from a severe fever, so it’s understandable…’

 

However, Michael was just curious that the Duke, who had used Elise Schuvan without hesitation, was paying such close attention to her health.

 

Wasn’t he a man who was cold and cruel to his mistress? But at times like this, it felt like He was dealing with a lover.

 

Michael felt confused by his master’s contradictory behaviour.

 

“You seem to have room for other thoughts.”

 

Michael suddenly came to his senses when he heard a cold voice. He straightened himself and replied.

 

“No, Your Grace. My apologies.”

 

As the Duke’s sharp gaze swept over him, Michael stiffened his posture.

 

Fortunately, Cardale looked away from him and gave an order.

 

“Request an audience with the Emperor.”

 



 

Theresia paced up and down her room, biting her fingernails nervously.

 

“It will be fine. They are all dead, so there’s no need to worry about being revealed…”

 

She tried to rationalise, but she couldn’t help still feeling anxious.

 

“He boasted about their skills being the best…!”

 

Theresia expressed her anger as she remembered the face of the leader of the assassins who made such brash claims. But there was no use in her being angry at someone who had already taken their last breath.

 

“I’m sorry, Your Royal Highness.”


“It’s fine, the problem is that the assassins were incompetent. That’s not your fault.”

 

Dietrich, kneeled as he apologised, but Theresia shook her head and continued.

 

“As long as the mastermind isn’t revealed, we’re fine. After recuperating for a while we can…”

 

It was then.

 

“Your Royal Highness, an attendant has arrived from the Emperor’s palace.”

 

Theresia’s eyes were shaken by the news her lady-in-waiting, Lady Rosenthal, delivered.

 

The fact that the Emperor’s servant came to visit her without any warning could not mean anything good.

 

“This is an order from His Majesty the Emperor to join the throne room.”

 

“You mean right now?”

 

“Yes. His Majesty seemed urgent.”

 

A sudden and urging call. Theresia sensed that a problem had arisen in her plans.

 

“Why would he call me so suddenly?”

 

“I do not know the details.”

 

The attendant bowed his head in a polite manner as he answered.

 

Theresia was lost in her thoughts, biting her lip.

 

‘Could it be…’

 

“Your Royal Highness.”

 

Dietrich called anxiously, but drowned in her anxieties, Theresia did not hear him.

 

‘I guess I have no choice but to go.’

 

She needed to know the situation precisely. Planning countermeasures would have to come later.

 

Theresia followed the attendant out of her palace. When she reached the door to the throne room, she deliberately puffed out her chest and straightened her back.

 

She stepped inside with confidence as if there was nothing that could stop her.

 



 

But the mask she had worked so hard to maintain shattered as soon as she saw the man in the throne room.

 

‘Cardale Vassenberg?’

 

Theresia’s eyes widened in surprise.

 

She had almost expected to be questioned about her connection to the assassins. But she never thought the Duke would come to visit personally.

 

The Emperor’s expression was serious, as if proving that the situation was properly screwed up beyond her expectations. Even Crown Prince Marius was by his side.

 

Theresia barely managed to gather her shattered composure and bowed her head as she curtsied.

 

“I greet His Majesty the Emperor-”

 

“Theresia von Oldenhilt.”

 

But Johann cut her off before she could properly greet him.

 

“Is what the Duke said true?”

 

“I don’t know what you’re talking about, Father.”

 

Theresia answered calmly. She was a princess and the only direct descendant of the Oldenhilt royal family—a successor with legitimacy.

 

‘I’m sure they destroyed the evidence. So I don’t have to worry…’

 

But her comfort did not last long after something Cardale said.

 

“Didn’t Her Royal Highness send an assassin to me?”

 

Theresia narrowed her brows.

 

‘Send an assassin to the Duke? What is this…?’

 

As she quickly pondered, a rough outline of the situation formed in her mind.

 

It was clear she had orchestrated the attack for Elise Schuvan in an attempt to separate her from Cardale. Yet he pretended that the attack had been for him.

 

‘It looks like he’s trying to get me to confess by trying to trick me, but that’s too simple.’

 

Theresia quickly composed herself and replied.

 

“Why would I do something like that? Especially for a man I have feelings for.”

 

“Wasn’t it retaliation for the Duke not reciprocating your feelings?”

 

The person who intervened was Marius. Theresia responded, gritting her teeth mentally.

 

“How could you treat your only sister like this? I’m disappointed, brother.”

 

“Are you going to keep insisting, even though the evidence is this strong?”

 

Evidence? Theresia’s heart sank at her brother’s words. Marius approached her and handed her a stack of documents.

 

“See it with your own eyes.”

 

Theresia took the papers with trembling hands. Her eyes quickly read the first page, then quickly flipped through the rest.

 

‘…This can’t be happening!’

 

Theresia’s mind went blank at the evidence thrust before her eyes. Cardale’s low voice reached her ears.

 

“We cannot just ignore this incident. I will hold you accountable.”

 

“Don’t be ridiculous!”

 

Theresia’s reason was suddenly lost.

 

“I was trying to kill that woman! You know that, too!”

 

Cardale didn’t bat an eye as she retorted.

 

“Are you asking me to believe that you sent so many assassins just to eliminate a mere illegitimate mistress?”

 

Theresia found herself speechless.

 

It was a lie. Cardale Vassenberg was lying. Still, she couldn’t find anything to say in response.

 

Meanwhile, Cardale turned to the Emperor and brought out his demands.

 

“There are two options I will accept, Your Majesty.”

 

A low voice echoed through the quiet throne room.

 

“Either we proceed with a formal trial for this matter, or I can officiate Her Highness’s marriage.”

 

“Wait, what…”

 

Cardale continued without even looking at the shocked Theresia.

 

“If His Majesty agrees to pursue a marriage agreement with foreign royals for Her Highness, I will refrain from further involving myself.”

 

“Who decided that!?”

 

Theresia, barely able to come to her senses, shouted.

 

“Let’s have a trial then! I’ll prove my innocence!”

 

“By what means?”

 

The Emperor could not stand it any longer, as he yelled and stood up.

 

“What do you think will happen if rumours spread that the Princess intended to harm a war hero? The reputation of Oldenhilt will be drug through the mud, and you won’t be able to find a decent suitor. And a trial? Do you think you can defend against the Duke?”

 

Before Theresia could respond, the Emperor gave a decisive answer to Cardale.

 

“I promise you. Once the social season of this year is over, you will no longer see the Princess in the Empire.”

 

“Father!”

 

Theresia screamed, but no one in the room even glanced her way.

 

Soon, the Princess’s engagement was widely announced.


It was a sudden engagement announcement.

 

The Nodrat social circle was astonished.

 

Since the Princess’s betrothed was not the Duke of Vassenberg, but an entirely unexpected person.

 

“He’s the second prince of the Rosild Empire, isn’t he? It’s not surprising considering the deep friendship between the two empires, but…”

 

“Originally, it was a public secret that the Princess wanted to marry the Duke of Vassenberg. What could have happened?”

 

“Well, it must be because of the Duke…”

 

However, the news of the Princess’s engagement didn’t stay the centre of attention for long.

 

The days were getting hotter.

 

In the middle of summer, Inghel boasted a very scorching sun, which led to a lull in social events and gatherings.

 

Nobles and wealthy merchants had already left for resort cities or villas with nicer weather.

 

Even in that excited and bustling atmosphere, the Duke of Vassenberg went about his business as usual.

 

This was because the Duke, who had always returned to his estate, stayed in the empire this year.

 

He was busy, and so was his subordinate Michael. The Duke’s informants frequently came and went from the mansion, appearing silently and disappearing without a sign.

 

The employees of the Duke’s mansion just kept doing their jobs in silence, remembering the mansion’s strict rules for being careful of what they said.

 



 

Elise opened her eyes in Cardale’s arms.

 

The air was humid since it had been raining for several days.

 

But the sound of the rain was barely audible. Not even a flash of lightning could pierce the dark curtains on her window.

 

The only indicator of the weather was the extremely humid air in the bedroom.

 

Maybe it wasn’t just because of the rain.

 

Elise flinched as Cardale tightened his arms around her. A languid voice filled her ears.

 

“Are you awake?”

 

“For a moment…”

 

The sensation of their bodies pressing together so seamlessly was intoxicating. Feeling his bare skin touching hers made Elize squirm with embarrassment, unconsciously recoiling.

 

“Why are you squirming like this?”

 

Cardale propped up his body on his elbows and looked down at her.

 

Under the light of the candles, colourful flowers were blooming all over the woman’s body that he had lusted after all night.

 

“Is it because you want to do more than this?”

 

“Huh…!”

 

As Cardale began to massage her breasts gently, Elize hurriedly shook her head.

 

“No, no…”

 

She murmured, hastily grabbing his arms. In the past, he might have scolded her for daring to touch her master’s body without permission, but not anymore.

 

“You’re already awake, so maybe it wasn’t enough.”

 

“Really, it’s not… Anng!”

 

As his member, already swollen and hard, pushed against her inner walls, Elize couldn’t help but moan at the sensation of him spreading her open.

 

Before she knew it, Cardale had settled on top of her and lifted her thighs, which were now slightly thicker than before, and spread them to either side of her.

 

“Shall I make it easier for you, hmm?”

 

With his erect cock partially exposed and held firmly in place, Cardale gently teased it with his hand. His touch stirred up a fierce desire hidden within the tender caresses.

 

His fierce lust lurked in his whispers, but Elise was fooled by his kindness.

 

“Just this one time… okay?”

 

Cardale let out a low laugh.

 

“Now you know how to say some pretty cute things.”

 

His firm hand, combined with his roughened calluses, trailed slowly along her sensitive areas. Her body had become so responsive after being tormented all night, quickly heating up from the touch.

 

“Mmm…”

 

As his fingers delicately roamed along where they were joined, a tingling sensation spread through Elize’s lower body, igniting a simmering warmth.

 

Elise’s pleasure was already rising, and she gripped the sheets tightly with both hands.

 

Cardale, who had been watching her reactions, suddenly slipped his hand away.

 

As his fingers brushed against her private protrusion, Elise shivered and tightened her lower abdomen.

 

“Ahh!”

 

“In the meantime, I learned how to tighten and loosen your bottom, and it’s amazing.”

 

Cardale worked his fingers again, pushing the walls of her vagina. Still sheathing his penis tightly, satisfyingly.

 

His hands were skilful as they lazily rolled and rubbed her clitoris before rubbing it again.

 

Elise’s body trembled at the strange and ecstatic sensation that started from below.

 

“Ugh, uh…”

 

She groaned, flexing her thighs involuntarily. A warm feeling swelled inside her lower abdomen and travelled up her spine.

 

As she got closer and closer to the end, her waist automatically lifted, and her toes strengthened.

 

Her small lips parted, and her vision became blurry. Her completely blank mind just followed after the pleasure.

 

More, more, just a little more… Elize forgot her embarrassment and whimpered with pleasure. But just as she was about to reach her peak, the stimulation suddenly vanished.

 

“No, I don’t want…”

 

As she squirmed in frustration, unable to find relief from the lingering heat, a firm voice cut through her haze.

 

“Elise, I taught you what to do in times like this.”

 

Even while her consciousness was in a daze, the man’s voice was clear.

 

What he taught her. Blinking her eyes and tracing her memories, Elise soon wrapped her arms around Cardale’s neck.

 

“…Please hug me, Duke.”

 

“You should speak louder.”

 

“Huh!”

 

Cardale twisted her clit so it wouldn’t hurt. But Elise was stimulated precisely by the erogenous feelings, lifting her waist and dropping her thighs.

 

The soft mucous membrane clinging to him contracted as it was stretched to its limit.

 

Cardale laughed as he felt his cock being drenched with her love juice. This was enough lubrication for him.

 

Leaning forward, he grasped her soft breasts firmly.

 

“Ah!”

 

As the angle of penetration changed, Elize’s moans intensified as his dick penetrated deeper.

 

“Speak loudly.”

 

“Oh, please hug me… Ah, huh!”

 

“Louder.”

 

Having thoroughly achieved his goal by coating himself with her love juice already, he was simply amusing himself now. He knew women to often succumb helplessly to stimulation like this, especially Elize, as her large breasts were easily aroused with just a gentle touch from him.

 

As her soft skin clung to his palm, Cardale rolled his eyes and smiled.

 

“Elise, your voice is so low I can’t hear you.”

 

“Ugh, uhm…!”

 

As his hands roughly massaged her breasts, her nipples stood erect, and heat rose.

 

His fingers circling her areolas, grabbed the pink nipples without warning and twisted them, making Elise arc her back at the dizzying stimulation.

 

“Do you want me to suck it?”

 

“No, please, ah!”

 

As if punishing her dishonest mouth, he swallowed her breasts up to her areolas and sucked hard. Her back arched, and she let out a moan.

 

She spoke so impertinently, saying no to something that clearly made her mind flutter. As if asking for more.

 

Deliberately teasing her nipples with his tongue and nibbling on them lightly, he savoured her heightened moans. He was satisfied with the moans that gradually became even more erotic.

 

“Ah, ahhh!”

 

As her stimulation increased, Elise’s pleasure built up.

 

But as soon as she would reach her climax, he would stop stimulating her.

 

Her body, after heating up so intensely, cooled slightly before being brought back up again. Repeating the cycle. In the midst of the ambiguous pleasure, she found herself lost, craving more.

 

Elise groaned and shook her head vigorously, then repeated her plea to Cardale.

 

She wanted to escape this itching sensation somehow. The only person who could free her was the man in front of her.

 

“Please hug me, huh, huh…”

 

As Elise fussed, she tightened her arms around his neck.

 

Cardale’s eyes flashed insidiously. Even though he made Elise tremble with shame, he was more excited than she was.

 

His breath hot with desire, he felt his penis stiffen to the point where he could no longer control himself.

 

“Wrap your legs around me.”

 

Elise barely lifted her trembling legs to wrap them around his strong waist.

 

Cardale supported her neck and lower back with both his hands, feeling her calves crossing behind his waist, and then straightened his torso. 

 

Her body was pulled up, and his penis immediately penetrated her vaginal wall all the way to the root.

 

“Haaaa!”

 

As he entered her deeply, Elise’s vision flickered. She was at another climax in an instant.

 

He held the woman tightly, her whole body trembling as she moaned, and he lightly moved her waist.

 

With each thrust, his taut buttocks and thigh muscles contracted, aiding his movements.

 

“Ah, yes, ah!”

 

As he slowly rolled his penis into her and struck the bottom of his root, the inner wall had become sensitive from her climax. She twitched like crazy and massaged his dick just the way he wanted.

 

“That’s it… fuck…”

 

Cardale swore lowly, grit his teeth, and began to lift her waist roughly.

 

With each thrust, the thick shaft pushed into her tight entrance, creating a wet squelching sound.

 

“Ugh! Ah! Ah!”

 

Elise let out a series of moans and threw her head back as she felt herself brought to the peak of her climax.

 

In front of him, her slender neck was exposed, inviting. Such a soft place with a pulse—the impulse to bite down on her delicate neck washed over him.

 

“Ah!”

 

When Cardale bit her neck, she moaned reflexively. Yet he restrained himself just before there would be a tooth mark left on her.

 

“Ugh, ah, it hurts…”

 

Still, when the woman whined, he gently licked the bitten area with the tip of his tongue as if to soothe her.


As soon as he confirmed the crying had subsided a little, Cardale grabbed Elise’s waist with both his hands and lifted her up.

 

Her hair stood on end at the dizzying pleasure as his thick, veiny shaft clawed its way through her slicked inner walls.

 

“Ah, ah…”

 

He pulled out all of his penis, leaving only his glans, then turned her waist to the side.

 

It was as if he was trying to figure out exactly where to hit her just right. Soon, from the thoroughly wet entrance, there arose a squelching sound as if probing the sticky surface.

 

Only then did Elise, belatedly realising what he was trying to do, grab hold of Cadale’s arm and shake her head.

 

“Oh, no, please, Duke…”

 

Her pleading eyes, drenched with tears, begged desperately. He slowly pulled back before forcefully thrusting into her downwards.

 

With the added weight of the man’s body and strength, his hot and solid pillar pierced through her, splitting her apart.

 

“Ah, ahhh!”

 

The blunt glans mercilessly hit the swollen flesh deep inside her.

 

Elise moaned and twisted her waist as the pleasure overwhelmed her.

 

Her mind grew distant, her vision blurred, and between her wide-open lips moans escaped along with saliva.

 

“Uh, huh, ah…”

 

“Can you feel it, Elise? How you flinch and tighten around me from joy?”

 

Cardale’s voice echoed like a sigh in her distant mind. Before she could gather herself, her body was thrust back into.

 

The shaft of his flesh that had been roughly thrusting out of her began to pound inside her again, hitting where she felt it most.

 

“Ugh, yes! Ah, ah!”

 

His penis thrust into her like a weapon, spreading her inner walls and heavily striking her insides. Each time, the hairs of her neck stood on end, and her toes became curled. Shuddering as if she had been struck by lightning.

 

Her thighs were so tense and trembling, it was no wonder that she cramped up right away. Her stomach felt so full that she couldn’t even breathe properly.

 

“Stop, ah, ah!”

 

“Hmm, you want me to stop? I don’t think so.”

 

“Who was so horny and desperately  begging for my d!ck?” Cardale whispered mockingly, in a low language.

 

Elise became extremely embarrassed. But strangely enough, her body became hotter.

 

“Uh, huh, no…”

 

She lost half her senses and didn’t even know what she was babbling.

 

Her fluid was flowing like water from the damp hole at her bottom. Her inner walls were contracting and relaxing endlessly.

 

“Why do you always say no? You get so nervous when I don’t fuck you every other day.”

 

Cardale squeezed Elise’s pelvis as she moaned.

 

“But when I finally undress you, you get scared and say it’s hard before trying to escape.”

 

Pummelling her body mercilessly, as if he hadn’t been paying attention for the time being.

 

“No, please, don’t… it’s too deep, ah, oh! It’s tearing me apart…”

 

“It’s not tearing you apart.”

 

With the force of penetration almost reaching her womb, his cock withdrew before plunging back in. Foamy white cream bubbled around their tightly joined area.

 

“Ah, uh, oh… Aaah!”

 

Squelching sounds mixed with her obscene cries.

 

The intense pleasure engulfed her and shook her senseless, as if her brain was melting into mushy water.

 

Her stomach swelled as it held the huge shaft, and a shiver of pleasure ran down her spine. It felt like her whole body turned into a mess and was about to drip down.

 

Elise struggled to escape the pleasure, making her eyes roll.

 

Her hand wrapped around his neck was suddenly scratching the man’s back. But her short fingernails didn’t give him even a small scratch.

 

“Haah, uh, it’s too much, ah, help… oh, a little, gently, ah…”

 

“If I go gently, you won’t cry as it tickles you.”

 

He pounded his thick pillar without any mercy.

 

The fluid flowing from the wet and soggy joint, wetted her buttocks and thighs, splashing onto the sheets.

 

Cardale saw the woman’s body bobbing up and down with his penis impaled on it.

 

Her breasts were barely covered by his large hands as they bounced her pink, appetising nipples before him. It was an instant before his red eyes were captivated by lust, and clouded with cruel desire.

 

“Ahhh!”

 

The man’s eyes rolled back, and he swallowed the nipples and sucked them in. Her slim waist arched as the pleasure was felt simultaneously up and down.

 

He lowered one of his hands and ran through her light pubic hair, before spreading her opening. The clitoris, swollen with excitement, was easily caught in his hand.

 

Elise’s eyes opened wide.

 

“Yes, ah… … Please, not there…”

 

“That’s not it, Elise.”

 

Cardale let out a soft laugh as he placed her nipple in between his lips.

 

“You have to beg me for it.”

 

The man’s thick fingers pressed and rubbed the protrusion mercilessly. Elise couldn’t bear it any longer as her most sensitive part was being stimulated, at the same time as his penis hitting her peak.

 

Elise straightened her body and trembled in explosive pleasure.

 

Saliva leaked from the corners of her mouth. A silent moan escaped her chapped lips.

 

“Ha, ah…”

 

However, the man did not stop, as if he wasn’t done yet. His fleshy pillar was still inserted all the way to the root and continued to pierce her.

 

“Can I just enjoy this alone?”

 

“Ah, ahhhh, ah, haaaa!”

 

Elise cried frantically from the destructive pleasure forcibly swirling around her.

 

Cardale also let out a harsh moan as the inner walls squeezed around him. A feeling of climax rushed over him.

 

Suddenly, Elise’s body lay down on the sheet.

 

He grabbed her slender ankles and spread them wide to both sides. The beautiful vaginal opening had been stretched to its limit and swallowed his throbbing cock in the aftermath of his climax.

 

‘Damn it.’

 

It was a sight that even a eunuch would be unable to resist arousal upon witnessing it.

 

With a sudden snap, his teeth clenched. The thrusting became even more intense.

 

“Ah, uh, ugh!”

 

He fiercely pounded his maliciously large penis. His body’s movements towards his climax resembled that of a rabid beast. The woman’s cries sweetly echoed in his ears.

 

He mercilessly scratched the twitching, fleshy walls. But at the last moment, he finally broke down by thrusting his penis deep into her womb.

 

“Ah, huh, huh…”

 

Cardale admired the woman trembling as she reached climax.

 

Her pure white skin had just begun to glow a beautiful colour, her nipples swaying while erect, and her swollen belly embracing his cock.

 

Above all, she was a body trembling in extreme ecstasy.

 

It was a sight to behold.

 

Before long, blood rushed below, and his cock stood firmly erect. Again. 

 

He grabbed Elise’s calves and placed them on both of his shoulders. She begged pathetically with her wet eyes, but it only aroused his sadism.

 

Soon, the passionate sounds of kissing and the lewd sounds of wet slapping flesh filled the bedroom.

 



 

On behalf of the Duke, who was staying in Inghel, vassals visited the fiefdom of Brillion regularly every month and made reports.

 

This month, even during the holiday season it was the same. But the people who came were quite unexpected people.

 

“The elders came to visit?”

 

Cardale’s eyes narrowed.

 

The families that raised their families under Vassenberg’s protection remained loyal to their masters for generations. This was especially true for the elders.

 

Over a long period of time, they all had experienced big and small things, and at least once had come into contact with Vassenberg’s power.

 

However, from Cardale’s perspective, the seemingly respectful gestures often carried out in the name of deference were never entirely pleasant.

 

Besides, he had a general idea of what they were going to say.

 

“We greet our lord.”

 

Following the greetings of the head of the council, the others bowed their heads in turn.

 

To think they came all this way, leading with the eldest among them. Cardale shook his head, feeling somewhat annoyed.

 

“How have you all brought your aged bodies on such a long journey?”

 

His sarcasm was evident, without a doubt.

 

However, the elders who were familiar with their lord’s behaviour weren’t surprised. If anything, they felt a sense of relief compared to their previous encounters.

 

“We have simply come to request your consideration.”

 

The leader carefully observed the Duke’s face and held out a bundle of documents.

 

Cardale narrowed his eyes. The document presented by the elder contained personal information on women from noble families who were of marriageable age.

 

“You can’t put off important matters forever, right?”

 

As expected, their purpose did not deviate from what Cardale had expected.

 

It was unnecessary attention and concern.

 

“Since when did the council interfere in the affairs of the lord?”

 

Despite Cardale’s overt sarcasm, the head of the council responded steadfastly without faltering.

 

“Accepting the mistress of Vassenberg is a weighty matter that cannot be simply dismissed as a private affair-“

 

“That’s enough.”

 

Cardale cut him off coldly.

 

“I have fulfilled my duties thus far. Do not overstep your bounds.”

 

“Your Grace—”

 

“Sir.”

 

Michael swiftly interjected, covering the elder’s mouth and holding his head level. It was a signal to cease.

 

The head of the council, knowing the Duke’s temperament well, chose not to provoke him further. Instead, he concluded with one final plea.

 

“Please, consider this elder’s deference.”


The documents thrown into the fireplace were engulfed in blazing flames.

 

Norman, while he was brewing tea, glanced at the documents turning to black ash and then looked at his lord again.

 

The Duke stood by the window, watching the tea pouring out in the dim light.

 

Perhaps reading his worried gaze, Cardale opened his mouth with a dry expression.

 

“You have a face with a lot to say.”

 

“No, master.”

 

Norman bowed and answered politely. Then poured the finished tea, serving it to the Duke.

 

Cardale took the teacup and leaned against the window. Norman opened his mouth at the look in Cardale’s eyes, inviting him to speak.

 

“It’s just that the Duke’s house hasn’t had a hostess for so long.”

 

It had been several years since the Esteemed Lady had been completely withdrawn from the household affairs by her son, the Duke.

 

Cardale ascended to the Dukedom at a young age and worked hard to control the family while so young, then later fought a war with Helmut. So the need for a hostess was pushed to the bottom of his priority list.

 

But now things have changed. The Duke has complete control of the family, and the war has ended.

 

Moreover, the master had begun social activities in earnest by inviting Lady Schuvan into his mansion.

 

“Master, a noble family needs the discernment and touch of a hostess.”

 

From trivial things like choosing tableware for welcoming guests or the color of the curtains that decorated the mansion, to more important things like managing the mansion’s employees.

 

“The elders must have been concerned about that, too. You know their loyalty, don’t you?”

 

“It has been done without any problems so far. I don’t know why it’s suddenly an issue.”

 

He clearly showed his distaste for this topic.

 

“Your Grace, we are doing our best, but we are just employees. There are limits to the roles we have.”

 

Cardale tilted his teacup while listening to Norman.

 

The tea that he could hardly get used to, even after drinking it for many years, wetted his lips and went down the back of his throat.

 

He felt like the taste was getting worse and worse. He narrowed his eyes and drank the rest of his tea in one go.

 

Norman, holding a tray, quickly walked to his side. The sound of the teacup being placed on the tray was louder than usual.

 

Norman saw his master’s discomfort, muffled his voice and stepped back.

 



 

Cardale’s eyes naturally turned to the window, towards the garden.

 

Leaning at an angle with his arms crossed, his eyes landed on a small bench placed on one side of the garden.

 

Until recently, he didn’t even know anyone was using it, but it had been renovated and neatly painted white.

 

Norman, following the Duke’s eyes, also found someone sitting on the bench.

 

‘Again, the young lady…’

 

As far as Norman knew, Cardale had no interest in gardening.

 

The Duke’s office had the best lighting among the other rooms, and the view from the window was beautiful, but rarely used.

 

All he did in his office was work, and during his brief breaks, drink contraceptive tea.

 

Even this was a regular routine borne from his obsession, and was closer to work than rest.

 

Therefore, even if it was a minor change, it couldn’t help but be noticed by Norman.

 

However, he couldn’t guess with his naive mind how to accept this change.

 

“Isn’t she enough?”

 

At that time, Norman was suddenly awakened from his thoughts by a soft voice.

 

“I’m sorry, master. Could you please say that again?”

 

“Elise Schuvan. There’s that woman.”

 



 

Norman was rarely surprised. Having been trained not to show his emotions, yet he couldn’t help but be embarrassed this time.

 

The situation was the same for Michael, standing in the doorway.

 

“She is a woman who received education from her family, so she must have at least some insight. If it’s a big deal, can’t she just decorate the mansion?”

 

Norman swallowed dryly.

 

Decorating the mansion was the hostess’ unique authority. It was never something that could be dismissed as trivial.

 

‘Should I say something…?’

 

Norman pondered for a moment whether he should say this to the Duke or not, then he made eye contact with Michael.

 

At the same time, the two men found the right course of action.

 

Why should they complain about what they are doing? They do what the master of Vassenberg decides.

 

“If she says she can’t do it, there’s no need to press further.”

 

Elise wasn’t brought here for that purpose anyway.

 

Using that woman further was extremely insensitive, but Norman instinctively realised that was not all.

 

“I accept your orders, Your Grace.”

 

After Norman stepped out and Michael also left, only Cardale was left in his office.

 

His gaze was still fixed on the woman outside his window.

 

She was busy watching the butterflies fluttering between the flowers. She herself was like a pure white butterfly as well.

 

‘What would she say about all these trivial things?’

 

‘Aren’t they fragile and insignificant? Will they crumble to pieces if she holds them in her hand and applies even the slightest pressure?’

 

Nevertheless, Elise Schuvan definitely liked those things. She treasured things that were useless and insignificant and had no value.

 

Because of that, she was constantly being used and exploited. Even though she knew that after all her flesh and blood had been consumed, only her bones would remain.

 

Suddenly, it occurred to Cardale that the small flapping of a butterfly’s wings resembled the woman’s gesture.

 



 

The man’s gaze remained outside for a while after that.

 



 

“Do you think the Duke will stick with her for a while?”

 

“That’s my guess.”

 

Gerhard smiled in satisfaction at Vanessa’s answer and took a puff on his cigar.

 

“Honestly, I didn’t think she would do this well. I’m surprised, but that’s nothing bad.”

 

Elise resembled her mother, born with a face that captivated men, so it wasn’t difficult for her to fall into the Duke’s arms.

 

But holding on afterwards was a different matter.

 

In fact, Gerhard expected Elise to be kicked out soon after climbing onto the Duke’s bed a few times.

 

But what were the results now?

 

“She exceeded my expectations.”

 

Cardale Vassenberg made no effort to hide his mistress, nor did he try to disguise himself as harbouring a woman before his marriage.

 

And yet, that fact did not tarnish Cardale Vassenberg’s name.

 

There was even a rumour spreading that the reason the Princess was suddenly getting married was because she had messed with his mistress.

 

“It’s already reached this point, so it would be nice if we could please the Duke and hold out longer.”

 

Gerhard’s eyes swept over the organised invitations.

 

“Those who want to be close to me are already jumping to their feet.”

 

It would be perfect if this situation lasted for more than a few months, or even a year.

 

“As the Count wishes.”

 

A willing answer came back. Gerhard gladly praised his subordinates, like his own.

 

“Good job, Vanessa. Your contribution was great.”

 

“Thank you, Count.”

 

As Vanessa received her credit, she curled her mouth.

 

‘At last…’

 

She recalled the day she started working for Gerhard.

 

“Did you say Vanessa Lockseed?”

 

“I’ll give you a chance to work under me. Use it as a stepping stone to achieve your ambitions.”

 

Gerhard saw through Vanessa’s desire, and proposed conditions she could not refuse.

 

The title Gerhard had promised was the first cornerstone of her ambitions.

 

“If you do that, I’ll give you the title of baroness this time…” 

 

“Just a little more trouble, Vanessa.”

 

Vanessa’s face stiffened. However, she quickly corrected her expression and smiled as if she were drawing.

 

“Of course, Count.”

 

She answered calmly and cleverly changed the topic.

 

“By the way, Little Count Fritz came home a little while ago.”

 

“He must have come in drunk again.”

 

Gerhard frowned. There was no way he would like his son colluding with rumoured, delinquent noblemen.

 

“If only I had had one more son, I wouldn’t have to worry about passing the family name to such a worthless person.”

 

He clicked his tongue. He only had one son from his dead ex-wife.

 

‘At least Marissa gave birth to two.’

 

Suddenly, Gerhard remembered Marisa’s first child. A baby boy born after a gruelling labour.

 

“Ah, he is dead…”

 

“What do you mean by that?”

 

“It is just as I said. After a few days of fever and illness, he died.”

 

“That can’t be possible! He cried so loudly, he was such a healthy child…!”

 

“Children die easily.”

 

Gerhard responded calmly to a sobbing Marissa.

 

Then, sometime later, he safely married a woman whom he entered into an engagement with for the benefit of his family.

 

However, the only child that Countess gave was Fritz. At least it was a son, so it was better than not having one.

 

‘Come to think of it…’

 

Gerhard once again remembered his illegitimate son, whom his mistress had lied to be dead.

 

‘That kid has silver hair, too. Right?’


The textile mill owned by Gerhard Schuvan was busy as usual.

 

Large textile machines lined up in rows continuously spewed out pure white cotton fabric.

 

Amid the bustling noise, the hands of people attached to each machine kept moving. It was so hectic that they couldn’t take their eyes off their work even for a moment.

 

So much so that they didn’t notice that the owner of the factory had arrived.

 

Gerhard leisurely traversed the kingdom he had created. The factory manager followed closely next to him.

 

“Orders are pouring in. Production cannot keep up with them.”

 

“Even though the factory expansion has doubled its size!”

 

Gerhard pursed his lips in satisfaction.

 

Business was going smoothly. Orders were piling up and there was an abundance of cheap manpower willing to work. When he woke up, money had landed on his lap.

 

‘If this continues, my investment will be recovered quickly.’

 

He was soon ushered into the innermost office.

 

The factory manager opened the office door, pleased to see the person inside.

 

“Oh, Damian, you happened to be there!”

 

Damian, a young man sitting at his desk intently looking at documents, raised his head.

 

“Hurry up and say your greetings! This is Count Schuvan, the owner of this factory.”

 

“Ah.”

 

The young man quickly got up. He was quite tall and greeted him politely.

 

“Nice to meet you, Count Schuvan.”

 

Gerhard took a close look at the young man before him.

 

He had only heard about it, but this was his first time seeing it in person.

 

‘I remember correctly.’

 

Just as he remembered, he had silver hair. His eyes were as blue as the ocean, just like his mother and sister.

 

“So, did you say your name was Damian?”

 

“Yes.”

 

The young man was very handsome and elegant. His tall height, blue eyes, and aristocratic appearance made him different from ordinary commoners.

 

Damian stood upright, not intimidated by the sharp gaze scanning him all over.

 

“He is a talented person who graduated at the top of his class from the Academy’s Department of Public Administration.”

 

The factory manager intervened at the right time.

 

“He’s been helping with the work since last month, and it is helping me a lot in many ways.”

 

“Is it?”

 

“Yes! Rather than having a few decent employees, just one Damian-”

 

Putting aside the factory manager’s chatter, Gerhard asked the young man before him a question.

 

“Is the work worth doing?”

 

“Yes, I am learning a lot from being around the factory manager.”

 

An aristocratic accent was evident in his sharp speech.

 

As expected, he didn’t go to the academy for nothing.

 

“If you had the skills to graduate from the academy at the top of your class, there would have been a lot of places for you to go right?”

 

So why was he looking at office work in a textile factory?

 

Damian might have been offended by the seemingly disparaging remarks, but he answered calmly.

 

“Because I was a commoner and an orphan, I couldn’t get a guardian.”

 

The voice calmly explained his situation as if it were nothing tragic.

 

In fact, the reason Damian couldn’t find a job was because of Gerhard’s own handiwork.

 

For the purpose of bringing him to the factory, making him work, and verifying his qualifications.

 

As he believed, if the ability is outstanding, use it. If not, then just throw it away.

 

Gerhard stared at the young man in front of him.

 

Extraordinary intelligence, flawless appearance, sincerity and patience. But above all, a restrained personality that does not easily show emotions.

 

‘It doesn’t matter, whose blood did you receive?’

 

It was an incredibly selfish thought to have for his son he had abandoned at birth.

 

If the orphanage director had not recognised Damian’s genius mind, and if Damian had never entered the academy, Gerhard would not have searched for his illegitimate son he had abandoned forever.

 

But things are different now.

 

As soon as he decided that nothing more could be expected from his legitimate son, Fritz Gerhard was willing to replace his successor.

 

‘Seeing him in person, I’m leaning more towards him.’

 

What was important to him was not blood, but family.

 

“Then I will become your guardian.”

 

“…Are you sure?”

 

Damian’s eyes widened in surprise, the first change in expression Gerhard saw. But soon, the young man fixed his expression and bowed.

 

“Thank you. I will do my best to ensure you do not regret becoming my guardian.”

 

“That’s right.”

 

After answering with satisfaction, Gerhard turned around.

 

The factory manager, surprised by the Count’s great kindness, quickly followed him and motioned to Damian.

 

“Please, this way! We have to see the Count off!”

 

Before getting into the carriage, Gerhard took one last look at Damian.

 

‘He is a gem that just needs to be polished a little more.’

 

It could have been an extremely satisfying work that inherited his blood.

 

‘Marissa’s children pay for their full price without even realising it.’

 

After a while, the door closed, and the carriage started to run. Gerhard leaned back against the seatback and pulled up the corners of his mouth.

 

He didn’t have any regrets.

 

‘If he is useful, then I can just use him now.’

 



 

Meanwhile, Vanessa’s eyes widened as she followed Gerhard without knowing.

 

Because the young man who accompanied the Count had silver hair, which was already a rarity. But moreover, his eyes were a pale blue.

 

Vanessa knew someone with eyes that looked exactly like those.

 

‘No way, did Marissa…?’

 

The moment a shocking possibility occurred to her, Vanessa covered her mouth with her hand.

 

‘How could such a massive secret have been kept hidden until now?’

 

Although she didn’t bat an eyelid at most things, she couldn’t help but be shocked by this.

 

Her wavering gaze fell back on the silver-haired young man.

 

She heard the factory manager call his name, Damian.

 

‘He really looks a lot like Marissa.’

 

Vanessa thought of the Count’s mistress, while she still retained her beauty. Like her son, a young man with handsome and fine features.

 

However, he had little expression, perhaps because he lived a life full of hardships and trials.

 

‘Marissa seemed to have no idea she had a son.’

 

Every time Vanessa met her, she was anxious to know how her daughter Elise was doing. But Vanessa had never heard of this son.

 

‘You faked his death and stole him away!’

 

Vanessa was horrified by Gerhard’s cruelty.

 

‘I knew he was a man who would do anything to achieve his goals, but he stole a child from his mother.’

 

Even though he was still holding that mistress in his arms, he never revealed the existence of their son.

 

It was so terrible that Vanessa burst out laughing.

 

‘There must be a reason why he found his illegitimate child again.’

 

Just as Elise Schuvan was brought in to be used, the Count must have his own purpose when he met Damian again.

 

Vanessa found the answer without difficulty.

 

‘You’re weighing the two.’

 

It was clear that the Count had begun to compare Fritz and Damian.

 

If both of them were clearly related, was there a need to only have one option?

 

To pass on his family name to the illegitimate son was a secondary matter.

 

If the Count wanted it, he would find a way somehow.

 

‘If Gerhard replaces his successor, Damian…’

 

Even the smallest possibility should not be missed. Decisive things always start from small choices.

 

‘I’ll have to check properly first.’

 

Vanessa’s eyes lit up.

 



 

Elise looked at Norman with bewildered eyes.

 

“Decorating the mansion… Me?”

 

It was not that she doubted Norman, but she simply couldn’t believe him.

 

Elise’s trembling eyes turned to the numerous catalogues and documents Norman had brought.

 

‘This is the hostess’s job…’

 

She was very aware of her role as the Duke’s nightly attendant, this was not something she would dare involve herself in. It was a very undeserved role for her.

 

“But Norman, I…”

 

When Elise didn’t know what to do, Norman gave her a soft smile as if to reassure her.

 

“I have absolutely no sense in this area, I couldn’t even think about-”

 

Then he told a white lie to Elise.

 

“There is no one else I can ask for help, so I am asking you this.”

 

“I-I’m the only one?”

 

“Yes. It’s just the young lady.”

 

Norman answered firmly.

 

“As you may know, the atmosphere of the mansion has not been changed for several years. So the interior is far from trendy.”

 

Then, he used the words he had prepared in advance to persuade her as naturally as possible.

 

“Now, Lady Elise. We are about to start social activities in earnest, and we are completely unprepared. Wouldn’t that be a big problem?”

 

“That’s true, but…”

 

Norman noticed that Elise was shaking, then winked at Linda standing next to her.

 

“You don’t have to stress too much, lady.”

 

She quickly joined in on the persuasion.

 

“We will be there to help you.”

 

Before they knew it, Elise had gone from being a bit of a helper, to being the one taking the lead.

 

“I’m sure you can do a great job.”

 

Those words gave Elise courage.

 

Above all, she did not want to turn down requests from people who needed her help, especially if they were in need.

 

Even more so if they are Norman and Linda, before anyone else.

 

“Well, then…”

 

Elise finally made up her mind and nodded her head.

 

“I’ll give it a try.”


Although she stayed at the Duke’s residence since the change of  a season, Elise’s range of interaction was limited to a very small part of the mansion.

 

Her bedroom, Cardale’s bedroom, his office, the dining room, and a guest room.

 

Unless there was a special reason, she mostly just stayed in her room.

 

Thanks to this, she was an easy master to serve by the mansion’s employees and guard knights. But this also aroused deep concern.

 

Norman wondered if it was okay for her to feel trapped like that.

 

However, they knew that their master always wanted to keep Elise Schuvan in his sight, and since he also did not show any dissatisfaction, they just pretended not to notice until now.

 

The same was true for Norman.

 

He spoke to Elise as she concentrated on a catalogue.

 

“What do you think, young lady? Is there anything useful?”

 

“Ah.”

 

Elise’s expression as she raised her head showed slight embarrassment.

 

“They are all of a good quality and look luxurious. However…”

 

Elise paused for a moment before answering.

 

“It was difficult to choose what would go well with the mansion…”

 

As if she had never regained her courage, Elise suddenly lost confidence. Norman kindly offered advice.

 

“Then how about taking a look around the mansion? It will help you in many ways for making your decisions.”

 

Elise’s eyes widened. She asked Norman, as if to confirm.

 

“Is that okay…?”

 

“Of course, my lady.”

 

When Norman answered so easily, Elise was even more surprised.

 

Never in her wildest dreams had it ever occurred to her that she could wander around the mansion beyond designated areas.

 

That was her experience with Count Schuvan.

 

When she was young, she had to stay within her enclosure, including the outbuildings. When she grew up and returned, she had to get permission from the Count or Vanessa to go anywhere within the mansion.

 

The habits and thoughts that she had become accustomed to did not change, even after she came to the Duke’s residence.

 

Just being able to leave her room every day was something she was grateful for.

 

“If it’s okay with you, young lady. I’d like to show you around the mansion. How about that?”

 

“The butler himself?”

 

“Yes. Would you like someone else to? Please tell me, and I will call them.”

 

“No! This is fine, I like you!”

 

Elise hastily shook her head.

 

“I- You must be very busy, so I felt sorry for asking you to take a tour of the mansion…”

 

“You don’t have to be sorry, young lady.”

 

Norman smiled softly and corrected her.

 

“You are helping me with my work too, so I am grateful. Besides, isn’t this for your ‘job’ with managing the mansion, not just touring it?

 

“That’s true.”

 

Only then did Elise’s face brighten a little, as if she was relieved.

 

“Then would you like to go right away? Or shall I come back and see you later?”

 

“Is it okay to go now…?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Elise turned her head at the low voice that suddenly came out.

 

“You’re here, Master.”

 

Norman bent down towards the man standing in the doorway.

 

“Duke.”

 

At his unexpected visit, Elise hesitated then stood up as well.

 

Cardale’s eyes scanned the catalogue on the table in front of the sofa, where Elise had just been sitting. His eyes were indifferent, as if seeing something meaningless.

 

Then, when his eyes turned to Elise, he relaxed a little.

 

“Come here, Elise.”

 

Elise, who didn’t know what he was thinking, hesitated and looked at Cardale’s face. Because it was difficult for her to guess his intentions.

 

‘You don’t seem particularly displeased or angry, but…’

 

At that time, Cardale blurted out his words.

 

“He said you wanted to see the mansion.”

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise’s lips parted.

 

‘No way, the Duke wants to show me around the mansion himself…’

 

Even as she thought that, her feet moved of their own accord.

 

As Elise approached cautiously, Cardale held her hand.

 

Even as her body flinched from her nervousness, Elise couldn’t help but think.

 

‘It’s warm…’ 

 

As she spent countless nights with Caddale, there was one thing she had learned from him: he has a high body temperature.

 

So on nights when it rained and the temperature dropped, or when her body cooled and chilled after a heated affair. She would be wrapped in his arms, feeling as if she was being wrapped in a warm, heavy blanket.

 

He asked as Elise looked down at their hands, as if fascinated.

 

“What?”

 

“The Duke has really warm hands.”

 

Elise had let her inner thoughts spill out of her mouth at her, then raised her head in shock. As a result, Cardale and her eyes met.

 

“Oh, I…”

 

“I know.”

 

Elise was trying to stammer an excuse, but Cardale stopped her with an answer.

 

“That’s why you touch me so often.”

 

His bright red gaze looked down at her.

 

Elise suddenly remembered for some time, whenever they spent the night together, she would interlace his hands with hers while they were resting.

 

At the same time, a small realisation struck her.

 

‘The Duke already knew. That I like warm things…’

 

She felt embarrassed, as if he had somehow discovered her true feelings.

 

Elise quietly lowered her head. The tips of her ears were already turning red.

 

It took only a moment for the man’s face to turn grumpy when he saw that.

 

“You don’t want to? If you don’t like it, quit.”

 

“Oh, no! …I like it.”

 

Elise became so anxious that she even forgot her embarrassment and answered quickly.

 

She was afraid that if she didn’t answer honestly, he would let go of her hand and maybe he would never hold or embrace her again.

 

‘I don’t want that…’ 

 

She didn’t want to lose her only way to feel his warmth.

 

Perhaps it was because of her obedient response, but she felt a little more grip on her hand.

 

She wasn’t imagining things.

 

Rather, she felt a sense of stability, as if the gently applied force was supporting her as she drifted like a buoy with nowhere to take root.

 

“Then let’s go.”

 

“Yes…”

 

Norman quietly bowed and bent his waist and saw the two of them.

 

Elise gave Norman a grateful look and left her room.

 

Cardale naturally slowed his pace to match her stride.

 

“Tell me if I walk too fast.”

 

“No. It’s fine.”

 

She felt like she was being escorted. Her heart was pounding.

 

“Where do you want to go first?”

 

“Yes?”

 

Elise paused because she really didn’t expect to be asked that.

 

“I’m asking if there’s a place in the mansion you’re curious about.”

 

Elise couldn’t answer.

 

‘I don’t even know what places are in the mansion, let alone a place I would be curious about.’

 

How pathetic she must look, she’s been here for months and doesn’t know anything about this place. Elise became nervous.

 

“I just– If the Duke would guide me…”

 

Hiding her anxiety, she cautiously opened her mouth. Fortunately, he simply nodded.

 

“It would be best to take a look around the main building first then, as it is also where you usually stay.”

 

“Ah, yes…!”

 

That was when Elise responded quickly and nodded her head vigorously.

 

He let out a low laugh.

 

His always sharp eyes softened for a moment, and a smile appeared on his lips.

 

‘The Duke…’

 

Elise turned curious, and she stared blankly at that face.

 

‘The Duke can smile like that…’ 

 

She had seen bitter cold laughter and mocking laughter from him many times, but this was the first time she had seen him with a smile so soft.

 

He had such a wonderful smile that she couldn’t take her eyes off him.

 

“There is a study nearby, so let’s go from there.”

 

Elise barely nodded, then held her hand with Cardale as he walked half a step ahead of her, pressing her other hand to her chest.

 

She didn’t even notice that her hands were warmer than his.

 



 

Time passed by quickly as she looked around the main building of the mansion.

 

They entered a familiar hallway, Cardale looked down at Elise and asked mischievously.

 

“Of course, you’re curious about my bedroom, right?”

 

Elise flinched for a moment and shook her head violently.

 

“Oh, no!”

 

“Hmm?”

 

As Cardale narrowed his eyes and made a meaningful face, Elise hastily excused herself.

 

“I’ve seen the Duke’s bedroom a lot already, so it’s okay…”

 

“Nonsense.”

 

He bent his upper body towards her and made eye contact.

 

“I don’t think you’ve had time to look at the bedroom properly.”

 

“Uhh…”

 

Elise’s cheeks turned red, because what Cardale said wasn’t exactly wrong.

 

While she was lost in pleasure and ecstasy, she wondered if she had truly noticed the decorations of his bedroom.

 

Embarrassed, she couldn’t say anything for a moment and just pursed her lips, before she remembered what she had to do and came to her senses.

 

“Uh, I really only need to look at the bedroom this time.”

 

Then Cardale raised one of his eyebrows before he sighed.

 

“If anyone hears you, they’ll think I was the only one making noise.”

 

Then he made a promise to Elise, who looked up at him with a worried expression.

 

“We won’t do anything in there. So are you ready?”


Even though Cardale spoke somewhat awkwardly, Elise was just relieved.

 

“Thank God…”

 

She must have thought that he wouldn’t hear him even if she spoke softly, but he was dumbfounded as he looked at her, visibly relieved.

 

But on the other hand, he had a strange feeling.

 

“You promise…?”

 

Elise looked up, blinking her deep blue, lake-like eyes.

 

Sometimes, when she looked at him so earnestly like this, as if he were the only one in the world. Cardale felt a strange thirst.

 

“Yes.”

 

The voice that came from him was muddy. Then he felt the small fingers in his hand wriggling.

 

‘Where?’

 

He squeezed Elise’s hand tightly to prevent her from escaping, even clasped her hand. It was almost instinctive.

 

“Duke, it hurts…”

 

However, when Elise made a small cry from the pain, he loosened his grip. He then scolded her for some reason.

 

“You’re just bones anyways, so it shouldn’t hurt if I hold you a little harder.”

 

“It’s not that bad.”

 

Elise felt a little mortified. She wasn’t just bones, she ate more than she usually would.

 

But it seemed to her that his thoughts were completely different.

 

“What do you mean ‘not that bad’? You barely have flesh on your body…”

 

As she followed Cardale’s line of sight, her face immediately turned bright red.

 

“Uh, let’s go quickly, Your Grace.”

 

Elise hurriedly turned her body and pulled his arm.

 

She was clearly showing her intentions, but Cardale turned a blind eye this time.

 

The bedroom was quiet, the usual strange heat and humid air gone from within.

 

Bright sunlight penetrated through the window with the curtains pulled, illuminating every corner of the room.

 

‘It’s a space I’ve been to countless times… But seeing it this way, it feels quite different.’

 

Feeling somehow new, Elise looked around the room.

 

Her eyes wandered between the antique furniture in the bedroom, the dark and muted wallpaper, the tapestry decoration, and the chandelier on the ceiling.

 

‘Uh?’

 

Suddenly, Elise noticed something different in the empty wall than what she remembered.

 

“There is no taxidermy…”

 

Involuntarily, her thoughts flowed out. She quickly covered her mouth and glanced up at Cardale.

 

His expression was the same as before.

 

‘Thank goodness he didn’t hear it.’

 

Relieved, Elise turned her eyes back to the bedroom.

 

There were no animal heads hanging on the wall, no furry heads scattered about. No decorations made of bones, horns, or sharp teeth.

 

‘Everything has disappeared without a trace. Did he order it removed because he wanted to decorate the bedroom differently?’

 

Elise tried to retrace her memory.

 

She vividly remembered the first time she was called into the bedroom, and the scene she saw then still remained so strongly in her mind.

 

‘But I don’t remember what it was like after that.’

 

Whenever she was with Cardale, he would hold Elise’s attention, and all her nerves would be firing. Especially in this bedroom.

 

He didn’t leave her alone to think about other stuff.

 

‘…I just couldn’t afford to check the room.’

 

Even in the early days of her relationship with him, there were times when Elise would think of her mother or worry about her future.

 

‘You need to concentrate, Elise.’

 

But she got caught every time. Then, he would exact retribution.

 

Each time Elise would say something embarrassing or assume a shameful posture, she would be pushed to a point where she could no longer maintain her senses.

 

Through several experiences, she learned with her body that she should focus only on him in his bedroom.

 

That was why she never noticed that all traces of the dead animals had long since disappeared from the Duke’s room.

 

‘I think I feel a little more at ease now that I know there’s no taxidermy in here.’

 

She didn’t know if his tastes had changed or if it was just a temporary whim on his part, but it was still fortunate for her.

 

“Uh, do you still often enjoy hunting?”

 

As soon as Cardale’s frown narrowed, Elise’s heart sank.

 

‘I guess I asked an inappropriate question.’

 

However, contrary to her expectations that he would show his displeasure at any moment, he did not respond for a while.

 

He just had a strange expression, as if caught off guard. Like he had heard something he hadn’t considered.

 

He was lost in thought, as if he was evaluating something, then finally opened his mouth.

 

“Are you worried about them returning to the room?”

 

“A little hesitant…”

 

Elise, who was about to answer honestly, suddenly thought that she was being too presumptuous and quickly shook her head.

 

“Well, this is the Duke’s bedroom, so you don’t have to worry about what I think…”

 

“There’s nothing to worry about.”

 

Cardale replied, tucking a strand of hair from the side of her cheek behind her ear.

 

“At least while you’re here, there won’t be any taxidermy decorations brought into the mansion.”

 

‘That means…’

 

Elise’s blue eyes shook violently, and her heart pounded rapidly.

 

‘Could it be for my sake…?’

 

‘Are you saying you removed all the animals from the mansion, including the bedroom?’

 

Even when she thought about it, she tried to deny it. It couldn’t be true. 

 

Because it was such a ridiculous and absurd idea.

 

But it was too sweet of a gesture to ignore… …

 

She couldn’t help but start to believe in it.

 

Elise’s dense, silver eyelashes fluttered.

 

‘I must not forget that I am just a maid. If I get greedy, I’ll end up in trouble.’

 

She remembered that the downfall of many mistresses all begins with foolish expectations.

 

Even now, that was an ending she feared the most alongside a terrible future. But…

 

Elise lowered her gaze. Otherwise, she felt like her courage would scatter at any moment.

 

“…Thank you.”

 

She only managed to utter a few words, but her heart was immeasurable.

 

She felt gratitude, desperation, fear, earnestness, and even a small precious seed of something else she was not even aware of yet.

 

Elise felt the man’s gaze staring at her before a large hand cupped her cheek.

 

She thought again. It was so, so incredibly warm.

 

A moment later, something hot and soft-landed on her lips. Elise slowly closed her eyes.

 

Even the breath was sweet.

 



 

The next day, the Duke was visited by employees from a trading company owned by him.

 

Norman gave them a firm warning in advance.

 

“Master has left all decisions to you. I believe you understand what I mean.”

 

So, when Elise saw the nervous employees, she tilted her head and began to select the necessary items.

 

“I would like to change the wall colour to something a little brighter. Is there anything you can recommend?”

 

“Of course, Lady Schuvan.”

 

She then ordered new lighting, curtains, furniture, etc., one by one.

 

The staff showed great courtesy until the very end.

 

“We will prepare the supplies as quickly as possible.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

A few days later, workers arrived with supplies to carry out the construction. Coincidentally, it was a day when Cardale was away from the mansion due to work.

 

With several days at the unattended mansion, Elise finished the redecoration with the help of Norman and Linda.

 

Norman was amazed at the brighter hall.

 

“It’s really nice to see how much brighter it is than before.”

 

Linda, next to him, also nodded her head in affirmation.

 

“Yes. The wallpaper and curtains also match well with the old-fashioned feel of the mansion.”

 

“That’s good, but…”

 

Elise was hardly at ease. It seemed like it went well, but when she looked at it again, it still didn’t seem right.

 

“Thank you for all your hard work. I’m sure the master will like it too.”

 

Elise then smiled faintly and nodded her head.

 

‘I hope the Duke likes it too…’

 

Then, with a trembling heart, she waited for Cardale to return home.

 

He returned two days later, after the mansion was completely renovated.

 

Elise tried to suppress her nervousness as she watched Cardale carefully look at the changes.

 

When he finally turned to look at her, Elise asked cautiously.

 

“How is it…?”

 

“It’s okay.”

 

“Really?”

 

“Yes, it’s beyond my expectations. I didn’t expect you to do this well.”

 

Elise’s expression brightened in an instant. As if a closed bud was blooming.

 

Cardale looked at that face for a while and then asked.

 

“Is there anything you want?”

 

Elise, smiling brightly, paused as her eyes widened.

 

She only ever took what Cardale gave her, and this was the first time he had asked her such a thing.

 

“Because you did a good job, I will reward you.”

 

Then, something popped into Elise’s mind.

 

It was a wish she had always cherished.

 

But she could barely speak. When she hesitated and couldn’t open her mouth, he asked again.

 

“It seems like you want something, why are you hesitating?”

 

“I don’t know if it’s okay to ask…”

 

“Speak. Anything is okay.”

 

Elise held her hands tightly together. Her trembling voice escaped between her lips.

 

“Uh, I want to see my mother.”


As soon as she spoke her wish aloud, the very one she had been holding back from everyone, tears started pouring out uncontrollably as if a dam had burst.

 

“Where is she, how is she, how is her health? Because of me… is she having a hard time…?”

 

If only she could see her mother just once.

 

Elise looked up at Cardale as if pleading.

 



 

He was staring at her, she was unable to guess what he was thinking.

 

Seeing his dry face made Elise come to her senses, as if she had been hit with cold water.

 

‘What on earth am I talking about…?’

 

Then, she belatedly realised her carelessness.

 

Her mother belonged to the Count, even if she didn’t want to. The Count was a nobleman, and her mother was a poor commoner maid.

 

‘Vanessa clearly said that it is an unwritten rule in aristocratic society to not invade other nobles’ private matters…’

 

She even heard that such trivial matters often turn into fights between families.

 

‘There is no reason for the Duke to go through such trouble because of someone like me.’

 

When her thoughts reached that point, Elise quickly shook her head.

 

“Nevermind, Duke.”

 

She was trying to make up for what she said, even if it was belated.

 

“It was just caught in the moment. I can meet my mother later…”

 

But when?

 

A question suddenly appeared in her mind.

 

‘One day, when my work is finished, and the Duke lets me go… No, once I get sick and useless and get kicked out…’

 

‘Will I be able to see her mother again?’

 

She couldn’t help herself. The Count and Vanessa had promised, but Elise knew deep in her subconscious.

 

It was not an issue for them to break their promise should they want to.

 

Despair and sadness, which she had tried so hard to ignore, suddenly surfaced, causing her hands to tremble. Tears welled up in her blue eyes.

 

‘I can’t cry.’

 

Elise held herself back by biting the inside of her lip as hard as she could. But it was of no use.

 

“Why are you crying?”

 

The moment her chin was lifted by Cardale’s hand, her overflowing tears streamed down her cheeks.

 

“Why are you crying after saying that?”

 

‘Because it’s not true.’

 

She only lied because she didn’t want to offend him. In fact, she missed her mother so much. She missed her terribly and was worried for her.

 

The agony of not being able to see her mother was not the only source of her sadness.

 

‘By the time I meet my mother again… it will probably be long after the Duke abandons me…’

 

Even though it was natural, Elise felt strangely heartbroken. She had tears in her eyes and a lump in her throat.

 

‘Why am I like this? Why did I dare to entertain such foolish expectations that the Duke would treat me kindly?’

 

‘I quite like people who are good at understanding me well.’

 

One by one, the memories that had been buried deep inside her came back. A cruel sneer and a voice as cold as frost.

 

No.

 

She didn’t want to go back to that time. It was too late; she had already grown accustomed to warmth and had been tamed.

 

‘You can turn a blind eye to a few mistakes or mistakes.’

 

‘I can overlook some mistakes or missteps.’

 

Relying solely on that thought, Elise continued to cry, tears falling one after another.

 

“I’m sorry…”

 

“What are you sorry for?”

 

The bewildering tone of his words actually made me feel more sad.

 

“Just, everything…”

 

For begging to see her mother, then lying that she didn’t want to see her mother, or for having such audacious thoughts in the first place.

 

There were so many things she did wrong that she didn’t know where to start.

 

“Don’t cry, Elise.”

 

Even though it was in a commanding tone, it felt strangely tender. Elise nodded, trying not to harbour her futile hopes.

 

Then she felt his strong arms wrap around her waist. Before she knew it, her cheek was pressed against his chest. Elise blinked in surprise.

 

Whenever he held her like this, it felt as if he was comforting her…

 

“Is that all you want?”

 

Elise momentarily thought she misheard.

 

Was it just her desperate wish playing tricks on her mind?

 

“Meeting your mother, is that all it will take?”

 

But she hadn’t misheard. Looking up with her wet eyes, Elise gazed at Cardale.

 

At first, everything was blurry. But after blinking a few times, she saw his vivid red eyes staring back at her.

 

Not just at her eyes, but into the depths of her heart.

 

“Are you asking if I need anything else?”

 

Elise quickly shook her head, her breath catching in her throat.

 

“T-that’s all. If you could just… grant me that–”

 

That was all she wanted.

 

Her last words were swallowed by his lips.

 

Her surprise was momentary, but Elise willingly opened her mouth to welcome his tongue sliding into her. She then moved, albeit clumsily, and tangled her tongue with his.

 

Their saliva mingled, and their breaths intertwined. A strange moan escaped between their joined lips.

 

It was a soft but intensely deep kiss.

 

“Okay.”

 

After a while, satisfied with exploring her mouth, Cardale pulled back his lips and replied.

 

“Let me look into it.”

 



 

With the royal engagement looming, those belonging to the princess’s palace were tirelessly busy. There was much to prepare, and time was running short.

 

However, the owner of the palace showed no interest whatsoever.

 

Theresia stared down at the lavish jewellery with indifferent eyes.

 

“Your Highness, please take a look at this. The colours are dazzling beyond belief.”

 

“I’ve never seen such a large emerald before!”

 

Despite the maids’ enthusiastic chatter, Theresia’s icy expression remained unchanged.

 

No, if anything, it grew more distorted as time passed.

 

“That’s enough.”

 

With a sharp click, the jewellery box was forcefully shut.

 

The atmosphere soured and silence heavily fell. The maids exchanged anxious glances, sensing the tension in the air.

 

“Everyone, leave.”

 

Theresia ordered sternly. Those who had only been trying to please their mistress quickly left the room before the sparks flew.

 

Alone in the room, Theresia took deep breaths, trying to calm herself. But her mood refused to improve, and the intense anger continued to swell within her.

 

Suddenly with a crash, the jewellery box  was thrown and spilt its contents noisily across the floor.

 

“Please calm yourself.”

 

A man appeared, his presence unknown until now.

 

He gently guided Theresia, who had risen abruptly, back into her seat before kneeling in front of her.

 

“Calm down? How can I calm down, Dietrich?”

 

Theresia spoke through gritted teeth, seething with anger.

 

“I’m supposed to marry a man I’ve never even laid eyes on.”

 

Instead of answering, Dietrich simply listened. Allowing the Princess to vent her frustration.

 

“It’s absurd! The sole heir of Oldenhilt being cast out of this Empire…!”

 

The sense of injustice and misery was unbearable. What angered Theresia even more was that those responsible for it all seemed oblivious to their actions.

 

“If I must leave the Empire, I’ll lose my mind. I’d rather die than endure that.”

 

“Your Highness.”

 

Despite his earnest plea, Theresia remained unmoved. It didn’t take Dietrich long to realise her sincerity.

 

His gaze darkened.

 

“If that is truly your wish, then perhaps you should resort to ‘that.'”

 

Theresia lowered her head abruptly to meet Dietrich’s gaze. After a moment, a strange gleam appeared in her eyes.

 

“Right. You’re correct. There’s no need to spare what’s expendable at this point.”

 

When you have a weapon, you should wield it without hesitation.

 

Theresia stood up, straightening her rumpled skirts and tucking away her stray strands of hair.

 

Moments later, she made her way towards the Crown Prince’s palace. Her face set in a chilling expression.

 



 

The Emperor, Johann, was not a very good husband.

 

He enjoyed a glamorous history with women and a promiscuous sex life when he was young.

 

Even after marrying his wife, he persisted in lusting after others and couldn’t mend his ways.

 

The Empress was not at ease due to her husband’s continued infidelity even during her pregnancy, and miscarried her first child.

 

She couldn’t have children for a while.

 

Meanwhile, the emperor had a son from the Empress’s maid.

 

It was the beginning of misfortune that the child took after the characteristics of the royal family, which the Emperor cherished.

 

Johann decided to disguise his maid’s child as the Empress’s child.

 

The Empress could not refuse through threats against her family’s safety.

 

Thus, the maid was deprived of her son, and the Empress, after delaying her own pregnancy for half a year, became the mother of an unwanted child.

 

On the day the prince was first presented, the nobles couldn’t help but suspect the hidden story behind the overly-grown baby but kept silent.

 

After that, the Empress just barely gave birth to a child after many years of trying. It was a princess.

 

This time, too, the Emperor was delighted and named the baby Theresia. But the Empress died after a week due to the aftereffects of a difficult childbirth.

 

With this, the last person who knew the truth was buried in the ground.

 

It was only by chance that Theresia discovered this great secret. She overheard a conversation between the Emperor and the Crown Prince.

 

Naturally, she sought her rightful place.

 

“The legitimate successor of Oldenhilt is not Marius, but me!”

 

“It’s too late to change the crown prince now.”

 

However, contrary to her expectations, Johann issued a silence order.

 

Teresia strongly protested, but all she got in return was a threat to her position as a princess.

 

Angered by having everything taken away from her, she decided.

 

Decided to use Cardale Vassenberg.

 

‘I’m going to make a man who even the Emperor can’t mess with mine.’

 

That was how she decided to seek her power and revenge.


The more she observed, the more she wanted Cardale Vassenberg.

 

Aside from his status as a duke, his power, and the things he owned. He was still a shining example of a man. He was stronger and more attractive than any she had ever seen.

 

Theresia, therefore, changed her plan.

 

‘I will have the power, and that man.’

 

Originally, she was the type of person who needed everything she wanted to satisfy her true nature. She had to take it all in her hands. She couldn’t give up on a single thing.

 

This experience of everything being taken away from her once was enough.

 

‘But you want me to leave the empire? Even if I die, I just can’t do that.’

 

She even went through the humiliation of having what was stolen from her handed to an illegitimate child.

 

‘Being a princess from another country is infinitely worse than simply living alone as the princess of an empire, dying of old age.’

 

Even if that happened, Theresia would rather die.

 

After realising this, she felt like she could act without hesitation.

 



 

Marius happened to be in his palace.

 

“Theresia came to visit?”

 

An expression of annoyance, irritation, and a bit of suspicion appeared on his face.

 

‘I don’t know if she’s causing trouble again.’

 

To Marius, Theresia’s very existence was a threat.

 

It was fine now that the Emperor had his back, but he couldn’t be comfortable until after his father’s death.

 

Due to Theresia’s personality, she would somehow try to stop him from ascending the throne, even if he were already crowned. It was obvious he would not be able to avoid being tarnished by her.

 

‘There is no evidence anyway, so it will only be laughed at.’

 

The secret of his birth was completely hidden.

 

Even if she revealed that fact to the empire, there would be no evidence. So in the end, she would be the one to suffer the consequences from such an action.

 

He was the reason why Theresia was angry. She was unable to make a move because of him.

 

‘Even though her temperament is persistent, hot-tempered, and impatient. That doesn’t mean she’s completely out of her mind.’

 

If she had been stupid, she would have been easy to handle. But she could distinguish between what was advantageous and disadvantageous for herself. 

 

So Marius was always wary of Theresa. He at least felt relieved that the marriage with the Kingdom of Roshild was recently fixed.

 

Just send her to that faraway place, and he will never see her again.

 

‘But why does she suddenly want to meet me…?’

 

Suddenly, his anxiety arose, but he felt uncomfortable just sending her back. Even more so when he thought about Theresia these days.

 

His intuition told him that he should not ignore her.

 

“Ask her to come in.”

 

‘I’ll find out once I meet her.’

 

At this time, Marius was looking down on Theresia. 

 

And that was his ultimate mistake.

 



 

Theresa took a sip of tea. The scent of the finest tea leaves with a unique flavour lingered in her mouth.

 

‘His tastes are very sophisticated.’

 

She sneered inwardly. No matter how much she tried to think positively, wasn’t this still too much for an illegitimate son?

 

“What did you want to see me for, Theresia?”

 

“What do I do?”

 

Theresia pretended to tip her teacup and lifted her eyes to look at Marius’ expression.

 

‘She is anxious. I guess that means something is wrong.’

 

Theresia lifted her lips from her teacup and set it down.

 

“Brother, please help me. I don’t want to go to Roshild.”

 

“Ha, is that it?”

 

The faint tension on Marius’ face disappeared at once.

 

Theresia sneered invisibly at how the Crown Prince changed his attitude the instant he decided that she had no cards in hand.

 

“You should take responsibility for your mistakes, who do you think will take them off your hands for you? Just go ahead and get married quietly.”

 

It was a cold answer that lacked any affection for their flesh and blood. Theresia laughed at the expected reaction without the slightest twist.

 

‘I wasn’t expecting any leniency from him anyway.’

 

No one was generous to their enemy. So, Theresia planned to mercilessly bite the enemy’s vital points from the beginning.

 

“Isn’t it going to be difficult if things keep going on like this?”

 

The subtle smile on the princess’s face turned cold.

 

“I’m talking about the weapons managed by my brother. There have been rumours about distribution issues.”

 

“What’s that supposed to–”

 

Theresia fully expected Marius to interject, so she cut him off without letting him finish.

 

“Then would it be okay if I disclosed what I know? Your Royal Highness the Crown Prince will surely be upright and honest.”

 

For a moment, Marius was left speechless. Theresia twisted her crimson lips.

 

In an instant, her tone changed.

 

“Did you think I was ignorant?”

 



 

Marius glared at her silently. His grey eyes burning with anger, looked exactly like Theresia’s.

 

“What do you want?”

 

“Now we’re getting somewhere.”

 

Theresia crossed her legs, crossed her arms, then spoke.

 

“A deal?”

 

“You’ll have the throne. I’ll have Cardale Vasssenberg.”

 

Marius frowned deeply.

 

“How could you possibly have the Duke? And besides, with the arranged marriage already–”

 

“Don’t underestimate me. If I hear that kind of nonsense from you, I might just lose it and do something crazy.”

 

Marius swallowed nervously at Theresia’s somewhat deranged gaze.

 

It was dangerous. He decided it wasn’t wise to meddle recklessly here.

 

In the end, he took a step back and made a proposition.

 

“I can help postpone the marriage.”

 

“Good. And one more thing.”

 

Theresia added, raising the corner of her mouth.

 

“Elise Schuvan. There’s something that could be used as her weakness, right?”

 

Afterwards, Theresia returned to the Princess’s palace with a satisfied smile on her face.

 

Dietrich, who had been waiting for her, bowed and asked.

 

“Did you get what you wanted?”

 

“Yes. Thanks to you.”

 

Theresia answered, pulling her lips.

 

“I’ll tell you a very interesting story, Dietrich. Won’t you be surprised when you hear this?”

 

She was able to get more useful information from Marius than she had expected. Now, it was up to her to figure out how to use it effectively.

 

“Dietrich.”

 

“Yes, Your Royal Highness.”

 

“Try to contact Raymond Hartmann in secret. I need him.”

 

“Right away.”

 

After her knight responded faithfully and left, Theresia was left alone to look around the bedroom.

 

If she leaves this place one day, there will be only one reason.

 

“If I can’t have mine, you can’t have yours either.”

 

She muttered in an eerily sinister voice.

 



 

“As we tracked down those suspected, we found that there were more people involved with Helmut than expected.”

 

While listening to Michael’s interim report, Cardale looked out the window.

 

“It’s been identified as a complex network of connections. Most are just tangentially involved, but…”

 

“The Empire is in trouble.”

 

Cardale responded coldly.

 

The Emperor’s suspicion about Helmut’s involvement was proving to be true.

 

‘But even Johann von Oldenhild couldn’t have expected this scale.’

 

Cardale sneered coldly.

 

“Plans are somewhat in place. Once a few more individuals are found with the help of a few agents, we should have a complete understanding of the key figures in this web.”

 

“There should be no gaps whatsoever.”

 

Cardale opened his mouth.

 

“Weave it so tightly that nothing escapes.”

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

There was enough time anyway since the fall social season hadn’t even started yet.

 

Yes, summer was still in full swing.

 

Cardale looked down at his white deer gracefully walking through the garden.

 

Now the sun was so hot that children playing in the middle of the day could get sunburned in just a few hours.

 

Nevertheless, the woman went for a walk every day.

 

Linda reported that it was her favourite routine. He didn’t want to take away her only hobby, so she ordered her to get a parasol.

 

Surprisingly, she never forgot to bring it with her and always came out holding the parasol. It was pure white, just like her.

 

She had walked until beads of sweat were forming on her forehead, and she was soon going to sit down on the bench and rest.

 

She was dutifully predictable. She never moved beyond the boundaries he set.

 

So Cardale was relieved.

 

He didn’t even realise he was relieved.

 

He moved his gaze to follow the woman’s movements. Her moderately plump cheeks were reddish from the heat outside.

 

At the same time, a face with reddened eyes and an earnest request came to mind.

 

“Uh, I want to see my mother.”

 

Only then did Cardale realise that blocking communication between his mistress and her father was not the solution.

 

As long as her biological mother was in the Count’s hands, he would not be able to sever his connection to Gerhard so easily.

 

In other words, it also meant that Elise Schuvan could not be completely subordinate to him.

 

Cardale decided not to tolerate that.

 

To be precise, it has become unacceptable now.

 

Cardale looked back at his subordinate and asked.

 

“How many independent agents do we have?”

 

It was a question with a hidden meaning, but Michael quickly understood.

 

“If you are talking about the ones directly under your command, most of them are assigned to work related to Helmut.”

 

“In that case, it seems you’ll have to act.”

 

He gave an order to his confused aide.

 

“Find out where Elise’s biological mother is.”


Elise touched the glass of her bedroom window with her fingertips. The hot weather made the temperature of the smooth glass lukewarm.

 

“I was worried it would rain yesterday, but thankfully it didn’t.”

 

The sky had cleared up to a bright sunny day. She was relieved to see the bright blue sky and shining sunlight.

 

The sky had thankfully cleared up beautifully since then. She felt relieved as she gazed at the azure sky and the shining sun.

 

“It’s strange…”

 

It felt like she was looking at the outdoor scenery without the window.

 

And even stranger, when the window was closed, hardly any outside noise could be heard.

 

‘He knows everything… Did they deliberately change it?’

 

Norman had told her that Cardale had instructed the replacement of the windows in the bedroom.

 

Because of that, she had to stay in Cardale’s bedroom while the construction was underway, but Elise was fine with that.

 

During the day, Linda and the maids checked in frequently. Then in the evening…

 

‘It’s embarrassing.’

 

Elise’s face turned red.

 

Even though she was just thinking to herself, her face flushed with embarrassment.

 

“And lately, they’ve been so kind…”

 

Elise startled herself with the words she unconsciously blurted out.

 

“No, it’s not right.”

 

They kept trying to ease her mind. She kept trying to get comfortable.

 

‘If that happens, something really scary will happen.’

 

But no matter how hard she tried to keep her distance, it wasn’t easy.

 

As soon as she relaxed her guard for just a moment, thoughts would naturally flow downward like water from a high place.

 

“Besides, he promised to let me meet my mother…”

 

She was just grateful to the Duke. It was not about having false hopes, she was just…

 

A knock on the door woke Elise from her thoughts.

 

“Miss, this is Linda. May I come in?”

 

Elise quickly removed her hand from the window and stepped back, granting her permission.

 

Linda entered the bedroom and informed Elise of her schedule.

 

“I’ve come to inform you of your departure time.”

 

“Oh, already…”

 

“Yes. Is there anything else I can assist you with before you leave?”

 

While she hesitated because she couldn’t think of anything in particular, Linda smiled softly and suggested.

 

“Then I’ll just tidy up your clothes a little.”

 

Elise nodded.

 

After Linda had adjusted the hem of her skirt and meticulously re-tied the ribbon, she asked, “How is it? Is there anywhere else you’d like me to attend to?”

 

Elise stared intensely at herself in the full-length mirror in front of her.

 

‘Is this okay…?’

 

It was the first time she looked at herself this closely.

 

Both at the Count’s residence and here, she followed what the maids told her without saying a word. Yet somehow, this felt new.

 

‘I think my complexion looks bad.’

 

She later regretted that if she had known it would be like this, she would have asked for at least a little makeup.

 

Elise was only fiddling with her neckline.

 

“Would you like me to change your jewellery?”

 

“Oh, no.”

 

Elise quickly shook her head.

 

It was a necklace Cardale had given her as a gift. Of course, he gave her everything she wore, but this one meant something a little different to her.

 

‘The Duke said the other day that it suits me well.’

 

Even if it was just a passing comment, she listened. She didn’t forget and wore it around her neck again today.

 

‘I hope he notices.’

 

Elise looked over her dresser without realising it and looked at the round container with a rose on it.

 

It was filled with red rouge.

 

Linda noticed her gaze lingering.

 

“Would you like me to apply it for you?”

 

“Is that okay…?”

 

“Of course. All items in this room are for the lady. You can use as much as you want.”

 

Only then did Elise respond with relief.

 

“Then I’ll just ask for this little favour.”

 

As the case opened, an elegant scent wafted out. Elise closed her eyes tightly, waiting as Linda lightly applied colour to her lips.

 

“There, all done. Would you like to see?”

 

When she opened her eyes, she noticed her lips were slightly redder than before. Somehow, they seemed livelier and rosier.

 

“Do you like it?”

 

“Yes…”

 

Elise tentatively pursed her lips. And then, she felt like she looked a bit brighter and prettier.

 

“I like it. Thank you so much, Linda.”

 

“I’m glad I could help. Shall we go out now?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Elise nodded.

 

She hoped she would look a little better in his eyes, even if just a bit.

 



 

Cardale was already at the mansion’s entrance before Elise.

 

He hadn’t deliberately waited for her.

 

It’s just that he had finished his work faster than usual, and by the time he was done, there was still some time left before their outing.

 

His crimson eyes glanced at the clock. A few minutes had passed by now.

 

He wasn’t used to waiting for others, and he despised not keeping on time.

 

“She is a bit late.”

 

“I’ll check, Master.”

 

Michael, in his usual subdued tone, responded promptly. He knew well his master’s strict sense of time. 

 

“No, she’ll be down soon.”

 

However, when the Duke chose to wait rather than urge, Michael could not believe his ears for a moment.

 

Whether or not his subordinates were in shock and astonishment, Cardale didn’t seem to care.

 

He leisurely waited for Elise to come out.

 

Strangely enough, he wasn’t offended at all. He wasn’t bored either. It was only a matter of minutes. Instead…

 

He could hear people walking lightly, and the hem of a dress fluttering. It was the sound of his mistress’s footsteps, like a cautious deer.

 

Cardale raised his head.

 

“Duke.”

 

Elise, whose cheeks were a little red, probably because she was in a hurry, approached him at a slow pace.

 

“I’m sorry for keeping you waiting. Ah…!”

 

Instead of replying, he lifted the woman’s chin with his hand.

 

“It seems you’re late because of this.”

 

He supposed that to be the right answer as her small frame trembled, her ears turning pink.

 

Since her hair was tied up, her long neck was exposed like a deer. Even there, a faint blush began to spread.

 

Cardale gently brushed the area under her cheek with his thumb and asked, “Why did you do something you don’t usually do?”

 

He had never been interested in women’s adornments. To him, whether they were made up or not didn’t make much difference.

 

If anything, it only added a harsh scent, which brought annoyance and discomfort. That’s why he never demanded it from Elise Schuvan. Even the servants of the Marquess followed his intentions.

 

But now, his subordinate had suddenly done something cute.

 

Was it out of innocence or mischief?

 

When he asked, she couldn’t even answer, just blushing her cheeks. But as he examined her actions, it was quite charming.

 

Whispering closely into Elise’s ear, Cardale said, “Who are you trying to seduce with such alluring lips?”

 

There was a sharp intake of breath. Then her cheeks, ears, neck, and even the area around her eyes turned crimson.

 

It reverberated again. If it continued, he might not be able to resist taking her to his bedroom right then and there.

 

“Don’t cry, answer me.”

 

Then, her lips tinged with delicate colour, trembling a few times before a small voice came out.

 

“Duke, I… um…”

 



 

“I wanted to show it to you, Duke.”

 

His grip loosened unconsciously.

 

“And the necklace?”

 

Elise nodded.

 

Satisfied with her answer, Cardale decided to generously show discretion and mercy to his woman.

 

He released her chin and instead interlocked his fingers with Elise’s.

 

“It seems you were looking forward to today’s outing quite a bit.”

 

“Yes…”

 

They walked together hand in hand towards the carriage. Elise added cautiously, “Actually, I-I’ve been looking forward to it very much.”

 

It was an unusual, honest response from her. Cardale tilted his head slightly and looked at his woman.

 

“…I see.”

 

Strangely, there was a slight sensation of warmth in his throat.

 

And he ignored this inexplicable feeling.

 



 

After about half an hour, the carriage stopped near the square. A place different from the salons frequented by Elise and Cardale exclusively for nobles.

 

It was a bustling area where people from all walks of life gathered.

 

Elise’s eyes widened at the dynamic scene of the lively streets.

 

“Be careful not to get lost. With so many people, it’s easy to get swept away.”

 

Although his tone was firm, almost commanding, Elise covered her mouth and quietly chuckled.

 

The man watching her every move couldn’t possibly miss it.

 

Cardale’s eyebrow twitched. 

 

“Why are you laughing?”

 

Only then did Elise realise her mistake and hastily apologised. 

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

“Answer me.”

 

Then, she cautiously asked, her eyes swaying nervously, “Um, You… you won’t get angry, will you…?”

 

“Huh.”

 

Cardale let out a hollow laugh.

 

Somewhere along the line, the woman had started making such mischievous remarks.

 

“You’ve become quite talkative, Elise.”

 

But oddly enough, it didn’t bother him.

 

“I won’t get angry, so tell me why you were laughing.”

 

“Well… it’s because I don’t think I’ll get lost.”

 

Elise hesitated in her response. Still unclear, Cardale narrowed his eyes.

 

Then, she hinted with her free hand.

 

“Because you’re holding my hand…”

 

His gaze followed her pointing finger.

 

There, almost as if caught, was his tightly clasped hand holding hers.

 

Cardale fell silent for a moment, then lifted his head as if nothing had happened.

 

“Let’s go see the clock tower first.”

 

“Yes.”

 

Elise smiled shyly in response.

 

They walked side by side, their hands still intertwined.

 

Of course, it was because the streets were excessively crowded.


As time passed, there were more people gathered in the square.

 

Many gazed towards the two of them because they stood out so much from their presence and appearance.

 

This was especially true because their hands were held tightly, like passionate lovers.

 

Because of this, Elise covered her face as her cheeks turned red with embarrassment.

 

However, she did not feel as nervous or intimidated as when nobles would stare at her in a banquet hall or ballroom.

 

‘More than anything, I don’t want to let go of the Duke’s hand…’

 

It was embarrassing, but her heart was pounding. She felt like she shouldn’t be doing this, so her fingers kept twitching in Cardale’s hand.

 

Cardale had already noticed that Elise was feeling anxious.

 

“You don’t want to hold hands?”

 

“Oh, no…!”

 

He was satisfied to see her quick answer. 

 

Just as a beautiful pet waits for the touch of its master, so did the woman.

 

If this were a calculated action, she wouldn’t be a match for any decent theatre actor.

 

“Then?”

 

“I… I want to hold it more. But…”

 

He waited for the hesitant woman. He knew now that if he showed a little patience, she would respond quickly.

 

“Other people keep looking at me… and I’m so embarrassed…”

 

“You want to hold hands? Yet you feel embarrassed when others stare?”

 

Then Elise touched her lips and answered softly.

 

“That’s right…”

 

As he thought about it, the way she answered while secretly averting her gaze, was probably because she was embarrassed. It was both funny and cute, so he laughed aloud.

 

“Oh, Duke. If you smile like that…”

 

Elise was embarrassed and grabbed his arm as if to stop him from being so loud.

 

Her face, red and flushed.

 

Cardale asked with a smile on his face.

 

“You made this happen, and now you blame me for laughing?”

 

“I’m not blaming you… Everyone’s just looking.”

 

It was like a bright red apple was in front of him. If he took a bite, he wondered if sweet juices would flow from her.

 

He knew very well the sweetness she offered. He also knew exactly where and how to appreciate her to draw out that sweetness.

 

Looks like he couldn’t restrain himself today either.

 

He deliberately brushed his tousled hair, pretending not to notice her heated body. At least for now.

 

“I’ve been waiting to go out for a while. But when I finally do, I just end up being conscious of others’ stares. So going out feels like it’s not worth it.”

 

He decided to gently coax the woman.

 

“But…”

 

“You’ve told me repeatedly that I’m the only one you care about. Have you forgotten that?”

 

“I haven’t forgotten.”

 

The answer was again obedient. So, he became a little more lenient.

 

“Then let’s do it like this.”

 

He released the woman’s hand from his grasp.

 

Savouring her soft skin grazing his fingers.

 

Elise looked up at him with bewildered, shaking eyes from her anxiety and nervousness.

 

She was just as pretty, but eyes like these were no longer what he wanted to see.

 

“Go on, and I will hold you all night for as long as you want.”

 

“Ah…”

 

Only then did the slight fear disappear from her face. She nodded even though her cheeks were blushing.

 

Then she must have remembered something because she let out a short exclamation, then asked him.

 

“What if I get lost?”

 

Her clear, large eyes blinked. It seemed the innocent deer would believe his words without reservation.

 

Was that even possible?

 

Even now, his shadows were watching over their master’s safety from various corners, blocking potential threats.

 

Thus, Cardale’s subconscious surveillance of Elise was actually for a different reason.

 

In case his deer, having discovered the outside world, might lose her heart to it. In case she might escape from the cosy fence and refuge he had provided her, and run away into the vast forest.

 

But if she relied on him so much, if she truly was such a timid and fearful woman…

 

Wouldn’t it be all right?

 

Without realising it, pride was slowly taking root in him.

 

“There’s nothing to worry about, because that won’t happen.”

 

“But if I walk around with so many people, I might miss sight of you…” 

 

“Even if that’s the case, do you think I won’t be able to find you?”

 

Then Elise’s eyes widened, a little surprised.

 

“So feel free to take a look around. Because nothing will happen.”

 

Only then did relief appear on her slightly tense white face.

 

“Okay.”

 

Elise nodded her head with a small smile.

 

Afterwards, Cardale was able to see a woman who was busy watching Elise with curious eyes.

 

And it gave him quite a different pleasure.

 

‘This is better than I thought.’

 

The decision to go out this time was actually somewhat impulsive.

 

He preferred to not show what was ‘his’ to anyone else, and Elise Schuvan was no exception.

 

Even though she was just a poor substitute for her overbearing father, he had cut off contact with Gerhard Schuvan to this extent.

 

However, as he watched the woman stroll, Michael reported as usual.

 

‘There have been reports of wolves exhibiting unusual behaviour as pets. As if they’ve been kept too long.’ 

 

He had the very rational idea that even captive-bred pets need to be let off their leashes from time to time.

 

In the past, such a thing would have been unthinkable for him. His way was to dispose of those who couldn’t fulfil their duties without mercy.

 

‘He did mention she particularly enjoys walks.’

 

So he just brushed past those words, and Elise was overjoyed.

 

So much so that she asked him several times if it was really okay.

 

After that, Cardale would often find an excited look on her face as he picked a date.

 

‘It might be okay to take some time off sometimes.’

 

Since he had been so busy with work, it wasn’t a bad idea to take a break for a while. Moreover, since he tied the Princess’s hands and feet, there would be less risk of his delicate deer being hunted.

 

After thinking about it, he followed his woman.

 

In the meantime, Elise had been looking at something, showing no signs of taking her eyes off it.

 

People were lining up before a small stall.

 

Cardale quickly figured out what it was selling.

 

Wild strawberries.

 

They happened to be in season. However, he did not have much trust in the quality and safety of food sold outside.

 

Still, he looked at Elise as if he were fascinated, so he couldn’t help but ask.

 

“Do you want to eat?”

 

“Hmm… I’m not sure.”

 

After thinking about it for a moment, Cardale shook his head and said.

 

“Either you want to eat, or you don’t. What’s with this ‘not sure’?”

 

Elise hesitated again before answering.

 

“I’ve never tried them before… so I don’t know what it tastes like.”

 

“That sounds like curiosity.”

 

Cardale took Elise’s hand and led her to the stall. People, sensing his unusual aura, automatically made way for them.

 

Soon enough, some strawberries were in Elise’s hands.

 

He didn’t particularly like the idea of using a yellowish paper plate instead of a proper dish, but he didn’t show it.

 

It was obvious that Elise liked it, since she was holding the strawberries as if they were something precious.

 

After she got back into the carriage, she looked up at him with sparkling eyes from the red fruit.

 

“It smells sweet. Will it taste the same?”

 

The blue eyes were like a lake bathed in sunlight.

 

Cardale suddenly considered, had those eyes ever sparkled so brightly?

 

In his memory, the woman was usually either frightened and trembling, filled with sorrow and resentment, or intoxicated with pleasure.

 

Although occasionally she would express joy, this was the first time they shone so brightly with pure curiosity.

 

So instead of being sarcastic, mocking her, or saying something like he usually would to bully people. He responded indifferently.

 

“It’ll be sweet.”

 

Then he watched excitement spread across her face.

 

Her red and adorable lips opened, and the strawberry disappeared between them.

 

When did it start?

 

Watching her transform from a deer caught in the rain to a sun-kissed beauty, her cheeks flushed with colour. It was a peculiar feeling.

 

“It’s sour and sweet.”

 

Cardale brushed his thumb over her lips, tracing the red juice, before he slowly licked it with his own tongue.

 

“As you said, it’s sweet.”

 

Then, he pressed into her slightly parted lips.

 

Surprised by the sudden intrusion, Elise’s silver eyelashes fluttered, but soon closed them as she accepted him.

 

Their tongues danced so eagerly it almost stung.

 

Therefore, Elise did not notice that the man who had once promised to marry her, was now watching them.


Melvik, one of the most popular streets in Inghel, becomes more dynamic in the evening.

 

The twinkling lights fascinated people. In particular, Melvik’s famous bar street was so crowded and full of excitement that there was no room to walk.

 

Thanks to this, people of all walks of life from travellers passing by, to those who wanted to experience the unique atmosphere of Melbik, and even beggars aspiring to be charity recipients all crowded together.

 

Amidst the various people bustling in the streets, a man entered a tavern. He seemed distinctly out of place compared to the atmosphere of the building.

 

With his unusual attire and dignified demeanour, he didn’t blend in with the crowd, and the tavern staff glanced at him like an uninvited guest.

 

However, they soon lost interest and focused back on their own enjoyment.

 

Eccentric nobles who seemed to be interested in the lives of commoners were not uncommon, and this seemed to be a similar case.

 

“Sir, would you like to order?”

 

The owner approached the man, who had taken a table alone in the corner.

 

The man nodded indifferently and vaguely pointed at the menu. There were pictures drawn for those who couldn’t read, so anyone could place an order.

 

“The strongest one, and plenty of it.”

 

“Yes, sir.”

 

The owner thought that it was quite peculiar for a nobleman to be seeking strong liquor.

 

With a meaningless farewell as the owner disappeared, the man poured the contents of the bottle into his glass and drank it all in one gulp.

 

“Ah…”

 

He immediately felt the intoxication spreading through him.

 

Raymond emptied several glasses of strong liquor in quick succession. Then, he finally put down the glass and covered his face with his hands.

 

“Where did it all go wrong?”

 

The marquis’ parents had been excessively stubborn, but he had planned to persuade them over time.

 

But in the meantime, Elise became the Duke’s mistress.

 

The day he heard the news, Raymond ignored the courtesy of the aristocratic society that he had always respected, and went to Count Schuvan’s house.

 

“How can you do that!”

 

Gerhard asked back as if he couldn’t understand him as Raymond expressed his anger.

 

“Wasn’t it the Marquis who abandoned Elise? Her identity was exposed, and the engagement was broken off, so what could we do?”

 

“It wasn’t a break-up. As for me, as far as I can go–”

 

“You are naive, Marquis. Do you think your father, Marquis Hartmann, will accept an illegitimate child as his son’s wife?”

 

Or do you want to believe that’s true?

 

The question pierced Raymond’s weakness and guilt as sharply and accurately as a knife.

 

“Rather than tormenting her by holding on to meaningless hope. As her father, it would be better to find her another way to live.”

 

“Then could you at least have recognised another potential marriage partner for her? Becoming a mistress, how could she…”

 

Then Gerhard laughed openly.

 

“What kind of marriage partner do you mean? The wife of an old and dying man? The second wife of a man with several grown kids? Or perhaps a marriage with some eccentric castle lord?”

 

Raymond was momentarily speechless at the cruel words.

 

“Those were the marriage proposals Elise received after the engagement was called-off. So what other options were there?”

 

Gerhard’s words stabbed him as he staggered in shock.

 

“Do you understand now? When the Little Marquis gave up on Elise, her future was almost decided.”

 

The day he left the Count’s residence without being able to say anything more, Raymond drank to the point where he could not maintain his senses for the first time.

 

And after that, he needed a drink quite often.

 

In the midst of those painful days, he encountered Elise at the opera house.

 

She became the Duke’s mistress.

 

“…Long time no see. Well… How are you doing?”

 

“Little Marquis Hartmann…”

 

He could still vividly see her panicked expression, not knowing what to do. Her fearful blue eyes looked like they were about to cry.

 

Elise didn’t look happy at all. More than anything else, seeing the Duke treat her like he treated one of his belongings made him feel even more frustrated and distressed.

 

Still, she couldn’t refute the Duke’s treatment. She was so overcome by the force that she couldn’t even open her mouth.

 

“It’s all my fault. If it weren’t for me, you would…”

 

Raymond returned, trembling in humiliation, and lived day after day in misery.

 

In his despair, the Marchioness, unable to watch her son waste away, eventually changed her mind.

 

“Look at our son! Look at him suffering like this!”

 

“My dear!”

 

“Raymond is in agony! He says he can’t live without her, and even if he is alive, it’s as if he’s not. What are we to do then?”

 

So this was how Raymond obtained permission from his parents.

 

Now, waiting for Elise to return someday was Raymond’s only hope.

 

He vowed never to make a foolish mistake again, and promised to heal all the scars and pain she had endured.

 

That day, Raymond fell asleep without alcohol for the first time in months.

 

After that, he happened to see Elise on a rare outing.

 

It was purely by chance.

 

‘Elise?’

 

At first, he thought it was a dream.

 

Because he missed her so much, it seemed like a futile illusion.

 

But she was smiling.

 

It really was Elise, but moreover. The person next to her, blushing on her cheeks and smiling beautifully, was none other than the Duke.

 

He laughed as he saw that selfish and cruel man.

 

No matter how much he tried to pretend otherwise, he couldn’t.

 

Elise’s face was exactly like what he once dreamed of seeing when he imagined marrying her.

 

‘Elise is with the Duke…’

 

…She seemed to be doing well.

 

The moment he realised that fact, he felt his world tilt. His vision blurred, and he felt like he might lose his mind at any moment.

 

He had wished for her happiness and well-being, but seeing her like this. He couldn’t bear it anymore.

 

‘I would rather have been okay with Elise living in misery.’

 

With that thought suddenly surfacing, a dull shock hit him.

 

He felt like he was facing his own selfish and base feelings.

 

“Ha ha, ha… Ha ha ha…”

 

Raymond laughed hollowly. He needed a drink. He couldn’t bear it without alcohol.

 

He tilted the glass again. The bottle was empty.

 

The alcohol ran out.

 

Half-drunk, as he raised his hand to tap the table, a full glass of alcohol was placed in front of him.

 

“Little Marquis Raymond Hartmann.”

 

Hearing someone calling him, Raymond suddenly raised his head. His blurred eyes instantly sharpened.

 

He looked warily at the person sitting across the table.

 

“…Who are you?”

 

“Nice to meet you. My name is Dietrich Klein.”

 

The man gently lifted the hem of his cloak to show something underneath. Raymond’s eyes widened when he saw the emblem of the Imperial Knights.

 

“My master wants to see you.”

 

The rose decoration on the coat of arms signified his belonging to the Princess’s palace.

 

“I wonder why your master specifically wants to see me.”

 

Raymond clearly remembered how carelessly Princess Theresia treated Elise. He had no hope of receiving a favourable response from her.

 

“Besides, since she is about to get married soon. It would be better to refrain from doing anything that could cause a misunderstanding.”

 

He clearly conveyed that he did not want to meet and drew a line in the sand.

 

Then Dietrich said, “It has to do with Elise Schuvan.”

 

Raymond opened his eyes and clenched his fists, placed on the table.

 

Dietrich slowly stood up, looking at those burning green eyes, as if they had been touched by evil.

 

A small note was placed next to Raymond’s drinking glass.

 

“If you have any thoughts, please contact me. I’ll be waiting.”

 



 

Although Elise did not see him, Cardale had already noticed Raymond Hartmann’s presence.

 

He saw how Raymond couldn’t take his eyes off them, trailing behind incessantly.

 

Of course, Cardale paid him no mind. He had no interest in the wretch who had let go of a woman he had intended to marry.

 

However, Cardale did find it quite satisfying to show Elise’s appearance to Raymond Hartmann.

 

‘Take a good look. Isn’t my mistress so cute? She’s even smiling sweetly at me.’

 

‘So there was no chance for Elise to ever be in your arms, as you had wished. Not in the past, not now, and not in the future.’

 

It was rumoured that Marquis Hartmann and his wife were unable to win over their son.

 

So what does that matter?

 

‘Elise Schuvan is mine.’

 

He was the first to recognize her worth, carefully embrace her, and devote himself to meticulously caring for her.

 

Every night.

 

So rushing home became a natural routine for Cardale.

 

“Your Excellency, please look at this.”

 

Michael hurriedly handed him a note as he was about to board the carriage.

 

“Fritz Schuvan?”

 

When the name of Gerhard Schuvan’s son suddenly appeared, Cardale’s eyes narrowed.

 

“While searching for the Lady’s mother, I sensed something odd and urgently reported it.”

 

He glanced at the note again.

 

The content was brief.

 

[Fritz Schuvan. Academy dropout. Reason: Insufficient graduation requirements.]

 

“He was in the midst of graduating from the academy but suddenly dropped out. His whereabouts for almost a year until recently attending social gatherings in Inghel are mysterious.”

 

“A year, indeed. Quite intriguing.”

 

The period of his mysterious disappearance coincided precisely with the time of the war with Helmuth.

 

Cardale folded the note and handed it back to Michael, giving him instructions.

 

“Dig deeper into this.”

 The employees all greeted the Duke as he returned home to the mansion.

 

“You are here, Master.”

 

Norman greeted him on their behalf, but the Duke had no interest in this.

 

“Where is Elise?”

 

“She is waiting in the bedroom.”

 

That was all the answer he needed. Cardale headed straight to the bedroom where his woman was waiting.

 

His motions were as disciplined and precise as usual, but the pace was slightly faster.

 

He quickly arrived at the bedroom and grabbed the door handle. He could feel a presence inside.

 

Small, careful, gentle movements.

 

The corners of his mouth pulled up slightly. He turned the handle and forcefully pushed the door open, at the same time his bright red eyes quickly scanned the bedroom to find the woman’s location.

 

He didn’t even need to bother. Her delicate voice called to him.

 

“Duke.”

 

Elise was wearing a gown and holding a tray. Cardale looked at the towel and scented oils on the tray and rolled his eyes.

 

The man crossed the room with great strides and stood in front of his woman.

 

“Have you waited long?”

 

“No. Not that long…”

 

Elise suddenly denied, then shook her head and changed her words.

 

“Actually, you said you would come early today… so I’ve been waiting for you for a while.”

 

By then, her cheeks were a little hot. The tips of her ears were also beautifully flushed.

 

“What were you waiting to do?”

 

Cardale asked, deliberately glancing at the bath supplies on the tray. Even though he knew what they were for, he was asking to be mischievous.

 

“I’m going to serve you…”

 

“So, what kind of service do you have to offer?”

 

Blue eyes looked up at him earnestly. But instead of helping her, Cardale urged her to answer.

 

“Answer nicely, Elise.”

 

Then her lips, as red and tempting as the wild strawberries she had eaten not too long ago, twitched.

 

“I came to help the Duke take a bath…”

 

“That’s not it.”

 

Cardale gently caressed Elise’s cheek, blushing subtly with embarrassment.

 

“What did I tell you to say?”

 

“Um…”

 

Elise shivered as Cardale’s fingers moved up her cheek and began to tease her delicate earlobe.

 

“You must know by now that enduring it will only bring you suffering.”

 

‘My dear Elise, still lacking in learning, it seems. Well, then…’

 

There was a bone-chilling undertone in his murmurs. Elise, sensing the sinister desire in his voice, urgently called out to Cardale.

 

“D-Duke.”

 

Though he had been mostly tender lately, sometimes he would be harsh enough to overwhelm her. At those times, Cardale’s voice was similar to how it is now.

 

The burning eyes, as if obsessed with carnal desires, wanting to violate and destroy.

 

“Duke…”

 

Elise called again. As if begging for her reason to be restored.

 

Cardale briefly considered dragging her to the bathroom, ignoring her plea, before he changed his mind.

 

Seeing the admiration of preparing and waiting so well for him, he decided to give her one more chance.

 

“Yes?”

 

With his softened tone, Elise felt a deep sense of relief. Then, she quickly responded to his prompting.

 

“I want to… bathe with you, Duke.”

 



 

There was no response. She glanced at him nervously before speaking again.

 

“…Please bathe with me.”

 

Then, Cardale shrugged off his jacket and vest, tossing them onto the sofa. His cravat, loosened roughly, followed suit.

 

He even took off his shoes and rolled up his sleeves, leaving him in just a thin white shirt and trousers. After glancing at her, he strode away.

 

In the direction of the bathroom.

 

‘I’m glad… I let it slide.’

 

Elise followed him with hesitant steps.

 

The bathtub already held hot water, emitting wisps of steam. Thanks to it, the indoor air had become slightly hazy.

 

Elise carefully placed her basin on the flat edge of the tub and turned around.

 

Cardale stared down at her.

 

It was a silent command to take off the rest of his clothes.

 

Elise walked right in front of him and stretched out her arms.

 

The collar that had been concealed by the cravat was now clearly visible. It looked very elegant, combined with his thick neck.

 

‘I want to touch it once.’

 

Elise was startled by the thought that popped into her mind without her even realising it.

 

‘To think such immodest thoughts, how dare I touch the Duke’s body so carelessly…’

 

Although offering to help with his bath was already bold, Elise tried to push aside her thoughts.

 

As she hesitantly reached for the shirt’s buttons with her slender fingers, a voice sounded above her head.

 

“It’s okay to touch.”

 

A voice fell over her. Elise was startled and raised her head. Then she saw her man with a slow smile on his face.

 

“You’re looking at a man’s body with curiosity, aren’t you?”

 

“Oh, no, I…”

 

“Elise.”

 

A man was sensitive to deception and warned in a slightly harsh voice. She didn’t know that though, so in the end, she had no choice but to nod her head honestly.

 

“If you had told me, I would have let you touch me a long time ago.”

 

As if waiting for this, Cardale swiftly tossed his shirt over his head.

 

“Ah…”

 

Under the light of the candle hanging on the bathroom wall, Elise swallowed a faint gasp as the body of a man more perfect than a statue was revealed.

 

His body full of strong muscles, shined brightly under the yellow light. The appearance was strangely sensual, but it made it impossible to take her eyes off him.

 

“What are you doing?”

 

“Ah…!”

 

Suddenly her wrist was grabbed and she was pulled forward. At the same time, her hand landed on his bare chest.

 

Elise was taken aback and tried to remove her hand quickly, but her grasped wrist did not budge.

 

“Wait a minute…”

 

“Feel it.”

 

Cardale slowly slid her hand down.

 

The tips of her fingers trembled at the feel of his smooth yet firm skin.

 

As she moved down past his thick chest muscles, she could feel the depth of his abs.

 

The taut, protruding and recessed shape was so regular that it was elaborate.

 

How can the human body be so strong and yet so beautiful?

 

“It’s like a suit of armour.”

 

As Elise murmured while touching his tight muscles, Cardale whispered in her ear.

 

“Curious about what’s below, too?”

 

Elise nodded as if mesmerised. He chuckled, tapping her cheek as if finding her adorable.

 

“Unbutton it with your own hands.”

 

Elise obediently lowered herself, kneeling down and raising her thighs. When she undid the buckle and grabbed the hem, he commanded softly.

 

“All at once.”

 

Elise obediently grabbed the briefs inside as well. Then slowly pulled her arms down.

 

With a thud, Elise held her breath as his perfectly erect penis and rock-hard thighs were revealed.

 

“You have to pull all the way down.”

 

Following his command, her hand descended further. When it reached around his knees, his trousers dropped to his ankles.

 

“Good job.”

 

With a hint of laughter, he praised her. Then, lowering his gaze slowly he said, “Now, you need to touch here, too.”

 

Elise’s face heated with embarrassment.

 

‘Why am I feeling so embarrassed when everything I’m touching belongs to the Duke?’

 

He was no longer wearing any clothes. On the other hand, she was only wearing a gown, but her entire body was covered. Despite that, he seemed even more confident.

 

“Hurry.”

 

Following his command to touch, Elise carefully placed her hands on both of his thighs.

 

“Ah…”

 

The moment his bulging muscles touched her palm, she felt the manhood between them swell even tighter.

 

Elise tried not to look at the man, radiating his enormous presence as she slowly smoothed his thighs.

 

“Raise your head.”

 

But Cardale, who noticed her avoidance of his gaze, was not one to be avoided so easily.

 

“Shouldn’t you be grateful and appreciate the grace of your master? For allowing you to play with his body as you please?”

 

“Hmm…!”

 

Immediately, her chin was grabbed and lifted upwards. Looking up from below, his penis was frighteningly large and intimidating.

 

But strangely enough, her body felt warm. As if a fever was rising.

 

“Elise.”

 

Tears welled up in Elise’s eyes as she responded to his call.

 

“Yes…”

 

Beyond the thick and sturdy pillar that divided her field of vision, she saw his face.

 

“What was it like to touch your master’s body?”

 

“Uh….”

 

It was strangely shameful. She was so ashamed and embarrassed that she was having fun touching a man’s body.

 

But Cardale didn’t seem to show any mercy.

 

Instead, he grabbed her with his other hand and prodded up and down. As if searching for something.

 

“Now that you’ve had your fun, it’s time to share your thoughts. Understand?”

 

‘Otherwise, I might get impatient, and who knows what I might do to you.’

 

His voice was tender, yet the warning contained within was undeniably dangerous.


Elise’s hand reached out slowly, looking at the throbbing member before her.

 

Observing her reaction closely, Cardale withdrew the hand that had been exploring his pillar. Instead, he wrapped her small hand around the thick shaft, causing viscous fluid to ooze from the blunt tip.

 

The smooth yet thick flesh that touched her palm felt burning hot.

 

She slowly slid her hand down and up again, as if applying a lotion. She lightly rubbed the veins of the bulging penis against her palm.

 

“Hmm…”

 

Fortunately, he seemed to enjoy the caress as he let out a relaxed sigh with half-lidded eyes.

 

“Keep going.”

 

Elise sighed softly in relief. He wouldn’t be rough today.

 

Although it was rare, there were times when Cardale showed her kindness. She liked him at those times. It was natural for her to want him like this often and for longer periods of time.

 

But when he turned cruel, it was strangely heartbreaking, often bringing tears to her eyes. And when she cried, he usually became even more ruthless.

 

So, Elise did whatever she could to help.

 

She helped the Duke with his work and wrote replies to invitations. She didn’t even dare to think about pulling any tricks.

 

But deep down, she knew it all too well. From the beginning until now, Cardale had only expected one thing from her.

 

That was why she volunteered to take a bath with him despite feeling ashamed and embarrassed at the prospect.

 

Because she wanted to see more of his affection. She wanted to please him.

 

Unbeknownst to herself, it was a little different from just trying to adapt to avoid being driven away.

 

“Ha, Elise…”

 

Cardale uttered her name in a raspy voice.

 

Elise moved her hand with a little more force. The dick was so big she couldn’t even hold it with one hand, and expanded even more.

 

The fully aroused man, his cock slick with transparent fluid, looked like a weapon.

 

When she saw his genitals protruding between her cupped hands, she unconsciously recalled the thrilling sensation that had pierced through her.

 

‘The Duke is inside me every day…’

 

In that moment of consciousness, her belly blazed with heat, and she felt herself becoming moist below. Unconsciously, she pressed her thighs together.

 

“That’s enough.”

 

At that moment, a low voice came from above her. Startled, Elise looked up at him.

 

‘Did I make a mistake by letting my mind wander?’

 

Her blue eyes trembled anxiously.

 

“Oh, uh…”

 

“I liked it, don’t overthink it.”

 

“Ah…”

 

“Stand up.”

 

Only then did Elise stand up from her hesitant position. Still, he was much shorter than Cardale, so she still had to raise her head to look at his face.

 

“What were you thinking that made your cheeks blush like this?”

 

As his hand caressed her cheek, her fever rose even further. She felt a thin liquid flowing between her thighs.

 

Elise stuttered as she spoke.

 

“I, I just…”

 

“Did you like touching me?”

 

“Y- yes.”

 

She nodded quickly. It was less shameful than telling him that she remembered how she had been held all night.

 

Moreover, even if she denied it, it was impossible to deceive him. She learned through many nights that she would have to pay a price if she was caught lying.

 

“I enjoyed it…”

 

As she honestly replied, his gaze softened slowly.

 

“Well, then. You’ve had enough fun.”

 

Cardale grabbed the strap that fastened Elise’s gown.

 

“Now it’s my turn.”

 

“Oh!”

 

His large hands tugged at the straps. In an instant, the gown opened, revealing her naked body.

 

Cardale looked at her breasts, plump like fresh bread, her nipples light pink, her stomach smooth and flat, and silvery pub!c hair neatly gathered between her tightly pressed thighs.

 

“Ah…”

 

His lazy gaze was so persistent and meticulous that Elise tightly curled the tips of her toes without even realising it.

 

It wasn’t unexpected, but she was still nervous and embarrassed.

 

He asked, brushing her collarbone with his long, white fingertips.

 

“Did you prepare anything in advance while I was gone?”

 

He said that after realising that she had washed herself. Elise nodded.

 

“Why?”

 

“I wanted to prepare well for the bath…”

 

“Then prepare some pleasant sounds for me to listen to.”

 

His fingertips went down and touched her stomach. Expecting him to go to her chest, she flinched.

 

“Duke… Ah!”

 

His large hands ran through her soft pub!c hair and pressed against her sensitive flesh.

 

Elise closed her thighs with more pressure, but it was no use. His four fingers penetrated easily and rubbed at the crack. Cardale murmured, lightly rubbing her dainty bump with his thumb.

 

“Your  other parts are so smooth, but this one has become quite wet.”

 

“Ugh…!”

 

“Spread your legs.”

 

He commanded, tapping firmly between her trembling legs. As she spread them wider, his hands gripped her thighs tightly, as if enveloping the space between.

 

“Ah!”

 

The sensation of her delicate flesh being rubbed against the rough side of his palm was dizzying. Stars flew before her eyes, and her back trembled.

 

“Even after wiping it all, you still let it flow so much… You’ve endured well.”

 

“Yes, ah, ah…!”

 

Her feverish body quickly reached a mild climax.

 

Elise tilted her head back and looked up at him with hazy, blurred eyes. A gasp escaped her open mouth.

 

“Hah…”

 

Cardale looked down at her. A woman who had honestly responded to the pleasure he gave her.

 

“This isn’t just for fun, isn’t this actually a service?”

 

Despite his words, he seemed eager. He wanted to see a more intense reaction from her. In the face of pleasure solely because of him. What kind of expression would this woman make in front of him with pleasure completely pouring into her?

 

With one knee bent, he gripped her thighs tightly, firmly holding her in place.

 

Just as Elise was beginning to regain her senses, she belatedly realised that her position and his eye level had switched.

 

“What… What are you doing…?”

 

Hot, soft lips touched her private area. Her back arched like a bow, and she let out a moan.

 

“No, stop, it’s… it’s dirty…”

 

“You just washed, so what’s dirty?”

 

“Don’t… Don’t talk so close… Ah…!”

 

Her sensitive entrance quivered at the ticklish vibrations from his laughter and his warm breath.

 

“Using your hands won’t help.”

 

“Uhh…!”

 

He slowly licked upwards again. Her fluid coating his tongue felt like honey.

 

“Since I’m already in the position to serve, I thought I might as well have some different fun.”

 

“Wait, ha! Ah!”

 

“What are you complaining about?”

 

He gently rubbed and licked her soft flesh as if tasting it. When he rolled the swollen, sensitive protuberance with his tongue and lightly touched it with his teeth, Elise let out a series of moans.

 

“This… this is strange… Ah, stop… Please, stop…”

 

“Stop?”

 

Cardale held her tightly to prevent her from lifting her legs as she kept trying to close them.

 

“What nonsense.”

 

Then as if to punish her for making nonsensical noise, he devoured her soft flesh in one bite, he vigorously sucked causing the sounds to no longer resemble words.

 

“Aaahhh!”

 

The strong suction made her vagina gush with love juice, moistening her entrance.

 

“It’s like you pour non-stop.”

 

His tongue invaded her narrow crevice, where the sweet fluids flowed from.

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

As the soft lump of flesh dug inside her and rubbed against her vaginal walls, Elise twisted her waist and tried to push his shoulder away.

 

However, the man’s upper body was as hard as stone. It didn’t move, instead the tongue prodding the delicate mucous membrane within intensified.

 

Each irregular flick of his tongue against her sensitive centre made her cries louder.

 

“Ah, ah…! Yes, ah!”

 

He deliberately controlled the woman’s pleasure by watching her reactions. When her lower body became so wet that it seemed like it was melting, he vigorously sucked in the plump, bright red bud.

 

“Huh!”

 

Elise reached her peak as a dizzying feeling of pleasure struck the top of her head, as if she had been struck by lightning.

 

Cardale quickly caught her body in his arms as she was unable to hold on and about to collapse.

 

“Ha, ah…”

 

He looked down with satisfaction at the woman shaking in his arms from the lingering orgasm.

 

“Your legs are so weak that you can’t even stand properly…”

 

Cardale gently lifted Elise’s back and thighs.

 

Then, still feeling the steam rising from the bathtub, he carried her into the water.

 

“Tsk…”

 

“Is it hot?”

 

Nodding, Elise couldn’t even respond and only moved her head, burying her face in his chest.

 

Even though it might be annoying, he chose to sit on the edge of the bathtub.

 

He scooped up the water with his hands and wetted her woman’s feet, legs, and thighs. In turn, allowing her to adjust to the temperature of the water easier.

 

After getting into the bathtub, he hugged her small body from behind and gently massaged her thighs, as they had become stiff from holding on and giving her strength.

 

Her body must have grown tired, since Elise leaned against his chest.

 

Cardale looked down at the woman’s round head.

 

“Elise.”

 

“Yes…?”

 

Even though she was exhausted, her face was bright red as she looked up.

 



 

When he looked at those innocent eyes, there were times when a part of his heart would suddenly start pounding.

 

Even though he knew she was sold by her father to be by his side, even though he bought her.

 

When he saw her relying on him, when he saw her rejoicing in the kindness he showed her as a test, he couldn’t help but think it wasn’t a calculation on her part.

 

Maybe he developed an affection for this woman…

 

“Duke?”

 

Cardale deliberately stopped his thoughts. It was his instinct to sense danger that made that possible.“Nothing.”

 

Cardale quickly shook off his thoughts and hugged Elise’s body from behind.

 

‘Yes. I’m just enjoying her body. I am just satisfied with the warm, soft skin and the hot moisture inside.’

 

Even though he liked the woman, he didn’t bother to give a reason. But the subtle discomfort did not go away.

 

His choice to embrace Elize was undoubtedly to dispel that discomfort.

 

Cardale wrapped his arms around her waist and buried his head in her slender, delicate neck.

 

There was a faint scent of sweat on her squishy flesh.

 

As he gently caressed her small, round shoulders, Elise turned her head to look at him.

 

“What?”

 

“Um, just a moment.”

 

Elise subtly pulled away. Not showing any signs of refusal, Cardale momentarily let his guard down and let her slip away.

 

Thanks to that, Elise easily escaped from Cardale. With small splashes, she made her way to the opposite edge of the bathtub.

 

“Elise, what are you doing now?”

 

“I almost forgot.”

 

She turned around, holding a basin firmly. Then she approached him again with determination.

 

“I was going to wash you.”

 

Cardale’s astonishment turned into a puzzled expression.

 

“Am I a child?”

 

Elise answered timidly yet firmly as she shrunk back.

 

“But still… I planned to give you a bath. Linda taught me how.”

 

Adding that she had practised while waiting, her face looked somewhat serious.

 

“Well then, go ahead.”

 

As Cardale let her do as she wished, Elise’s expression brightened slightly.

 

She felt strangely drawn in. However, it wasn’t particularly unpleasant.

 

“Um, then, please stand up first.”

 

‘Asking for quite a lot, huh?’

 

Despite that, he obediently stood up. He had the discretion to indulge her cute gestures.

 

Elise lathered soap on the soft cloth soaked in water, creating bubbles, and approached Cardale a little closer.

 

“In case I rub too hard… if it hurts, please let me know?”

 

Cardale chuckled.

 

He was almost wondering how on earth those thin arms and fabric could hurt him.

 

“If anyone hears this, they might think it’s not cloth in your hands, but a whip.”

 

The tips of her ears blushed at his teasing words, but she gently placed the foaming cloth on his chest.

 

Then she started rubbing slowly. The slippery, soapy water gently lathered against his firm, muscular skin.

 

As the pleasant scent of the soap reached her nose, she smiled in spite of herself. She became a little more meticulous with her hands.

 

“Umm, could you please raise your arms?”

 

Obediently, his arms were raised. Elise tilted her head and rubbed his sides before turning behind him.

 

His back, as strong as a rock, was also packed with muscle.

 

She remembered Linda’s advice that it was better to scrub the back a little harder. She rubbed the middle of it a little more vigorously.

 

As she did so, she climbed up little by little, covering every part of him with pure white foam, and had just reached the top of his shoulders.

 

‘Ah…’

 

She let out a small breath.

 

There was a scar that looked very old. As if something had dug deep inside him and pulled out something lodged within.

 

Only traces remained now, but she could tell. It must have been a very deep and painful wound for him.

 

That was when Elise touched the area with the tips of her slender fingers without realising it.

 

“Oh!”

 

In an instant, Cardale turned his body and grabbed Elise’s wrist.

 

Elise gasped, dropping the cloth she was holding. His red pupils met her with a sinister gleam.

 

It was when the suddenly chilling atmosphere left Elise at a loss for what to do.

 

Cardale broke the brief silence.

 

“It looks like your skin is crawling.”

 

He softened his tone, sensing his woman’s fear.

 

He hadn’t intended to provoke her fear so deliberately. He simply couldn’t control his reflex.

 

“You said you’d hurt me, but all you’re doing is tickling.”

 

He loosened the grip on her wrist and gently brushed his thumb over the reddened skin.

 

It was like conveying an apology through actions.

 

“It’s, it’s okay.”

 

She smiled as if nothing was wrong, but for some reason, she felt even more anxious. So he couldn’t help but say a word to her.

 

“You just got scared.”

 

A shivering face filled with fear. Though he had seen it countless times before, it felt unsettling now.

 

“I touched the Duke’s scar without permission. So, I should…”

 

“I was shot by a hunting gun when I was young.”

 

Suddenly, Elise looked at him in surprise from his words.

 

“My mother needed someone to vent her anger onto.”

 

Realising the meaning behind his self-deprecating words, she covered her mouth with both hands.

 

“How could she…”

 

“It wasn’t a large issue. I deliberately provoked her to shoot me.”

 

Cardale looked into the woman’s trembling eyes and spoke calmly.

 

“She said I was horrible and dreadful. But she wasn’t wrong.”

 

After all, it’s not every day someone invites gunshot wounds onto their own body. It was his way of mocking himself.

 

“T-That’s not…”

 

Elise unintentionally raised her voice, then embarrassedly lowered her head. In a soft, timid voice, she added,

 

“That’s not the Duke’s fault…”

 



 

Cardale stared at Elise quietly. Her silver head, half wet with water, seemed particularly shiny.

 

“Alright.”

 

With a brief reply, he picked up the cloth that had fallen into the bathtub.

 

“Now, is it my turn?”

 

“Huh?”

 

A look of surprise flashed across her face. In the blink of an eye, he lathered soap onto the cloth and clasped Elise’s wrists with one hand.

 

So she can never escape.

 

“It’s unfair to only wash one person.”

 

“Ah…!”

 

It didn’t take long for a sweet sound to escape her lips.

 

He clearly showed her what kind of pleasure she could feel with a thin cloth and slippery, soapy water.

 

“Ugh, ah!”

 

The sensation of his hands rubbing and swirling all over her body with just the right pressure was both exhilarating and tingling, and Elise quickly reached her peak under his touch once more.

 

“What can I do if you like how I wash you this much?”

 

Cardale whispered as he held her trembling body, collapsing again with pleasure.

 

“Uhh”

 

“Come to think of it, we’ve never done it in the bathroom before, have we?”

 

Before Elise knew it, her back was touching the wet bathroom wall.

 

Unlike the muggy air inside, the temperature from the tiles was cooler, so Elise shivered.

 

“Are you already shaking with anticipation?”

 

“T-that’s not… Ah!”

 

Before she could answer, her lips were sealed shut. Unable to move under the weight of the man pressing down on her, she was soon greeted by his thick tongue invading her mouth.

 

“Umm…”

 

Unlike the somewhat rushed intrusion, the kiss was gentle.

 

His tongue roamed around her mouth, gradually awakening her senses.

 

With each stroke and caress of his velvety tongue against her, a pleasant warmth gradually emerged. When he touched and intertwined their tongues, her body floated up and then sank back down.

 

Unconsciously, Elise reached out her arms over his shoulders and wrapped them around his neck. Sensing her movement, Cardale tilted his head and delved his tongue deeper.

 

‘More, just a little more…’

 

She was becoming more intoxicated with ecstasy. Then suddenly, one of her legs was lifted wide open.

 

“Ugh!”

 

Her moan from the first penetration could barely escape her blocked lips.

 

Her vagina had become soggy from previous climaxes and easily swallowed her man’s penis.

 

“Huh, huh!”

 

Cardale lifted her waist, pressing her down tightly. Elise closed her eyes as his sensitive tongue curled around her’s. The sensation of being thrust up and down from underneath her swirled awareness.

 

Then, the feeling of the thick penis penetrating her became clearer. When it gently scratched an itchy spot, or her favourite spot, she could feel her insides tightening with joy.

 

It was lewd. But for some reason, she didn’t want it to stop. Elise gave her arms around his neck as much strength as she could. Her lips interlocked deeper and her tongue licked him promiscuously.

 

The bathroom rang with a loud noise, as if someone stepped on a wet puddle.

 

As her mind gradually became blank from the pleasure pounding her entire body, a star suddenly exploded before her eyes.

 

“Ugh!”

 

“Ah… Uhhh!”

 

It was a climax that came for both of them at the same time. He hugged her tightly, afraid to let her go.

 

Until her body stopped shaking and trembling.

 



 

After that, it was only after she had two more orgasms that Elise was able to leave the bathroom.

 

Cardale left her untouched in his bed, as his body was also so drained it was almost flaccid. Instead, he held her in his arms and gently stroked her long silver hair.

 

Elise, also tired from the unusually long lovemaking and bathing, slowly blinked her dull eyes.

 

Cardale was trying to watch her until she fell asleep, but suddenly remembered Michael’s report.

 

“Elise.”

 

“Yes…?”

 

In fact, he guessed that her situation with him would not have been much different since the Empire treated illegitimate children quite clearly.

 

However, he bothered to ask because he wanted to be certain.

 

Depending on Elise’s answer, he could decide how to treat her.

 

“How has Fritz Schuvan treated you?”

The tension in Elise’s body had just relaxed for a moment, then increased.

 



 

Cardale was holding her in his arms, and quickly noticed this. His eyes became narrow.

 

He remembered when Elise was shaking like this before. It was definitely a night of heavy rain. Even though she was in his arms, she couldn’t calm down for a long time, afraid.

 

So this was enough of an answer for him.

 

It wasn’t difficult to guess that Elise was particularly weak and helpless, which also meant that Fritz Schuvan had a big stake in making her this way.

 

‘Was it abuse?’

 

This assumption, which was nothing short of a certainty, displeased Cardale.

 

It was strange.

 

What does the past of the woman he holds in his arms have to do with him?

 

While Cardale was lost in thought due to the flow of strange feelings, Elise touched her lips.

 

“Uh, I left the Count’s mansion when I was young… I lived in the slums alone with my mother. So…”

 

Cardale remembered the day he first saw her. She attracted attention because she was so shabby and unsightly.

 

Yes, that was exactly like someone from the slums. So it wouldn’t be strange if she had started begging back then.

 

“So… I get along well with Mr. Fritz…”

 

Mr. Fritz. 

 

The woman’s past she was vaguely implying, troubled him once again.

 

“So after that, you must have returned to being a noblewoman.”

 

Asking, despite knowing, was a twisted judgement on his part. He didn’t press her aggressively or intimidatingly, though.

 

As he gently rubbed her back and whispered sweetly, the woman seemed to gain courage and answered, even in a soft voice.

 

“For the past year, Fritz was at the academy, so we hardly ever saw each other.”

 

“I see.”

 

“Yes.”

 

Cardale tucked a strand of hair that fell down her cheek behind her ear.

 

“So, you must have only seen him a few days before you came here.”

 

Elise nodded.

 

“But why are you trembling like this?”

 

“M-Me…?”

 

Her stammering resembled a deer caught in the sights of a hunter, just after narrowly avoiding being shot in the leg.

 

That didn’t sit well with him either. After all the prettiness she displayed, there was no reason not to listen if she gently hinted at something.

 

Elise truly didn’t expect anything from him. She didn’t even have the habit to ask for anything without being prompted.

 



 

He had paid the price to Gerhard Schuvan, so it was he who ordered her to keep quiet now.

 

She was calm and obedient without any complaints, so he thought there was no toy more convenient than her.

 

But why was her silence so unpleasant now? Even Cardale herself did not understand.

 

However, the feeling this subtle change brought about was unpleasant, and his need to relieve it was strong and he didn’t bother to endure it.

 

“Shall I take care of him?”

 

Elise’s eyes widened at the sudden comment.

 

“I mean I will let him be punished if you want.”

 

“M-Mr. Fritz?”

 

“Is that what you call your brother?”

 

“Oh, that’s…”

 

“Since Gerhard Schuvan recognised and registered you in the family registry, no matter how much Fritz disagrees, you are a Schuvan. What a disrespectful term only someone considered a slave would use.”

 

Even though it wasn’t her fault, Elise’s face became pale.

 

Cardale, not wanting to distress the troubled woman needlessly, instead provided an answer.

 

“Just call him Fritz. No one here cares how you address him.”

 

“B-but…”

 

Elise didn’t know what to do. But of course, she couldn’t defy him, and Cardale heard the answer he wanted from her.

 

But not everything went as she wanted.

 

“It’s already happened, so there’s no need to punish him now…It’s okay now.”

 

It’s okay. On the subject of still being afraid of rainy days.

 

He listened to the foolish words of the weak-hearted deer with one ear and let them slip out the other.

 

As for how to deal with Fritz Schuvan, he had already decided, regardless of his woman’s wishes.

 

“You must be tired, go to sleep first.”

 

As Cardale got up, he adjusted Elise’s blanket. She carefully rolled up the edge and asked timidly.

 

“What about the Duke…?”

 

“I have work to do.”

 

It was still too early for him.

 

If they hadn’t been occupied in the bathroom earlier, they could have enjoyed a little more time together, but Elise tired out too quickly.

 

“Why? Do you want to do more?”

 

“N-No…!”

 

Cardale saw Elise’s hands desperately clutch the blanket.

 

“Haha…”

 

He was shocked and dumbfounded by the reaction and burst out laughing.

 

That blanket can be torn up at a moment’s notice if he wants.

 

But he barely remembered that just moments ago, he carried an almost exhausted Elise.

 

She was already a weak woman.

 

She would push herself so hard that she would often feel sore the next day.

 

And that would be a loss for him.

 

Cardale had finished calculating, or more accurately, rationalising, and was about to get out of bed when Elise called him.

 

“Duke.”

 

It was a small voice that could barely be heard, but he understood without any problem and turned his head.

 

Elise said shyly, pulling the blanket up to her chin.

 

“Even still… Please don’t overwork yourself.”

 

“But then you’ll end up overworking yourself.”

 

“M-Me…?”

 

Cardale briefly sucked the lips of the confused woman, then let go before he whispered.

 

“It means don’t worry and sleep.”

 

He personally extinguished all but one candle in the bedroom and left the room.

 

There was a faint smile on his lips.

 



 

Gerhard stayed in his office later than usual before he eventually stood up.

 

This was because the business, which was on track and showing rapid growth, made him busy without a second’s notice.

 

To get from his office to his bedroom, he had to pass through the central entrance hall, and his path would coincidentally overlapped with that of Fritz. Returning home in the middle of the night.

 

Recently, the relationship between the father and son had reached a lull after being almost acrimonious for a time.

 

So, this was a somewhat unexpected situation for both of them.

 

‘You drank too much again.’

 

Gerhard had no intention of talking to his pitiful son. So he tried to pass by without even looking in his direction.

 

“Ah, hi! Long time no see… father.”

 

Fritz greeted his father. Even though he was heavily drunk, his tone was strangely sarcastic.

 

Gerhard twisted his face.

 

“Did you come here this late after drinking again?”

 

Fritz was not particularly bothered by his father’s disapproval.

 

Partly because he had drunk so much that he couldn’t properly control himself, but also because he was just a leisurely person.

 

“I’ve been in a lot of trouble these days… Ugh, in the clubhouse, hicc! Came back from the clubhouse with friends to lighten the mood a bit.”

 

“A guy who only knows how to spend his father’s money, also shares his agony with those idiots? That’s nothing special.”

 

Gerhard clicked his tongue, annoyed they were having such a useless conversation at this time of night.

 

“Father, you are too strict. Hehehe, you don’t even know what I’m doing.”

 

“I don’t want to know.”

 

Gerhard cut in coldly.

 

“All you do is hang out with useless people. It won’t help this family.”

 

Fritz’s eyes rolled back as his pride was damaged by such a blatant reprimand.

 

“Family! Damn family!”

 

He shouted.

 

“If your family is that important! Then you have to take care of your only heir!”

 

Even though he was drunk and tired, his eyes were filled with an eerie maliciousness.

 

“Do you hate me so much?”

 

Gerhard’s voice rose in response to his son’s attitude, showing no signs of reflection but instead a negative attitude.

 

“The only heir? Are you really making such a big fuss because you believe that?”

 

“Well who else should you give everything to?”

 

With a hint of catching a weakness, Fritz chuckled.

 

“Why give it to someone other than me? Is there someone from a collateral family who can be useful?”

 

Perhaps due to the burst of anger, he was halfway sober now. But leveraging the alcohol, Fritz mocked his father to his heart’s content.

 

“By the way, I know my father best, right?”

 

“What?”

 

“It’s also true that you are not the kind of person to pass on this family and it’s enormous business to someone who is not even of your bloodline.”

 

He chuckled.

 

“So even if I’m not trustworthy, there’s nothing you can do about it.”

 

‘In the end, the only person my father can choose is me.’

 

Fritz grinned, showing his teeth, then bowed his waist to give an exaggerated bow. As if he was teasing his opponent.

 

“Then I’ll just go in and sleep.”

 

He staggered towards his bedroom with twisted steps.

 

Gerhard glared at his back, then turned around.

 

‘Only son.’

 

A cold sneer appeared on his face.

 

He felt like he needed to see his mistress before the heatwave passed.


The first place Gerhard visited within the estate was a villa in the mountains.

 

His beloved mistress was staying at the villa he deliberately purchased under a borrowed name.

 

No, she was trapped there.

 

A soldier that had been on tight guard spotted the count and bowed deeply.

 

“Was everything alright?”

 

“Yes. Just as I reported.”

 

Gerhard nodded and went straight inside.

 

Despite the restrictions on unauthorised entry and the fact that those inside couldn’t leave without permission, the villa was rather cosy and quaint.

 

He passed some low-growing and landscaped shrubs, a small fountain, and a quaint garden before entering the building.

 

The interior was also comfortably decorated in calm tones. This colour helped the stability of those staying here.

 

Of course, it also reflected the taste of the owner who would occasionally visit this place.

 

Gerhard went up to the second floor along the central staircase directly visible from the entrance.

 

The structure had several rooms connected in a row. Maids stood guard in each room.

 

After passing as many as three rooms, he came to the mistress’ bedroom.

 

He opened the door without delay.

 

A spicy herbal scent that had been accumulating in the room flowed out the door. It had a strong contraceptive tea scent.

 

‘She’s meticulous about taking them.’

 

He narrowed his eyes in dissatisfaction.

 

As most nobles did, he did not care about his illegitimate children.

 

He discarded one and was indifferent whether the other lived or died.

 

At the same time, he was bothered that his mistress resorted to contraceptives because she didn’t want to have another of his children.

 

In addition, she was thinner than the last time he saw her.

 

“I told you to eat properly.”

 

Gerhard opened his mouth with a hint of displeasure. The woman, sitting with her back against the head of the bed, lowered her head and did not even look at him.

 

His face was naturally distorted.

 

That was when he strode across her room, grasped her chin, and lifted her up.

 

Thud, her bony arm, roughly pushed his hand away.

 

“Marissa.”

 

“Is it true?”

 

She glared at Gerhard with tearful eyes. Her usual fragile and gentle appearance was nowhere to be seen.

 

“Did you really send Elise to become the Duke of Vassenberg’s mistress?”

 

Gerhard was silent for a moment. The answer that followed was not at all what Marissa expected.

 

“Who told you?”

 

She looked at her old master with a puzzled face.

 

“Is that important right now?”

 

“Who told you that, Marissa?”

 

Marissa despaired as she watched Gerhard calmly questioning the person who spread that information.

 

“How could you do that!”

 

She screamed in a voice that couldn’t even come out properly.

 

“I told you my only wish. I said I would do anything if you granted it! But how, how could you do this!”

 

‘I just didn’t want my daughter to live like me.’

 

She desperately hoped Elise would meet a man who loved her and be able to live normally. With little joys, like other people.

 

She hoped Elise would never know this misery, sorrow, pain and despair… She prayed to God every day.

 

But all those efforts were meaningless. Her earnest wish was trampled upon.

 

“You’re not even human. If you were, you wouldn’t do something like this!”

 

Marissa clutched her chest and screamed. Eventually, she couldn’t hold back her anger, and rushed at him.

 

“Bring her to me right away. Bring my daughter out of hell!”

 

It was then. 

 

Slap! 

 

The sharp sound of skin hitting skin echoed in the room.

 

“Insolent.”

 

Marissa’s desperate movements stopped in the face of merciless violence.

 

“You dare to challenge your master? You have lost your manners.”

 

He looked down with cold eyes at the woman lying on her bed with her cheek red.

 

“You’ve been lacking in education all this time, Marissa.”

 

Gerhard’s eyes then filled with lust. Marissa, sprawled out in shock, her throbbing cheeks and ribs feeling like they were going to tremble, noticed this too.

 

“Let go of me! I hate this!”

 

She tried desperately to evade him, but it was futile. Gerhard quickly subdued her, pinning her to the bed and forcefully pressed his lips against hers.

 

“Ugh!”

 

But he soon rose with a short moan.

 

Spitting out saliva, blood surged. Marisa had bitten his tongue with all her might.

 

Frustrated by the rebellion, Gerhard mercilessly wielded his large, thick hands.

 

Smack! Swish! Smack!

 

The violence ended only after several more slaps. Threatening words poured out of the man’s teeth.

 

“You seem stupid. Don’t you still understand that if you behave like this, Elise will have a harder time?”

 

It worked.

 

Marissa’s body had been holding on despite being slapped, now gradually lost its strength.

 

“If you want to see your daughter again, behave yourself.”

 

Gerhard climbed on top of her and whispered darkly.

 

Marissa cried for a long time that night.

 



 

Gerhard left the room.

 

“Go in and sort it out.”

 

Vanessa, who was waiting outside, let the maids inside.

 

“Are you going back right away?”

 

“No. I’ll leave tomorrow when the sun rises.”

 

After Gerhard left, Vanessa looked around for a moment then entered Marissa’s bedroom.

 

The bed had already been neatly made and covered with new bedding.

 

The sound of water was heard in the bathroom next to it. The maids appeared to be washing Marissa.

 

Vanessa waited quietly for Marissa to leave her bath.

 

Sometime later, a thin and haggard woman came out of the bathroom, leaning on the maids.

 

She had a blank look on her face, as if she had lost everything.

 

Still, she was beautiful. Her brown hair was lush, and her eyes were a clear, vivid blue.

 

The maids dressed Marissa in her usual clothes, wiped the moisture from her hair, then moved her to the bed.

 

“Leave, now.”

 

Vanessa dismissed all the maids, and sat at the bedside. Marissa was sitting at an angle with several pillows behind her.

 

“Marissa.”

 

She quietly called his name, but there was no answer.

 

“I have something to tell you.”

 

As expected, she didn’t respond. Her closed eyes didn’t even open.

 

Vanessa was busy shaking her head as she looked down at Marissa.

 

‘If I must speak, the only time is now.’

 

Gerhard usually visited the villa alone. As soon as he finished his work, he would leave immediately.

 

Therefore, it was rare for Vanessa to be able to have a conversation with Marissa.

 

‘You need to know for sure. And if my predictions are correct…’

 

Vanessa recalled Damian from Gerhard’s weaving workshop. Looking at Marissa’s face now, it seemed like the two looked even more alike.

 

There was a reason why Vanessa took this little risk and approached Marissa herself.

 

‘I can’t just trust Gerhard Schuvan.’

 

Vanessa was too smart and weak to believe in promises that could be broken at any time despite giving him her all.

 

She had seen through Gerhard enough to know that he could use his status as bait and exploit her for years to come.

 

‘I have no choice but to prepare for other possibilities for the future.’

 

However, she had to be careful about which possibilities to pursue. For now, it wasn’t Fritz Schuvan.

 

Because he was the Count’s only son, she might have just pretended to be supportive out of obligation, but he was equally unreliable.

 

And now that she had found out about Damian’s existence, Vanessa had decided that Fritz had no value to her whatsoever.

 

However, she needed to check one last time before making any hasty moves.

 

Vanessa chose her words carefully.

 

“Did Elise, by any chance…”

 

At the mention of Elise’s name, Marissa flinched.

 

“…have a brother?”

 

As soon as she finished speaking, Marissa’s eyes opened. Her blue eyes flickered slightly.

 

“How did you…?”

 

The voice, weak and seemed to easily break, was also trembling like an aspen tree.

 

Vanessa looked straight at her and spoke directly.

 

“I saw him recently.”

 

That was enough to give Marissa an unprecedented shock.

 

Shock, confusion, bewilderment, and disbelief spread across her face one after another.

 

“Don’t tell me nonsense.”

 

Marissa said, her body shaking.

 

“Shortly after the child was born, he passed away. How…”

 

“Did you personally witness the child’s death?”

 

It felt like she could hear Marissa’s heart pounding. Vanessa asked, gathering her momentum.

 

“Or did you check on the dead child yourself?”

 

“I-I…”

Now, Marissa’s eyes couldn’t even focus properly. She couldn’t come to her senses due to the overwhelming amount of shocking information.

 

“I think Count Schuvan took the child away as soon as it was born.”

 

“Ahhh…”

 

Only her incomprehensible moans poured out between her gaping lips.

 

“His name is Damian.”

 

Suddenly, silent tears poured from Marissa’s eyes.

 

Afterwards, each and every piece of news about Damian that Vanessa delivered was stuck in her heart.

 

He was the child she had carried, the child she hadn’t even been able to feed or hold once. She felt guilt even thinking about it.

 

But the child was alive. He grew up well and became an adult.

 

Marissa sobbed silently, clutching her torn heart.

 

“I will help you.”

 

A while later, Vanessa’s words were a sweet temptation.

 

Even though Marissa couldn’t stop crying, she didn’t hide her disbelief.

 

“I know what you did to Elise.”

 

Her words implied that she wouldn’t blindly trust Vanessa.

 

“I understand. But it doesn’t change the fact that I’m the only one who can help you and daughter and Damian.”

 

Vanessa didn’t bother to say anything further.

 

“So choose wisely.”

 

Instead, she opted for the approach Marissa favoured.

 

“Either waste away in this secluded villa day by day, or find your son and live a dignified life with your daughter.”

 

Marissa’s choices were clear.

It was already late summer.

 

Elise went for a walk again at the appointed time.

 

It was hot even in the morning, so it was good to go out this early. She liked the deep green colour of the garden, the stronger smell of grass, and the sound of cicadas chirping.

 

Elise felt like everything was expressing with their whole being that they were living.

 

She walked along the now familiar path, unaware that someone was always looking down on her.

 

Sweat quickly formed on her forehead.

 

When she thought she had walked enough, she came across her favourite bench. Elise carefully sat down on the right side of her bench and tilted her parasol on her shoulder.

 

She sighed and wiped her forehead when she saw the white corridor. That was why she loved this place so much.

 

Purple morning glories were in full bloom among the green vines that wrapped around her arch.

 

‘It is said that the purple morning glory means noble.’

 

Elise naturally remembered a man who perfectly suited the symbolism of those flowers.

 

‘…The Duke must be busy, right?’

 

There weren’t many times she could see him unless they were spending the night together.

 

But for Elise, just being able to climb into his bed was enough. She was simply grateful that he still had something to gain from her.

 

“I hope you can see my mother soon…” 

 

She actually wanted to ask how things were going. But every time she thought about that, she held back for fear of appearing to be urging him on.

 

“Has your health improved? It’s a hot day. I hope you’re doing well…”

 

In this weather, even healthy people could easily become exhausted. Although her mother continued to receive treatment and improve, Elise was always worried if her mother, as weak as she was, would be holding up well.

 

Before she knew it, her gaze had dropped to the ground. Elise thought as she nudged the bare floor with her toe.

 

‘I’m definitely going to ask the Duke today.’

 

After their intense love affair, when he embraced her like a wild beast and caressed her body, enjoying the pleasure as he was satisfied.

 

After times like that, his usual sharp demeanour softened and became more gentle.

 

Of course, Elise never took advantage of that to ask for anything.

 

But she felt, almost intuitively, that he was in a good mood to ask for a favour.

 

“When the Duke seems to be in a good mood, if I say something…”

 

As she muttered softly, a black shadow appeared over her head.

 

‘Uh…?’

 

Before she realised the shadow had fallen, Elise’s gaze was taken elsewhere.

 

There was a leather shoe.

 

The shape, design, and colour of the black leather was slightly different. However, there was only one man in the mansion who wore custom shoes of this size.

 

Elise lifted her head. Her master of this mansion, with his beautiful face, was looking down on her.

 

“Duke?”

 

Her eyes widened as she met his bright red gaze.

 

‘I thought that he was busy with work at this hour.’

 

That was something she naturally learned as she helped the Duke with his work.

 

His day was so busy and without breaks. It was a tight schedule of work, training, and then work again. Then it would finally end late in the evening.

 

So, night was his only time of rest. But even then, he would spend hours having sex with her.

 

So, she often worried when he would get a break from his work.

 

The assumption that she could be a resting place for him, wasn’t something she really considered.

 

“Tell me.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“You said you had something to tell me.”

 

Elise was so shocked that she almost let out a small scream.

 

“Oh, how… could you have… possibly heard…”

 

“Yes. I heard.”

 

Her face flushed red. She was too embarrassed that her muttered words slipped out without a filter.

 

“What did you want to say?”

 

“Well…”

 

She clasped her parasol tightly with both hands and looked at him. The man’s face, bathed in sunlight, was particularly dazzling. Handsome and refined.

 

Was that why? Somehow, it was difficult for her to meet his eyes, so she quietly avoided his gaze.

 

Thunk, Cardale took the parasol from her. With his other hand, then gently cupped her cheek and jaw.

 

Elise’s lips parted slightly.

 

“Elise.”

 

“Yes…”

 

“I’m feeling quite good right now. So if you have something you want to say, say it now.”

 

Now is her best chance.

 

He subtly hinted at the threat that if she didn’t speak up when given the chance, he wouldn’t listen.

 

Taking his words at face value, Elise hesitated, but eventually spoke.

 

“I was just curious about how things were going with the favour I asked for…”

 

“The favour you asked for?”

 

Did he really forget? Elise, flustered, quickly added.

 

“Um, arranging a meeting with my mother…”

 

“Ah.”

 

Cardale let out a short sigh as if understanding.

 

“It seems there’s none by her description in Count Schuvan’s jurisdiction. So she must be staying in the fief.”

 

For the woman looking up at him with earnest eyes, he easily explained.

 

“We’ll soon locate her whereabouts, so don’t fret and just wait.”

 

“Yes…”

 

Elise nodded gently, blinking innocently.

 

But she didn’t fully comprehend Cardale’s words.

 

‘I thought it would be as simple as the Duke mentioning it to my father… Is there something I don’t know?’

 

Count Schuvan knew about her mother’s whereabouts. So Elise thought Cardale was just persuading Gerhard to let her meet her mother.

 

‘It seems more complicated than I thought.’

 

Cardale easily read her fleeting thoughts.

 

‘You can’t meet her through Gerhard Schuvan.’

 

In truth, the easiest way to manipulate Gerhard was to offer him crumbs.

 

At least for a one-time thing.

 

But considering Elise’s attachment to her mother, it was only a matter of time before once became twice, and then thrice.

 

In the process, Gerhard would surely catch on.

 

The possibility that he could negotiate with the Duke using the leverage he held.

 

However, Cardale had no intention of bargaining from an equal position. He was going to remove Marisa from Gerhard Shuban’s grip completely.

 

‘So you can be completely tied to me.’

 

Beyond the fact that someone else held Elise’s leash, it had become intolerable to him now.

 

He needed to completely sever it to feel at ease.

 

‘Once we secure Marissa’s whereabouts, you’ll be completely dependent on me.’

 

Cardale stroked Elise’s cheek gently.

 

No matter how many times he touched her, the soft and smooth sensation never tired him. The melting feeling hidden beneath her clothes was even more enticing.

 

“Elise.”

 

“Yes, Duke.”

 

Even when he repeatedly looked into those blue eyes, he was never satisfied.

 

“Do you really worry about your mother that much?”

 

Elise nodded briskly.

 

“My mother’s health is fragile… She struggles during the hot summers and cold winters.”

 

“I see.”

 

Elise felt somewhat relieved, thinking he was considering her mother’s situation. But Cardale’s thoughts drifted elsewhere.

 

‘I had thought she had a particularly weak body that was susceptible to the seasons, perhaps she took after her mother.’

 

For the past few days, as the late summer heat reached its peak, it had been unusually hot.

 

Maybe that’s why Elise couldn’t endure it yesterday or the night before. He tried to comfort her by putting her in a lukewarm bath and holding her, but she still burst into tears.

 

Of course, she never had robust health to begin with. Despite his efforts to feed her well and let her rest, she seemed to deteriorate rapidly.

 

Nevertheless, during these last few days of intense passion, he resolved to comfort and soothe Elise as best he could.

 

“I’ve gathered some information that your mother is safe.”

 

It was a fabrication that slipped from his lips. It was a first for Cardale.

 

“Really…?”

 

As her round, innocent eyes widened, he lightly nodded.

 

A faint joy gradually spread across her fair and radiant face. A subtly pleasing sight to behold.

 

“So wait and take care of your body carefully. You’re not planning on showing your skinny body to your mother, are you?”

 

“Well, I’m not that skinny.”

 

Although Elise was embarrassed, she answered firmly. Then added, her cheeks turning red.

 

“Thank you, Duke.”

 

His clueless deer fell innocent.

 

To the point where she blushed and thanked the person trying to tighten her leash.

 

But she was infinitely more beautiful. So much so that the thought of wanting to protect her vulnerability and innocence suddenly struck him.

 

Yes, without damage. Without dirtying or destroying. Without breaking…

 

Fortunately, reason stepped in at the right time. After sensing the flow of his irrational thoughts.

 

“It’s a hot day, so let’s go in.”

 

Cardale struggled to shake his thoughts and stretched out his hand.

 

Then, as if she had been waiting, Elise’s hand slipped between his fingers. She was trying to interlock their hands.

 

He let out a laugh, but held her hand tightly.

 

As if he would never let her go.

On the second floor of the clubhouse, there was a hidden room. It was a cleverly concealed space, adorned with large walls, heavy curtains, and decorations.

 

Even if someone with a strong adventurer’s spirit happened to discover its existence, entering wouldn’t be easy.

 

As it was meticulously guarded, a special method was needed to open the door.

 

After checking that no one was around, Fritz slipped behind the curtain.

 

At first glance, it would appear to be just a solid wall. However, upon closer inspection, there were tiny gaps along the edges.

 

He recalled the contents of his last secret letter in his mind.

 

‘Let’s see. Did it say to press here?’

 

Fritz firmly pressed a spot on the wall with his left hand, then used his right hand to twist a candle holder on the wall twice.

 

With a smooth mechanical sound, a door opened, revealing the secret passage down.

 

‘Ha, you hid this place well, haven’t you?’

 

If he hadn’t used threats to hasten the process, Fritz would never have known about the existence of this place.

 

Feeling a strange twinge of betrayal, Fritz entered the passage.

 

A stern-looking man stood in front of the room’s door, but Fritz paid no mind to his appearance.

 

“The password.”

 

As Fritz naturally reached for the door handle, the man slapped his hand away. Fritz furrowed his brow and,

 

“You know who I am, why the fuss?”

 

“Rules are rules.”

 

“You’re being so strict.”

 

It had been over a year since he stepped foot into this matter.

 

‘How much have I already done for you guys?’

 

At times like these, he felt frustrated with the drawn boundaries, but he couldn’t tell if that was fortunate or unfortunate.

 

Nevertheless, Fritz reluctantly stated the password with a sullen expression.

 

“For the glory of the desolate land and the barren rock.”

 

Only then did the man smile and step aside.

 

“Go in.”

 

The decaying teeth peeking through his parted lips gave off a repulsive feeling.

 

Fritz tried to shake off the uncomfortable feeling as he entered the room.

 

The interior was quite spacious. The man already inside turned his head to greet Fritz.

 

“You’ve arrived, I see?”

 

The man’s distinctive accent hinted at his native origins. While he could effortlessly speak the imperial language, he would often purposely display hints of his Helmutian accent.

 

However, Fritz didn’t pay much attention to that aspect. In fact, he found it more oblivious than intentional.

 

“When on earth are you going to take action?”

 

Fritz asked impatiently.

 

“It’s been postponed for months now. Damn it! They said they’d move in the spring, but now it’s already summer.”

 

“Let’s sit down and talk.”

 

The man took out a glass and tilted a bottle of pale crimson liquor, filling the glass with a gentle splash.

 

Gesturing with his eyes as he lifted his glass, Fritz reluctantly took a seat opposite the man, as if he had no other choice.

 

“How long are you going to make me wait? I’m on the verge of snapping my neck from how long this is taking.”

 

“First, let me at least offer you a drink to quench your thirst.”

 

Blaming it on the weather, Fritz’s throat did feel dry. So he received the glass from the man and gulped down the liquor in one go.

 

Despite its high alcohol content, its perfect ageing made it feel more fragrant than harsh. It was undoubtedly a superior product.

 

His restless irritation subsided slightly.

 

“It’s not the right time yet. Everyone is lying low, you know that.”

 

As the man watched Fritz’s reaction, he refilled the empty glass and continued speaking.

 

“The Emperor is stirring up trouble. And he’s using Cardale Vassenberg. Just last week, we lost two of our informants.”

 

“Damn Cardale Vassenberg.”

 

Fritz spat out the name as if it left a bitter taste in his mouth. His feelings of inferiority that he had suppressed resurfaced.

 

“If I became a duke, I would crush that guy under my thumb.”

 

Although there was absolutely no evidence, Fritz rationalised and believed himself.

 

According to Fritz, the highly praised Duke Vassenberg’s feats and reputation were solely due to his title.

 

While Fritz was talking half swears and half nonsense, the man filled his glass a few more times.

 

Only God knows what he was thinking during that time.

 

“Anyway, are you sure I’ll be receiving the commission?”

 

“Oh, yes. Of course.”

 

The man smoothly played along.

 

“Thanks to you, the movement of supplies and goods has been smooth. Even the King remembers your name.”

 

The man subtly reaped the benefits of backing him up.

 

“But… lately, I’m a bit worried. Support seems to be waning.”

 

When the conversation turned to money, Fritz narrowed his eyes. There was a reason for such remarks.

 

‘This is all because my father suddenly stopped supporting me…!’

 

There was no way he could send the same funds on time. However, Fritz had a good excuse.

 

“So, you think I’ll throw around my money without properly hearing about your progress? Do I look like a brat to you?”

 

“Haha, why are you so impatient? You’re the most important talent we’ve recruited. That’s why I’ve informed you about this place.”

 

The man tried to soothe him gently. Since Fritz had no intention of refusing outright, he accepted appropriately.

 

“Well, even without that, I’ve prepared something for your efforts.”

 

Fritz took out a package from his bosom and tossed it swiftly.

 

Thunk, the man lightly caught the package and untied it. When he opened it, three bright red rubies rolled out onto his palm.

 

The man’s eyes sparkled with excitement.

 

“These are fine rubies! No, where did you get these!”

 

When the man looked back at him as if asking, Fritz shrugged proudly.

 

“Well, it’s only this much.”

 

Of course, it was quite wasteful.

 

Considering how much could be done with just one ruby.

 

However, once he became a duke, he could gather jewels like collecting leaves with a rake. Fritz schemed as he fiddled with the rubies he had kept in his pocket.

 

‘So, this is an investment. It will return dozens, hundreds of times over later.’

 

Meanwhile, after admiring the ruby with his thumb and forefinger in the light, the man suddenly remembered something and asked.

 

“But are these really yours?”

 

Fritz’s face twisted in confusion.

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“I’m not doubting you, don’t misunderstand. It’s just… there’s been a lot of stolen goods circulating lately.”

 

Fritz didn’t bother to hide his dissatisfaction at the blunt question.

 

“These are gifts from my father. If they’re this suspicious, I might as well take them back.”

 

As he reached out for the rubies, the man quickly hid them behind his back.

 

“Haha, oh you wouldn’t do such a thing. I made a mistake. Please be generous and forgive my phrasing.”

 

Then, worried that Fritz might actually change his mind, he hastily added,

 

“I assure you, you’ll be recognised for your great contribution among us.”

 

Only after blatantly reassuring him did Fritz’s expression relax. The man quickly grabbed another expensive bottle of liquor.

 

After some time had passed, Fritz emerged from the secret passage with a pleased expression.

 

“Seems like even that Vassenberg guy can be of help sometimes.”

 

He juggled the gems in his hand as he muttered to himself.

 

“I should have asked Father for more funds. If I had, I would have had twice as many jewels.”

 

Chuckling to himself about something amusing, he mumbled incomprehensible words before tucking the gems back into his pocket.

 

“Well, I might as well play some cards while I’m here.”

 

As Fritz ascended the stairs, more excited than usual, and consequently less cautious.

 

Unaware that there was someone observing him, and unaware that the observer’s eyes were blue.

 



 

Finally, the scorching heat subsided.

 

Just as nobles who had been on vacation began to return home one by one, the royal family hosted a charity auction.

 

It was a bit early for the autumn social season to begin, but there were no major complaints.

 

Considering Princess Theresia was approaching her betrothal, the timing was expected to be moved up a bit.

 

Moreover, since the charity auction held in anticipation of a major event in the Empire usually featured carefully selected items. Most nobles showed a great interest in this year’s auction items.

 

Walking into the auction house hand in hand with Cardale, Elise whispered softly.

 

“Um, did the Duke also donate items for the auction?”

 

He looked down at her intently. Her deer-like blue eyes sparkled with curiosity.

 

“Guess.”

 

It was an impulsive answer, driven by the desire to prolong that pleasing gaze and expression.

 

“If you guess correctly, I’ll give you a prize.”

 

“A prize?”

 

Elise’s eyes widened, then quickly dimmed as she replied.

 

“But… guessing right on the first try seems too difficult.”

 

As if a mere prize mattered. Seeing her disappointed expression, Cardale chuckled.

 

“You have three chances. How about that?”


Elise felt like she had a chance of winning if she had three chances.

 

“Then let me guess.”

 

Cardale nodded at Elise’s response, which gave her a little courage.

 

The inside of the auction house was moderately dark.

 

It was a consideration for VIPs who were reluctant to let the outside world know that they had won a bid for a high-priced item.

 

“Stay close to me.”

 

Cardale led Elise to avoid her tripping and falling in the dark interior.

 

Of course, he also didn’t want anyone else touching her body.

 

A two person seat was in front of the stage with a screen. Unlike the single seat in the back, it was in the shape of an elongated couch.

 

Elise sat next to Cardale and glanced up at him. Her eyes met Cardale’s who also turned to look at her.

 

“What?”

 

“Oh, no.”

 

As Elise quickly lowered her gaze, Cardale wordlessly wrapped his arms around her waist and pulled her towards him. The tips of her small ears turned red.

 

“If other people see…”

 

“I told you not to worry about what others think and just focus on me.”

 

He gave reassurance to help the upset and anxious woman feel at ease.

 

Just then, the announcement of the auction starting was heard.

 

Elise, halfway nestled in Cardale’s embrace, looked towards the stage.

 

As a few lights on the seating side dimmed, thick burgundy curtains covering the stage slowly parted from both sides.

 

Standing in the bright center of the stage, the auctioneer was a man with a neatly trimmed mustache.

 

“Thank you to all the esteemed guests for attending this event. I am in charge of today’s charity auction…”

 

Following his introduction, he explained the purpose of this auction. Then gave praises to the Huang family as the organizers of the auction.

 

The whole process was somewhat tedious.

 

Just as boredom began to creep onto the faces of the attendees, he injected some energy into the atmosphere.

 

“Before we proceed with the auction, would you like to see a light magic performance for your enjoyment?”

 

Oh, murmurs of interest echoed from the audience. Elise was no exception.

 

‘I’ve never seen magic before.’

 

She had heard stories of amateur magicians performing in the square, but even that seemed like tales from another world to Elise.

 

“Here is a shining gold coin. It is a rare item produced during Emperor Kesselof’s reign in the 263rd year of the Empire, with only 100 pieces produced at the time.”

 

The auctioneer promoted the coin as an item up for auction, then tossed it lightly into the air before catching it.

 

‘It’s gone…!’

 

Elise’s eyes widened. Shortly after, when the coin reappeared, applause erupted from all around.

 

Encouraged by the response, the auctioneer then pulled out a deck of cards and scanned the audience.

 

Approaching Elise, he extended the cards towards her.

 

“My beautiful lady, would you care to pick a card?”

 

“Oh, me?”

 

At the same time, Cardale’s eyebrows twitched.

 

Beautiful Lady? Of course, his woman was pretty, but it was a different matter for others to recognise that.

 

“Now, please show the card to the guests. I will turn around and close my eyes.”

 

If he dared to make advances, he might never walk the streets at night again.

 

However, as soon as Elise placed the card she had chosen on top of the deck, the auctioneer politely stepped back.

 

“Now, let’s see if we can find out what card the lady picked.”

 

A moment later, as the auctioneer held up a card with a matching suit and number, the audience erupted with excitement.

 

Waving a pristine white handkerchief he produced from nowhere, he graciously thanked Elise.

 

“To the gracious lady who kindly helped, a bouquet of admiration and gratitude.”

 

Swoosh, where the handkerchief once was, now remained a bright red rose.

 

Wow, amidst cheers, the auctioneer handed the rose to Elise. She took it, feeling overwhelmed.

 

‘It’s beautiful.’

 

Of course, she had no idea that Cardale, with an uneasy expression, was watching her closely.

 

“Not as good as the ones Sir Michael brought me before, but they smell nice…….”

 

The auctioneer concluded the performance by releasing a dove from a large hat.

 

“Now then, let’s start the auction. You might have guessed, but the first item is the limited edition gold coin from the era of Emperor Kesselof that was shown earlier.”

 

Thanks to the heightened atmosphere, the bidding went smoothly.

 

Elise quickly became engrossed in the lively atmosphere of the auction. No, she was almost entranced.

 

“Do you like the rose?”

 

Caught off guard by the sudden question, she glanced at Cardale.

 

For some reason, his expression seemed uncomfortable, as if he didn’t quite like something.

 

‘Perhaps the Duke wanted to receive a flower, too?’

 

Though completely off the mark, her belief was firm as Elise extended the rose towards Cardale.

 

“…?”

 

“I’ll give it to the Duke.”

 

Elise smiled brightly and gently shook the stem in her hand. When he saw the large flower bud fluttering before her eyes, Cardale felt completely relaxed.

 

But he felt much better.

 

If she had attached any meaning to the flower, there was no way she would have given it away so quickly. He was more than satisfied with that.

 

He quickly took the rose.

 

“Huh?”

 

Elise looked puzzled as if she didn’t understand English, and one of Cardale’s eyebrows raised in surprise.

 

“Didn’t Michael Walter bring you roses before?”

 

As Cardale puzzled, Elise suddenly realised something and looked at him in astonishment.

 

“Th-then… was it the Duke who gave me the bouquet?”

 

He narrowed his eyes.

 

“If it wasn’t me, then who was it?”

 

He narrowed his eyebrows.

 

“Sir Michael… He is a kind person who often buys flowers from children on the street…”

 

Elise trailed off her words.

 

“A good person?”

 

Meanwhile, the rose in Cardale’s hand became nothing more than plant debris, broken into pieces where Elise couldn’t see.

 

“Ha…”

 

He had given her a few roses, but as he watched his deer run away, he felt a twinge of annoyance.

 

Of course, he didn’t realise he had told Michael that there was no need to reveal the source.

 

From now on, he should teach her to throw away anything that wasn’t given to her by him, or better yet, not accept it at all.

 

It was when he found an excuse to torment her tonight that he harboured a mischievous intent.

 

“But it was from the Duke…”

 

The white deer’s cheeks turned pink. Strangely enough, seeing her excited face, his irritation quickly melted away.

 

“Thank you. I didn’t even think it was from you… I’m really happy…”

 

Perhaps due to practising honest speech countless times, the woman could no longer hide her emotions.

 

To a man who was so accustomed to taming and exploiting people to his liking, it was all too clear.

 

The deer was caught in a trap.

 

But she had not realised it, nor did she realise how wicked the hunter who led her away was. She simply succumbed to the comfort and affection provided to her.

 

Cardale was feeling the woman gradually being tamed and dyed to his colours.

 

And he quite liked it. Perhaps it was because he hadn’t discarded the toy he had been playing with, even after two seasons had passed.

 

In the social season of autumn, or rather, when the days grew shorter. He needed a woman to warm his bed on the long nights, he thought it would be fine to keep her until winter.

 

Since he liked the obedient and pretty toy, he felt compelled to ask.

 

“Should I buy you more next time?”

 

Elise’s eyes widened for a moment, and then she shyly nodded.

 

“Yes…”

 

Unconsciously, the corners of Cardale’s mouth twitched.

 

“Oh! I need to guess what auction item the Duke donated!”

 

Elise, as if just remembering, lightly slapped her palm and looked up at him with a pout.

 

“Perhaps it’s not too late yet…?”

 

“It’s not too late.”

 

Although he hadn’t even glanced at the auction items until now, Cardale asserted confidently.

 

“Let’s begin the next auction!”

 

As the auctioneer’s announcement echoed, Elise turned her head towards the stage.

 

With her fists clenched tightly, determination to guess somehow radiated from her. Cardale chuckled softly, sensing her determination.

 

“This time, we have a beautiful diamond necklace. You won’t find blue diamonds of this carat and clarity easily.”

 

Rows of transparent diamonds were surrounded by a vivid blue diamond in the centre.

 

Not bad. Cardale imagined Elise wearing that necklace.

 

It would be a special delight to see her wear only the jewellery he gave her and hold her in his arms.

 

After rationalising it in his mind, Cardale raised the bidding paddle.

 

There was hardly any competition against the Duke of Vassenberg, and before long he became the winning bidder for the necklace.

 

Elise watched the entire process with astonished eyes. She finally looked at Cardale, the new owner of the necklace, with a surprised gaze.

 

‘She probably secretly hopes for it, even if she pretends not to.’

 

Even the most innocent deer wouldn’t dislike jewels. After all, she had accepted all the clothes and jewellery he had given her until now.

 

Cardale wiped away any trace of the reports stating that all those gifts were safely stored.

 

Instead, he gazed at her, expecting her gratitude.

 

“What… Do you have something to say?”

 

Then Elise cautiously asked.

 

“Do… Do you wear necklaces too, Duke…?”

 

Cardale was dumbfounded.


Seeing his expression, Elise shrank back like a frightened deer and spoke.

 

“Of course, you can’t do that, right?”

 

Then, after thinking about it again, she let out a short exclamation, “Ah.”

 

“So, do you want to give it as a gift?”

 

She finally found the answer. Cardale responded in a somewhat encouraging tone.

 

“Yes.”

 

“Wow…”

 

When Elise opened her mouth and admired it, Cardale’s mouth tightened a little.

 

‘Now, what should I say? Maybe I should pretend to be pleased, even though I might not know what to do with it.’

 

“The person receiving the gift will be really happy.”

 



 

Elise laughed heartily, and as soon as the next auction item came out, she turned her head back to the stage.

 

Cardale looked uncharacteristically dumbfounded but eventually burst into a hollow laugh.

 

The predictions of the nobles that good collectables would come out were spot on.

 

Enough to catch Cadell’s eye as well.

 

Earrings that would dangle from Elise’s thin earlobes, a headdress that would decorate her silver hair, or a bracelet that would wrap around her thin wrist.

 

Cardale won the bids one after another. He deliberately raised his amount by being conscious of his side.

 

But even though her eyes lit up every time he raised the bidding paddle, she had no interest in the actual item.

 

If she asked him for anything, he would gladly buy it for her, but she showed no signs of doing so. She didn’t seem to want anything in particular.

 

After some trial and error, Cardale finally realised that Elise was simply fascinated by the auctions and the bidding process itself.

 

The reason she kept her eyes on each item that came out was simple; to solve the riddle he had posed to her.

 

‘That item doesn’t seem right…’

 

Listening to a voice muttering while lost in one’s own worries was so absurd that Cardale was completely shocked.

 

But Cardale unknowingly came up with his own excuse for her.

 

‘It’s probably her first time at an auction, so it’s natural for her to find it fascinating.’

 

The curious deer’s eyes lit up brightly at something she had never experienced before.

 

Her first experience.

 

Come to think of it, Elise’s reactions were almost always like it was her first time doing anything while they were together.

 

Going to the square, eating food, and even choosing the parasol she liked.

 

Well, was it her first time in bed, too?

 

Cardale remembered the time he suddenly dragged her into his bedroom.

 

She walked on her own feet, but it would be correct to say she was dragged. Because he meant it that way.

 

Thus, he made the prey who dared to escape his trap pay the price.

 

He stripped the woman who was desperately begging and clinging to him, made her look worse than a mere prostitute, and played with her humiliatingly.

 

He demanded the price paid and treated her roughly as if he were playing with a cheap toy. He teased her excessively with his overly harsh and imposing demeanour, making her eyes endlessly moist

 

The method of instilling fear and terror was perfectly effective on the prey. He did not hesitate to use any means necessary for his purpose, so it was an extremely excellent choice in terms of effectiveness.

 



 

But was it really necessary to go that far?

 

The question that suddenly occurred to Cardale was extremely unfamiliar.

 

He never regretted it.

 

He definitely achieved his goals, got everything he wanted, and destroyed everything he wanted to destroy.

 

For a man who always won, looking back on the past and blaming himself for what should have been was meaningless. Therefore, this unfamiliar and awkward feeling scratched him uncomfortably, as if he were wearing clothes that did not fit.

 

No wonder…

 

He was slightly concerned.

 

Cardale glanced down at the woman next to him.

 

As the auctioneer spoke, a shy excitement appeared on her face. Her eyes were beautifully folded into a half-moon shape, and her cheeks were rosy. Her lips were soft, with the corners of her mouth raised.

 

Even with a little bit of exaggeration, she seemed happy.

 

So Cardale was relieved.

 

He was a bit rough, but in the end, Elise was relying on him.

 

During the day, she laughed and chattered next to him. But at night, she cried prettily in his arms. She lived her life inside the golden cage he created.

 

Cardale was willing to allow more, as long as the woman didn’t dare to run away from him.

 

‘So, I can help you experience more things that are new to you.’

 

However, the arrogant man had overlooked the fact that her number of firsts was increasing one by one.

 



 

“Now we will reveal the final auction item!”

 

When the host shouted in a loud voice, everyone’s attention was focused.

 

In general, it was customary to offer the best items last to ensure the success of the auction.

 

“It is an item donated by His Imperial Majesty!”

 

However, the only exceptions were the woman who was disappointed because she couldn’t get the answer right as the man who looked at her.

 

“I couldn’t find it in the end…”

 

Elise was upset and muttered in a low voice.

 

‘If I had known this would happen, I should have tried at least once.’

 

She regretted hesitating in case she missed a valuable opportunity.

 

Her frustration was familiar to her as she had always lived a life of being deprived and oppressed, but she still couldn’t help being disappointed.

 

“Can you tell me what the correct answer was?”

 

Elise asked with a disappointed look on her face.

 

Then, instead of answering, Cardale covered both her ears with his palms.

 

His thumb gently touched the corners of both her eyes. Her eyes were originally gentle, but when the corners of her eyes drooped, they looked sad.

 

“It’s nothing.”

 

“…What?”

 

“I didn’t submit any items for the auction. I just donated money.”

 

Then, Elise instantly made an aggrieved face.

 

“T-That’s a lie…”

 

She almost made a slip of the tongue without even realising it, and when he caught sight of her, she resented him a little.

 

“…You lied.”

 

But Cardale was firm.

 

“I only asked you to guess. I never said there were donated auction items. So technically, it’s not a lie.”

 

It was an amazing omission. Elise’s lips parted in shock.

 

“That’s not fair…”

 

She worked really hard. The deer was truly saddened by the hunter’s play again.

 

After seeing this reaction, Cardale was a little stricken.

 

Fortunately for him, an auction house staff member came over and politely bowed to them.

 

“I’ll take you to a room where you can check your items.”

 

The two were guided to a space prepared for successful bidders. It wasn’t that big, but it had an old-fashioned interior.

 

Cardale personally checked the winning bid items in front of him and signed the contract.

 

The employee took the documents and collected the papers, placed them at his side, then bowed in an awkward posture and walked away.

 

Meanwhile, Elise was lost in thought, feeling a little gloomy.

 

‘The Duke deceived me. He told me not to lie to him.’

 

As her resentful feelings began to rise, she quickly suppressed them.

 

‘No. The Duke and I are in different positions. I’m just a maid, and the Duke is…’

 

‘Because he bought me.’

 

There was no owner in the world who was honest with his objects. When she remembered the obvious, she felt relieved and sad at the same time.

 

And she hated herself for constantly being greedy.

 

Just think about what she was like in the beginning.

 

His cool gaze swept over her naked body. Every single word was as scary and painful as a knife. A harsh love affair.

 

When Elise thought about that time, what she enjoyed now seemed like a luxury. She deserved to be thankful. It was presumptuous to complain or feel resentful.

 

“Elise.”

 

She flinched. Her body reacted reflexively to the low sound of the voice and turned around.

 

Then Cardale approached her and wrapped his arms around her neck. With a clicking sound, something heavy landed on her neck.

 

When she lowered her head, a bright blue gem sparkled. He had won the bid earlier. Elise looked up at Cardale, not knowing what he was talking about.

 

“It’s a prize.”

 

“But I didn’t get it right…”

 

“Because it was something that couldn’t be guessed.”

 

He answered plainly.

 

The reason it felt like it was soothing was probably due to her mood. Elise really managed to erase her cheeky imagination.

 

But she couldn’t help but be surprised by what she heard next.

 

“It’s all yours.”

 

For a moment, she even forgot to answer and just pursed her lips.

 

Of course, he was a generous host. By listening to her, doing pretty things, satisfying her in bed, etc…

 

In the meantime, Cardale gave her gifts for various reasons.

 

But this time, she just couldn’t bring herself to take it.

 

“These are so expensive…”

 

They were all treasures of a small principality. Maybe she didn’t know that even if she sold herself, it wouldn’t be worth even one piece of this jewel.

 

No, it definitely wouldn’t.

 

“Today, please wear only these and come to my room.”

 

“Ah…”

 

So, this is for the Duke. For his pleasure.

 

Elise remembered the first time she and Cardale had dressed together, her body adorned with jewels and her arms wrapped around him.

 

“Yes…”

 

She eventually nodded-

 

She felt that he could be forgiven for putting these precious things on her poor, lowly body. As long as she borrowed them for a moment for him.

 



 

Fritz was irritated.

 

He was in a good mood until he arrived at the auction. He thought there might be something interesting to see.

 

But he never thought that he would encounter the Duke of Vassenberg and Elise.

 

Most of the items on display were expensive and difficult to access. The Duke made a bid for such items as if he were buying something off the street.

 

Moreover, the items being bid on were all women’s accessories. He was even more annoyed because he knew where they were going to go.

 

“Let’s get moving. We have to hurry.”

 

As soon as the auction ended, Gerhard and Vanessa stood up straight away.

 

Fritz followed them even though he was dissatisfied.

 

‘Really, Elise. That bastard seduced the Duke?’

 

It was because he secretly wanted to confirm what he had heard from his father, Gerhard.

 

“The winning bidders will each receive a separate room to finalise their contracts and receive their items. So if we wait here in this corridor, we might run into them.”

 

“Tsk, what does the Duke know about these anyway?”

 

“Watch your mouth!”

 

At Gerhard’s words, Fritz crumpled his face but kept his mouth shut.

 

As the tedious time passed, Fritz’s patience wore thin.

 

“There, they’re coming out.”


Gerhard gestured with his chin and told Vanessa.

 

“Don’t forget to tell Elise.”

 

“Yes, Count.”

 

The Count then turned to Fritz.

 

“You idiot, don’t think about doing anything useless and just stay quiet. Do you understand?”

 

“Yeah, yeah. Of course.”

 

Fritz sneered openly and turned his head towards the couple. At that moment, the two people were walking side by side.

 

Fritz’s eyes widened as if they would pop out of his head when he saw Elise’s appearance. Soon, swears were chewing into his mouth.

 

‘That Damn bitch clinging to the Duke…’

 

He swept his eyes over her and scanned Elise from head to toe.

 

If someone who didn’t know her saw her, they could have thought she was a noble from birth.

 

‘A lowly bastard has become so successful, huh?’

 

Elise stopped in surprise when she saw Fritz. The Duke looked down at his woman’s face, and he followed her gaze.

 

“I see you, His Excellency the Duke.”

 

Gerhard walked forward without wasting time and bowed before Cardale.

 

“Do we have business?”

 

“It’s been a while since I’ve seen you, so I just wanted to say hello.”

 

While Gerhard was talking, Fritz was watching Cardale’s behaviour closely.

 

The Duke saw Elise flinch as soon as she saw them, so he wrapped his arms around her waist and pulled her towards him. Then, while Gerhard was greeting him, he hid the woman behind him.

 

‘Ha, it was true, right?’

 

‘The insignificant bitch seemed to have been happily rolling around in his bed.’

 

Given her lowly origins, perhaps she had indulged the Duke enough to satisfy him.

 

Fritz sold Elise off with a disdainful and dirty imagination. It was a disgusting judgement, vented out on a stern person due to Cardale.

 

The Duke’s immense wealth, coupled with his father’s disdainful attitude, made Fritz even more irritated and scheming.

 

On the other hand, Gerhard was all smiles, sincerely pleased that his daughter could bring joy to the Duke.

 

“Why would the count be pleased?”

 

“The satisfaction of Vassenberg is the joy of Schuvan.”

 

Cardale sneered at the attempt to bring Elise and Schuvan together, sensing the desperation to make something happen.

 

However, Gerhard didn’t care. He wasn’t petty enough to let such a slight affect him.

 

“Could you please allow Elise and me to spend some time together? I am delighted to see my daughter after so long…”

 

“Count Schuvan.”

 

A chilling voice cut in, warning softly.

 

“Have you forgotten the contract, or do you wish to ignore it?”

 

The atmosphere froze instantly. Even impudent Fritz felt a creepy sensation that made him swallow his dry spit.

 

However, if he had known that the Duke restrained himself for his woman’s sake, he wouldn’t even dare to imagine confronting him in the future.

 

Cardale felt Elise trembling beside him.

 

Born as a bastard, sold off by her father’s greed after surviving in poverty with her mother, she anticipated the abuse that followed. She had guessed it ever since she was sold like an object.

 

But now, seeing her trembling with fear, his mood plummeted to the extreme.

 

The air became even more tense as his dirty thoughts resonated with his soured mind.

 

“Your Excellency the Duke.”

 

Vanessa quickly stepped forward. The whole time, she had been waiting for an opportunity to speak up.

 

If she misses this opportunity, she might never have a chance to be alone with Elise Schuvan. She had to make at least some progress.

 

‘I’m sure Gerhard Schwan would be suspicious… but I can’t help it.’

 

It was a bit risky, but I had to take it.

 

“I don’t have any other intentions. I just wanted to give you a token I received from Marissa.”

 

As Cardale became her shield. Elise, still trembling with fear, reluctantly extended her hands. Her blue eyes, filled with fear, shook slightly.

 

“Uh, my mother gave me a token…?”

 

Her little lips clicked like a bird’s beak, and a faint voice came out.

 

When Elise reacted, Vanessa quickly took out something from her pocket.

 

As Elise reacted, Vanessa quickly retrieved the pendant.

 

“Yes, it’s a pendant. Marissa asked me to deliver it to you.”

 

Vanessa approached them, carefully observing Cardale’s reaction. Elise, still not looking away, unknowingly reached out her hands.

 

Just as Vanessa was about to hand over the pendant…

 

Snap! Cardale grabbed it first.

 

“It is quite common for gifts to be used for nefarious purposes.”

 

It was an expression that cast doubt on its authenticity. They thought it wasn’t Marissa’s item. Or at worst, that it had some malicious device installed on it.

 

Vanessa hastily denied it.

 

“Your Excellency, I only have good intentions, so please rest assured…” 

 

“That will be decided in the Vassenberg mansion.”

 

The harsh, dismissive voice was colder than a glacier.

 

The icy voice of rebuke was chilling.

 

“Y-Your Grace.”

 

But as Elise reached out as if pleading, the Duke gently grasped her hand, calming her down.

 

“I’ll give it to you after verifying. So please wait.”

 

His tone softened considerably from the earlier cold remark.

 

The sudden shift in demeanour was so shocking that Vanessa had to make every effort not to reveal her surprise.

 

After a while, the two of them passed by without incident.

 

Only when the Duke and his woman had moved further away did the oppressive feeling dissipate.

 

Vanessa, who had been tense dealing with Cardale the entire time, breathed a silent sigh of relief and turned away.

 

“Vanessa Lockseed.”

 

Gerhard was looking at her. When he used her full name, it was usually a sign of suspicion or testing his subordinate.

 

‘Here he comes.’

 

Vanessa quickly composed herself and smoothed out her expression casually. Gerhard Schuvan was adept at reading his opponent’s demeanour.

 

“Where did that pendant come from just now?”

 

His purple eyes gleamed ominously. His probing gaze seemed to scan Vanessa for any weakness.

 

“Did you really receive it from Marissa?”

 

“Well, I did see you approaching without Father knowing. What, are you trying to deceive him?”

 

Fritz, who had been unable to say anything under the Duke’s dominance, retorted as if to mock the situation.

 

‘Cowardly and despicable.’

 

Since the boy would become a discarded pawn anyway, reacting was pointless. Without even looking at Fritz, Vanessa replied to Gerhard.

 

“How could that be? It’s forged.”

 

“Forged? If that’s the case, the Duke will soon find out.”

 

The deception had to start now. Vanessa skillfully blended truth and lies.

 

“He’ll believe it since I put small portraits of the two of them in it.”

 

“Portraits?”

 

“Yes. I found them in the annex. It seems Miss Elise painted them when she was young.”

 

Gerhard furrowed his brow as if trying to recall, then let out a short sigh.

 

“Oh, right. I remember. Marissa once insisted on having a painter called to make portraits of them.”

 

“The mistress mentioned the portrait without even knowing the subject? It’s so absurd, really.”

 

As Fritz muttered curses, Gerhard looked at him as if in disdain.

 

“That habit of yours will never change.”

 

Before the atmosphere between the two wealthy men could become more hostile, Vanessa intervened.

 

“The size of the portrait conveniently matched the dimensions for a pendant, so I commissioned its production. Given its content, the Duke should trust it.”

 

Then she quickly added,

 

“After gaining his trust, won’t there be future opportunities to meet under similar pretences?”

 

“Indeed.”

 

It was a convincing argument. Although it was a somewhat simplistic explanation to deceive the cunning Gerhard, the trust built over nearly a decade of loyalty shone through.

 

“Well done, Vanessa.”

 

Finally, a satisfied expression crossed his face.

 

“I didn’t expect the Duke to be so defensive. You had a good alternative.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

“But if you had such a good idea, it would have been better to discuss it with me in advance.”

 

“I forgot to tell you as I received it urgently this morning.”

 

Vanessa naturally fabricated a lie. Fortunately, her excuse was well received.

 

Nodding, Gerhard changed the subject.

 

“Did you see the jewels adorning the girl’s body?”

 

“Of course.”

 

The jewels exhibited at today’s auction adorned Elise’s body. They were excessively luxurious, beyond what was necessary for simple adornment.

 

Even the mistress of a self-proclaimed noble family wouldn’t wear such extravagant accessories all at once.

 

‘Perhaps the Duke has far greater plans and love for Elise Schuvan than I anticipated.’

 

Vanessa revised her judgement.

 

“It seems our Lady Elise is quite popular.”

 

“Yes. It seems so.”

 

Gerhard chuckled satisfactorily at her response. His laughter was filled with anticipation and pleasure, imagining how he could satisfy his greed through his daughter.

 

“Anyway, I hope Marissa’s fake pendant plays its role well.”

 

Listening to Gerhard’s contented laughter, Vanessa also thought:

 

Marissa’s real pendant would surely lay a solid foundation for her path ahead.

Training was one of Cardale’s consistent routines.

 

Unless he had a special duty, he would often make his way to the training grounds in the early hours of dawn and spend an hour or two there.

 

There were even days when he barely slept, having spent the night investigating government activities.

 

His robust body, imbued with the blood of the Vassenberg, didn’t require much sleep.

 

Swish, the sword sliced through the air, emitting a faint whistling sound. Each time, the muscles beneath his thin shirt, tightly sculpted without any unnecessary bulk, moved gracefully.

 

Every muscle was optimised for his body, agile and firm. Together, they formed a physique akin to a work of art.

 

He moved his body without even the slightest hint of fatigue. How much time had passed?

 

As Cardale sheathed his sword and began tidying up, he spoke.

 

“Come in.”

 

Michael, who had been waiting outside the door, flinched at his lord’s voice.

 

‘He said to be careful this time.’

 

Michael had tried not to disturb the Duke as much as possible, but he couldn’t help but notice the aid’s presence without fail.

 

It wasn’t just a one or two-time occurrence; it had become a familiar pattern. Yet, whenever it happened, Michael’s neck would grow cold.

 

The extraordinary physical abilities and senses that were anything but human. Perhaps that was why it was so difficult to find anyone with ulterior motives or spies within the Vassenberg Duchy.

 

If the Duke wished, there would be nothing hidden or gossip unheard within this mansion.

 

It was frightening not knowing the extent of his senses.

 

Swallowing dryly, Michael quickly stepped into the training grounds. His lord was not accustomed to waiting.

 

“I have urgent news to report.”

 

Cardale nodded. Granted permission to speak, Michael hurriedly continued.

 

“It seems Fritz Schuvan is cooperating with an enemy nation.”

 

“Is the enemy nation Helmut?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Bold move.”

 

Cardale chuckled coldly.

 

The report wasn’t surprising in the least. Fritz’s whereabouts had been uncertain over the past year, leading to suspicion.

 

No, the intelligence operatives of Vassenberg had already been conducting investigations under the assumption that Fritz Schuvan was guilty.

 

“It seems he’s been promised a title in exchange for providing information on the war funds after Helmut’s victory.”

 

“A title, huh.”

 

The man’s eyes narrowed.

 

“Yes, it’s a dukedom,” Michael replied as he pulled out a document bearing the seal of Helmut’s King, granting the title.

 

“So, we had a scoundrel all along,” Cardale chuckled bitterly. “For him, even a mere knight’s title would have been too much for his abilities.”

 

Inheriting the barony alone was a stroke of immense luck for Fritz Schuvan. If he had had even one more worthy brother, such a position would have been out of his reach.

 

But blinded by unreasonable ambition, he had volunteered to provide the enemy with war funds in exchange for a noble title.

 

Moreover, Helmut had lost the war against the Empire. Anyone with an ounce of sense would have backed off then.

 

Indeed, many of the traitors Cardale had uncovered had tried to cover up their past and wash away their sins.

 

“Such blatant greed without a hint of regard for the consequences; he’ll soon meet his end.”

 

He was so foolish and stubborn that Cardale couldn’t even muster any sympathy.

 

“He doesn’t seem to have been treated as an important figure by Helmut’s side, either. Because the King’s seal used…”

 

“…was forged.” 

 

Cardale finished, no longer bothering to hide his sneer.

 

It was pitiful to think that the fool had harboured dreams of becoming a Duke without realising he was being played by their enemies.

 

“Count Schuvan raised his son very well. Thanks to that, things will go even smoother,” his lips curled smoothly.

 

Since Gerhard’s weakness had been taken advantage of, there was no reason not to be satisfied.

 

“For now, exclude Fritz Schuvan from the final list.”

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

If you exploit someone’s weakness, it’s only fitting to wield it carefully.

 

With Fritz’s matter settled for now, Cardale turned his attention to the issue he had been more concerned about.

 

“Have you examined the pendant?”

 

“Oh, yes. The analysis was completed today.”

 

Knowing that his lord had been waiting for this report, Michael hurried to respond.

 

“It was confirmed that there were no special risk factors. It is difficult to be certain whether the actual owner is the young lady’s mother, but there is a good possibility.”

 

“On what grounds?”

 

“There were portraits of the two together inside the pendant. Judging by the age of the paper and the drawing, it appears to have been drawn when the lady was young.”

 

As Michael finished his report, he stole a glance at his lord’s expression, but as usual, nothing could be gleaned from the inscrutable face.

 

After a moment of silence, Cardale spoke up.

 

“Do you have the pendant?”

 

“Yes, my lord.”

 

Quickly, Michael retrieved the pendant from his pocket and handed it over.

 

Click.

 

Cardale opened the lid of the pendant, revealing portraits of a girl of about seven years old and her mother.

 

He silently gazed down at the child’s face. Her cheeks were still chubby with baby fat, and her features were still somewhat cute.

 

But her gentle, innocent face and round deer-like eyes were not much different from how they were now.

 

Especially her eyes, reminiscent of pure sapphire, were strikingly similar to each other. Leading Cardale to believe that if he were to meet Elise’s mother, he would recognise her immediately.

 

“What happened to what I asked you to find out?”

 

It was a question with the subject omitted, but Michael quickly understood and answered.

 

“We are tracking down houses and villas owned by Gerhard Schuvan under someone else’s name.”

 

“It’s a bit late.”

 

“My apologies. I’ll hurry.”

 

Cardale knew well how eagerly Elise awaited the day she would meet her mother.

 

She was always like clear water, her innermost thoughts laid bare for all to see.

 

Though Cardale chastised Michael, the truth was that the investigation’s progress couldn’t be considered slow. And to some extent, Cardale bore responsibility as well.

 

The decision to facilitate Elise meeting with her mother rested solely with him, and Cardale had chosen a path based purely on his own desires. Intentionally disregarding the woman’s longing and anticipation.

 

It was only natural. There was no need for anything else.

 

But watching her wait so eagerly, like a fawn searching for its mother, brought such thoughts to his mind.

 

Perhaps it would have been better to let them meet first before making further plans.

 

‘Pointless.’ 

 

He dismissed the thought, closing the lid of the pendant with a firm tap.

 

“I’ll take it to her.”

 

Though it was just a pendant containing portraits, Elise would surely be pleased.

 

If he could witness her pale, delicate face light up with joy for even a moment, the effort would be worth it.

 



 

Elise’s dressing room was luxurious. 

 

Rows in her closet lined up neatly with dresses and shoes. Fans, silk gloves, and bonnets were untouched and waiting to be worn. Adorning the space. 

 

Boxes covered in noble-coloured velvet were stacked meticulously, containing dazzling jewellery.

 

Elise gazed at the opulent display before her for a while before quietly looking away.

 

‘It’s too much.’ 

 

Though she still didn’t fully understand the ways of the nobility, she knew well enough how the government treated her. The things given to her far exceeded the average, a fact she couldn’t ignore.

 

‘Mother… You never received anything like this from the Count…’

 

Gerhard and Marisa’s relationship was purely that of master and servant. The Viscount exploited the government without hesitation, yet remained indifferent to her safety and well-being. He failed to protect her and her daughter from the Viscountess and Fritz, not even caring when they went hungry for days.

 

But when they finally escaped, they were branded as traitors and forced to live miserably in the slums.

 

When Elise first came to live there, she was afraid of the Viscount. She would tremble and dare not defy him when faced with his expressionless face and cold gaze.

 

Until she could return to the Viscount’s estate and meet her mother, she planned to quietly endure it here as well.

 

But now…

 

Elise sank to the floor as if all her strength had left her. The cold touch of the closet against her back sent shivers down her spine.

 

Sitting there, her fingers trembling slightly as they wrapped around her knees, Elise felt lost.

 

“What should I do…?”

 

She felt like a stranger to herself, accustomed to a life of abundance. Occasionally, she found herself overwhelmed by his tenderness, and it scared her. That’s why she was scared from time to time.

 

“What if the Duke changes his mind…?”

 

What if, one day, all this warmth disappeared. As if it were just an illusion?

 

Elise buried her face in her knees. Her body felt cold, as if she had been out in the rain for a long time. But her eyes felt warm.

 

‘No… I can’t. If I cry, my eyes will turn red, and the Duke will notice…’

 

It was then that Elise hurriedly wiped away the tears threatening to fall.


“Elise.”


When she heard the voice above her head, Elise was startled and raised her head.


“Duke… Ah!”


Suddenly, her body stiffened. Elise, still sitting, urgently wrapped her arms around Cardale’s neck.


“I told you not to sit on the cold floor.”


“I’m sorry…”


She felt his gaze on her face, so Elise quickly muttered her apology in a timid voice.


As Cardale removed her from his embrace, Elise found herself instinctively holding onto the hem of his sleeve before quickly letting go.


“Oh, it’s nothing.”


“Tell me.”


However, he seemed determined not to let it slide. With a firm tone, Cardale urged her to speak. After hesitating for a while, Elise finally spoke up.


“If… if I become boring to you later…”


But the more she spoke, the more tears threatened to fall from her eyes, and she had to blink rapidly to hold them back.


“…Could you tell me first?”


With each word, her heart ached.


It hurt more than she had expected, even though she knew from the start what the situation was.


But she didn’t want to feel miserable, knowing she had been rejected and chased away. She didn’t want to leave before seeing him once more.


So, she finally revealed her innermost thoughts.


But Cardale chose silence instead of responding to Elise’s earnest request.


He didn’t want to lose control and unleash his boiling anger upon her like a trapped deer.


The discomfort and frustration inside him surged like flames.


‘Mine.’


‘She is mine.’


‘My prey, whom I caught in a trap and tamed. Mine.’


‘No one could interfere with that right, not even her.’


So why did he feel so restless? 


He couldn’t understand it. He could control it, but it was enough to bother him.


To push away those strange feelings, Cardale changed the subject.


He took Elise’s hand, which had clung to his sleeve, and turned it over. Revealing her palm before placing the pendant on her palm with his other hand.


Elise’s eyes, which had been on the brink of overflowing with tears like a dam about to burst, widened suddenly.


“Has the investigation already finished?”


“How long did you think such a trivial investigation would take?”


He answered deliberately indifferently.


“Open it.”


Elise carefully opened the locket. Her pupils trembled as she recognised the portrait inside.


“This is…”


“Is this you and your mother?”


Elise nodded.


“When I was young, there was once a painter who came to the outbuilding. That’s when he painted it.”


Outbuilding. 


Cardale made a mental note of the information she provided.


Elise held the locket preciously and gazed at the portrait for a while. Then, she looked up at him, her eyes smiling through the lingering tears.


“Thank you…”


Tears still lingered at the corners of her eyes.


“You’re crying again.”


As he wiped away the tears that had gathered in her eyes with his finger, Elise closed her eyes. Her long, sweeping eyelashes trembled slightly.


“I brought it to you so you could like it, but you’re already crying before the reward.”


“I’m sorry…”


But Elise’s faint voice, as if she wanted to be heard but not quite, didn’t make it through.


It was stifled by the man’s lips, pressing firmly against hers.





The softly sleeping sound of breathing gently stirred the quiet air of the bedroom.


The man, who had enjoyed the sound of his woman’s breath, delayed his preparations. It had only been a few minutes, but it was his first time.


Elise, on the other hand, woke up earlier than usual, thanks to her soft sleep last night.


So when Cardale, who had just finished washing up after visiting the council, came out half-dressed, Elise blinked her drowsy eyes and met his gaze.


“You’re up early.” 


He remarked with his deep, resonant voice, causing Elise’s sleep to vanish abruptly. 


Hastily rising from bed, she accidentally let the sheet drop, revealing her almost transparent negligee.


Though she tried to cover herself, the thin fabric revealed the silhouette of her rounded shoulders, ample chest, and flat stomach.


Cardale, meanwhile, opened his mouth. Not thinking about the workload he had to tackle today.


“No more sleep for you?”


“It’s okay.”


A woman who had no idea what she looked like got out of her bed and sprinted towards her man.


“May I… help you with something?”


Elise asked, looking at his still incomplete attire. Sensing her intention, he chuckled softly and asked,


“Confident, are you?”


“Not exactly, but… I practised a lot when I was at the Count’s residence.”


“Okay, then let’s see.”


Cardale handed her a cloth, and though Elise had to tip-toe a bit due to her shorter stature, she willingly endured the discomfort.


“Can I tie it the way you usually wear it?”


“Yes.”


Naturally, the two bodies drew closer as she wrapped the cloth around his neck, yet the atmosphere in the bedroom subtly changed.


Elise tried her best not to show any tension as she slowly wrapped the white cloth around the pulled-tight shirt collar.


It looked as if she had her arms around his neck. The moment she realised this, memories of last night flooded back—of herself wrapping her arms around his neck, releasing obscene moans.


As the embarrassing image came to mind, Elise’s face flushed bright red in an instant.


‘Why do these thoughts keep coming…?’


She shook her head, trying to erase the embarrassing thoughts.


Fortunately, perhaps due to her countless amounts of practice, her hands moved automatically, even in the midst of her thoughts. Her slender fingers wrapped the cloth, forming the knot neatly in the end.


‘It doesn’t look too bad from the outside, I suppose.’ 


She thought, relieved, as she smoothed out his chest.


Brushing away her worries, she asked Cardale.


“What type of pin should I use?”


“Choose whatever you want.” 


There were cravat pins decorated with small jewels on the table. It was difficult for her to choose because she felt like whatever she chose would suit him well.


Finally, Elise picked a pin with a blue sapphire similar in colour to her eyes. It was an unconscious choice.


Her touch as she positioned the sharp end of the cravat pin against the cloth was cautious. Her delicate fingers trembled slightly.


And throughout this sequence of tension, Cardale was keenly observant.


Even though it was just inserting a cravat pin, the woman was cautious, as if it were a delicate task. He savoured the movement of her fingers, which could be felt even through the thin shirt.


While silently observing her intense concentration, Cardale suddenly spoke up.


“You know what?”


“Huh?”


Elise raised her head at his words. He stared at her intently, then continued.


“It’s a tradition that’s disappeared now, but in the past, only a wife could tie her husband’s cravat.”


“Oh…”


Elise’s eyes trembled in surprise. Her slightly swollen lips from last night’s kiss parted slightly.


Cardale, remembering the moist and soft taste of her lips, subtly licked the inside of his own lips without being noticed.


“I… I didn’t mean it like that…”


The man’s insidious thoughts were oblivious even in his dreams, and Elise was too preoccupied with explaining herself to be coherent.


“I really didn’t know.”


Cardale decided to rescue the flustered and pitifully innocent woman from this situation.


“I understand. Nowadays, no one, not even the royal family, remembers it properly.”


His hand covered the back of Elise’s hand and he finished fixing the cravat pin that had stopped piercing the fabric.


“You did well.”


“Oh, no. What did I do…”


Embarrassed to receive praise for simply fastening a cravat, Elise quickly lowered her head. The blush on her cheeks, tinged with a hint of rose. It was lovely.


As Cardale’s hand naturally moved to caress her, Elise’s gentle eyes blinked.


“If… if I become boring to you later…”


“…Could you tell me first?”


The question, asking if she could be notified when he grew weary, flashed through his mind.


When he heard those words, what he felt was an intense discomfort. It couldn’t be exactly named, but feeling this disgust to such a degree was truly rare for him.


Therefore, it was only fitting to punish the woman who spouted insolence and distorted judgement properly. However, he didn’t particularly feel like doing so.


Why…?


But as the question arose, an indescribable feeling of unease swept over him. It was strange, unsettling, and oddly discomforting. 


The fact that no reason readily came to his mind made it even more unsettling.


So, instead of delving into it and risking unnecessary danger, he chose to cover it up and ignore it instead.


“It’s time to rest now.”

 

Cardale gently lifted Elise’s back and knees.

 

“Ah!”

 

She felt her body being lifted. 

 

The sensation of her body pressing against his didn’t bother her. It was yet another strange occurrence.

 

Contact with others was still accompanied by disgust. A casual handshake was bearable, but that was it.

 

However, there was nothing wrong when Elise was hugged. At first, he thought it was because he was intoxicated by lust and that his nausea was masked, but that wasn’t the case.

 

Whether she clung to him in tears, hugged him in fear, or even when she was annoying or difficult, he couldn’t help but feel content.

 

Quickly reaching the bed, he gently placed her on the soft bedding.

 

“Why…?”

 

“Get some more sleep. You’re still tired.”

 

Cardale knew Elise’s sleep patterns well. Since she hadn’t fallen asleep until well past midnight, waking up now would leave her severely sleep-deprived.

 

“I’m really fine…”

 

Elise murmured in protest. But within ten minutes of Cardale laying her down and covering her eyes, she drifted off to sleep, breathing evenly.

 



 

A quiet peace settled over the bedroom. With that, the intentional halt to his thoughts ceased, and they began to flow again like gears interlocking on a clock.

 

It wasn’t tiring.

 

Elise Schuvan wasn’t tiring.

 

Contact didn’t bother him, nor was it uncomfortable. Intimacy was satisfying, and there was no annoyance in her requests.

 

Was there really a need to mould the mistress to suit him perfectly?

 

To keep her by his side and admire her beauty for a long time.

 

So…

 

“Just stay like this, Elise.”

 

Cardale acknowledged the exception that had come into his life. It was a tiny change, almost imperceptible.

 

But his touch as he tucked the blanket around her was as delicate as ever.

 




Hartmann’s butler opened the door as usual, only to gasp in horror.

 

“My Lord…!”

 

He rushed inside and lifted his master, who was sprawled on the rug as if unconscious.

 

Around Raymond were scattered bottles, and the rug was a mess of spilt liquor and broken glass.

 

“Hey, what are you standing there for? Quickly, call the physician!”

 

The butler anxiously paced, waiting for the doctor’s examination to finish.

 

“How is he?”

 

“Fortunately, there’s nothing serious. Once the intoxication wears off, he’ll be fine.”

 

Finally, relief washed over the butler’s face. He thanked the physician profusely and saw him off with generous gratuities.

 

“Good work.”

 

Once even the servants who tidied up the messy room left, only Raymond and the butler remained in the bedroom.

 

“It’s lucky that Marquis and Marchioness are away…”

 

For a while, Raymond, who had abstained from alcohol for some time, had started drinking again. Ironically, it was after attending a charity auction with the viscount and viscountess.

 

“Perhaps he ran into her there again.”

 

The butler sighed. However, apart from feeling sorry, as a mere butler, there was nothing he could do.

 

“It would be good if he could regain his composure soon.”

 

Looking back, the Hartmanns’ decision was wrong. It shouldn’t have been made if it was truly for their son.

 

But it was too late to undo what had already been done.

 

“In the end, time will tell…”

 

After the butler murmured bitterly and left the room, Raymond’s eyes flashed open.

 

His once beautiful emerald eyes, like spring foliage, now seemed dim and empty, as if plunged into an abyss.

 

For days now, his mind had been filled with only one person.

 

“Elise.”

 

He had attended the charity auction solely in the hope of seeing her. And as he had expected, Elise had come. 

 

With the Duke.

 

Raymond watched her intently, unable to take his eyes off her even for a moment. If she so much as glanced his way, it would spell disaster.

 

With luck, he hoped they could exchange a few words or at least greet each other. With this hope in mind, he waited and waited.

 

But disappointingly, Elise never once looked his way.

 

No, she seemed to have no interest in anyone.

 

Except for Cardale Vassenberg.

 

As much as he rationalised that the Duke, with his strong possessiveness, left her with no choice, there were limits to deceiving oneself.

 

Finally, he couldn’t deny the terrible and agonising reality.

 

Elise. 

 

The woman who was once his betrothed. The woman he had sincerely given his heart to.

 

Now, she wanted to be with the Duke.

 

But acknowledging it didn’t mean he could accept it.

 

Raymond quietly slipped out of bed.

 

If he wanted to go all the way to the palace and return without anyone knowing, time was running out.

 



 

“I heard you wanted to meet me.”

 

“Well, you took longer than I expected, Little Marquis Hartmann.”

 

Theresia replied with a long, drawn-out smile. But instead of falling for the Princess’s antics, Raymond cut to the chase.

 

“Since I came as promised, please tell me what this is about regarding Elise.”

 

“You seem rather impatient, don’t you?”

 



 

“No, wait. Are you anxious about something related to your former betrothed?”

 

Theresia chuckled sharply. Raymond deliberately chose not to respond.

 

After laughing for a while, Theresia spoke with a mischievous grin on her face.

 

“Did you hear too? Rumour has it that Elise Schuvan gets along quite well with the Duke.”

 

In an instant, Raymond’s expression stiffened. He stood up completely rigid from his seat.

 

“If you’re going to mock me, you’re mistaken. I will take my leave now.”

 

With a polite nod, Raymond turned and walked towards the reception room door. Just as he left, Theresia spoke from behind him.

 

“Aren’t you interested in meeting Elise Schuvan?”

 

Thud, Raymond’s steps came to a halt.

 

It was absurd. 

 

Even if it were possible, the Princess would never show such kindness to him. So, this was clearly a trap.

 

But despite thinking so, he couldn’t simply ignore it.

 

Eventually Raymond stiffly turned, as if his body creaked with each movement.

 

The Princess raised her teacup elegantly without looking at him. After taking a sip of tea, she spoke.

 

“I know of a good way.”

 

“I don’t believe you.”

 

Raymond replied. But both he and Theresia knew that his voice trembled at the end.

 

She pulled on the corners of her lips leisurely as she asked.

 

“You don’t believe me?”

 

“There’s no reason for Your Highness to help me.”

 

“Well, then you’re overflowing with belief.”

 

Theresia tilted her head slightly, smiling crookedly.

 

“If you have Elise Schuvan, then I can have Cardale Vassenberg.”

 

The tone of her words was overly candid, and it briefly flashed across Raymond’s face, a mix of confusion and discomfort.

 

Theresia internally mocked him.

 

‘You want that girl anyway.’

 

The difference lay only in the refined expression; ultimately, Raymond Hartmann and Theresia shared the same intrinsic desire.

 

“…But I heard that Your Highness is soon to be married.”

 

“We’ll see about that.”

 

If she could marry Cardale Vassenberg, then breaking off an engagement would be nothing.

 

“Besides, that’s none of the Little Marquis’s concern.”

 

Theresia shrugged her shoulders and prodded Raymond again.

 

“Well then, what will you do, Little Marquis?”

 

Raymond quietly clenched his fists.

 

It was a lie. Did he not know the Princess’s temperament? She was ultimately trying to use people, driven by her greedy and selfish nature.

 

Logical thoughts continued to cascade through his head. But something was strange.

 

He should leave immediately, but his steps didn’t seem to move away.

 

“You want Elise Schuvan.”

 

Then, like a siren’s tempting voice, Theresia’s voice penetrated Raymond’s ears.

 

“Don’t you want to see that woman become your bride?”

 

Thump. His heart rolled down. At the same time, a shiver ran through his entire body.

 

Elise in a beautiful wedding dress. The wedding ring slipping onto her slender finger. Lifting the veil to reveal her shy smile.

 

It was the image of her he had once imagined and eagerly awaited for in the near future.

 

If only he could have that back.

 

As if cracking an eggshell, his raw emotions rose, overriding his conscience and reason.

 

Theresia noticed his turmoil and smiled meaningfully.

 

“If you’re going to run away like a beaten dog, then there’s nothing I can do.”

 

She deliberately scratched his pride before driving in the final nail.

 

“Even if Elise Schuvan will forever be in another man’s arms because of your choice.”

 

Anger, desire, longing, and thirst mingled in Raymond’s eyes.

 

After a brief silence, he finally spoke.

 

“What should I do?”

 

Theresia laughed.

 

Her smile was terribly bright and inviting, contrasting with the darkness she insidiously brought into the conversation.

 

“Cardale Vassenberg’s birthday is coming up soon.”

 

She stood up from the table, encouraging him with gentle taps on his shoulder.

 

“Let’s give him an unforgettable gift.”

When Elise let out a brief sigh while checking the invitation box Norman brought her, Linda asked.

 

“Why are you doing this, lady?”

 

“Invitations are starting to increase again.”

 

Elise tilted the box slightly to show Linda, who nodded in response.

 

“Nobles who were away on vacation are likely returning after the last charity auction. As the weather gradually cools, it’s time to start preparing for the autumn social season.”

 

As Linda had said, although it was still hot at midday, the morning air was quite brisk.

 

“Autumn is already coming…”

 

Elise murmured softly as she looked out the window. The foliage was still dark green, but it seemed like autumn was peeking out between the leaves.

 

When did time pass like this?

 

Days at the Count’s residence seemed to drag on endlessly. But here, time flew by quickly.

 

‘Then the morning glories will soon wither…’

 

Elise felt a little disappointed. Then, she was startled by her own thoughts.

 

‘Disappointed? Me, of all people…’

 

“Lady Elise, the preparations are complete.”

 

Just then, Linda handed her clean paper and ink, along with a pen.

 

“T-Thank you.”

 

She quickly shook off her thoughts and took the pen.

 

Writing the replies to the invitations with Linda was quite enjoyable. After finishing the letters, she helped with the estate’s affairs.

 

At first, it was awkward and embarrassing knowing she was the mistress, but it became a familiar routine before she knew it.

 

“Winter fabrics, is it?”

 

“Yes. We need to hurry and place fabric orders to ensure the servants receive their clothes on time.”

 

It was explained that at the Duke’s residence, clothes were provided to the servants regularly according to the seasons.

 

“What do you think, Lady Elise?”

 

Elise examined the sample fabrics one by one.

 

“Wouldn’t this be too coarse and lose warmth? It will be okay until early winter, but it will be cold in midwinter. I think something with a tighter weave would be better.”

 

In addition to that, Linda sought a few more pieces of advice, and Elise carefully gave her opinions.

 

As time passed, Linda’s face gradually lit up with amazement. She had been silently observing Miss Elise she served and at an appropriate moment, she asked.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Forgive me if this is too presumptuous, but may I ask how many years you’ve been learning about the duties of a hostess?”

 

At that, Elise visibly flinched. After hesitating for a moment, she finally confessed, her lips trembling.

 

“It’s been about a year…”

 

Elise, feeling suddenly deflated, cautiously asked.

 

“Did I make a mistake?”

 

“Oh, no.” 

 

Linda quickly reassured her, her confidence diminishing. She then explained the reason for her inquiry. 

 

“I wouldn’t dare to judge, but you’re so meticulous that I wanted to ask.”

 

“Really?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Elise had been trying not to attach any significance to this, but she was honestly happy to hear the compliment just now.

 

“Thank you…”

 

She was a little excited and got the job done quickly.

 

The sight of her excited face with her cheeks flushed red was a little cute, so much so that a secret smile appeared on Linda’s lips, even though she was calm in everything she did.

 

‘She would have done well to be the mistress of any family.’

 

At the same time, Linda felt a bit sorry for this young lady.

 

‘Among the nobles of Inghel, there is no one who does not know where the young lady comes from.’

 

She felt sorry for the situation in which Elise had to endure it alone, even though her only real sin was the fact that she was born.

 

‘Still, it’s fortunate that the master has become more lenient.’

 

Even the Duke had become quite lenient towards his subordinates. As they exchanged stories about how their lord, who had been ruthless in punishing even slight mistakes, would now sometimes overlook them. Those belonging to Vassenberg hoped that this peace would last for as long as possible.

 

While Linda was lost in thought for a moment, Elise found one of her letters stuck in a folder.

 

‘She must have left it out by mistake.’

 

Since they’re people, mistakes often occur.

 

‘It’s okay because I can write a reply right away.’

 

She easily understood and opened the sealed letter to retrieve the invitation. 

 

But as soon as she read the contents, she was greatly embarrassed. Linda asked, belatedly noticing her expression. 

 

“Lady Elise, is there a problem?”

 

“No, it’s not that…”

 

Elise hesitated, unsure of what to say, before extending the invitation to Linda.

 

“It’s from Her Highness, the Princess.”

 

“Ah, I’m sorry.”

 

A perplexed expression crossed Linda’s face as she quickly accepted the letter.

 

“I’m truly sorry, Miss. The master has ordered all letters from Her Highness to be burned, so it seems this one got mixed in separately.”

 

“Oh, no, it’s okay.”

 

Elise hastily reassured her, extending both hands. However, as she recalled the contents of the letter she had just read, she tentatively asked.

 

“Um, it’s mentioned on the invitation that the Duke’s birthday is approaching…”

 

The Princess’s letter contained congratulations on the Duke of Vassenberg’s birthday, an invitation to visit the royal palace, and a prepared gift.

 

Upon hearing this, Linda’s expression became even more awkward than before as she replied.

 

“Yes. However, His Excellency doesn’t particularly celebrate birthdays.”

 

“Really?”

 

Surprised, Elise asked again.

 

“So, what does the Duke do on his birthday?”

 

“He usually trains in the martial arts hall, attends to his duties in the study, and sometimes meets people related to his work.”

 

“But he does that every day anyway…”

 

Elise continued to question in disbelief.

 

It was the first time Linda had seen her so passionate about something she usually found difficult. 

 

But eventually, all Elise learned was that the Duke’s birthday involved nothing special—no small parties, no visiting guests, no gifts, no special foods or cakes.

 

“Why…”

 

Elise trailed off.

 

Of course, she hadn’t had any grand birthday celebrations herself. 

 

Last year, while receiving an education at the Count’s residence, she had to go hungry on her birthday.

 

But apart from that, she and her mother had always managed to accumulate small memories.

 

It was so frugal that her mother embroidered her clothes with the coloured thread she bought, and she even bought more expensive soft bread to share.

 

Though small, each of these memories was precious to Elise.

 

‘A birthday is supposed to be the most special day of the year…’

 

She didn’t know the reason why, but she felt sorry for Cardale.

 

‘Would he dislike it if I wished him a happy birthday…?’

 

Elise pondered deeply. Memories flooded back of the time she had rashly offered comfort, only to bear the consequences all night long.

 

Especially the hurt of being misunderstood for sympathising too much with the master, had left a bitter and sad memory in her heart.

 

‘But so far, I’ve only ever received gifts from the Duke…’

 

Elise thought of the luxurious and expensive items filling the dressing room.

 

‘I also want to buy the Duke a gift.’

 

While Linda went to fetch refreshments, Elise quickly retrieved her purse from the bottom drawer of the desk.

 

It was a purse in which she kept the money she had earned for helping at the Duke’s estate. It was precious to her because it was earned through her own abilities.

 

Elise opened the purse and counted the coins inside. 

 

Gold, silver, and copper coins sparkled in the light.

 

‘It’s not much, but…’

 

Even so, she didn’t know if she could find something worth buying as a gift. A gleam of excitement shone in Elise’s eyes as she thought about it.

 

She hoped he would return a little earlier today.

 



As usual, Cardale headed straight to his study after returning home.

 

However, before he even had a chance to sit at his desk, someone came looking for him.

 

“Who’s here?”

 

“It’s Lady Elise, Your Grace.” 

In response to Michael’s answer, Cardale stared at him and asked.

 

“Are you kidding me?”

 

It was unusual for Elise to come to the study without being called. 

 

Since she took on the task of decorating the interior of the Duke’s residence, her range of action has expanded, but only in a few more places.

 

So, the idea of Elise coming to him sounded more like a joke.

 

“It is true, Your Grace.”

 

Michael decided that his words wouldn’t work, so he opened the door about halfway.

 

A clear voice flowed through the gap.

 

“Duke, may I come in?”

 

Cardale’s instinctive reaction was to take a quick look around the study.

 

Fortunately, there was nothing reminiscent of death. He had hidden his guns and bullets out of sight.

 

Satisfied that everything was in order, he walked over to the sofa and spoke.

 

“Come in.”

 

As if Michael had been waiting, he swung the door wide open, and Elise entered with brisk steps.

 

Cardale noticed immediately that she seemed to have something she wanted to ask him.

 

This was also unusual, so he felt a bit curious.

 

“Thank you for meeting me even though I came unexpectedly, Duke.”

 

Every night, he met her, held her, kissed her, and then she would cry herself to sleep in his arms.

 

Cardale felt a little flustered at her perfectly polite greeting as if she were meeting him for the first time. 

 

Nevertheless, he gestured for her to sit opposite him.

 

“Do you have something to say?”

 

Elise nodded eagerly. Her proactive attitude was also rare, sparking his interest.

 

“I wanted to ask if… if I could go out.”

 

“Go out?”

 

Once again, her head moved up and down. Her sparkling eyes were truly desperate.

 

What was it?

 

“Sure. We’ll go out together soon.”

 

It was when Cardale responded with a happy smile.

 

Elise urgently exclaimed.

 

“That’s not possible…!”
Elise was taken aback, and Cardale’s gaze softened.

 

“Not possible?”

 

She shifted her eyes, avoiding his gaze.

 

“I… I want to go alone this time.”

 

The way she fidgeted with her fingers gave away that she was hiding something.

 

“I’m requesting permission.”

 

Cardale’s hearing, keen beyond human standards, detected the sound of her heartbeat. It was beating rapidly. It was clear that this petite woman was up to something mischievous.

 

“You really should tell me what you’re up to.”

 

“I… I don’t want to lie.”

 

“Ha…!”

 

Cardale chuckled dryly. Elise, although visibly flustered, replied firmly.

 

“I’m sorry if I seem presumptuous. But I really don’t intend to do anything bad. I promise.”

 

What mischief could she possibly be up to?

 

Cardale, while certainly not a saint, had at least a somewhat objective view. So, he knew very well that it was the hunter, not the innocent little white deer, who engaged in mischief.

 

“Fine. I’ll allow it.”

 

“Really?”

 

“But you’ll need an escort. I’ll assign Michael to accompany you.”

 

Her momentarily brightened face quickly fell again. Elise glanced briefly at Michael standing by the door.

 

“But…”

 

She trailed off, hesitating. Then, with determination, she looked back at Cardale.

 

“But you’ll still hear from Sir Walter about what I’ve done.”

 

“What?”

 

“Then it won’t be me going alone.”

 

Cardale’s expression changed as if he had been hit over the head with a hammer.

 

“Is it still not allowed…?”

 

And there she was, her shoulders hunched in a small, timid gesture, asking timidly, unaware of what mischief she had caused.

 

“Ah…”

 

Cardale was dumbfounded.

 

It was natural for her to still be afraid of him, yet she was saying everything she wanted to say.

 

“Wanting to go outside without an escort? Absolutely not.”

 

Outside was filled with nothing but vicious beasts.

 

In filthy, squalid, greedy places, it was obvious what would happen if a beautiful white deer set foot out of its enclosure.

 

But he didn’t want to see that disappointment on her face.

 

So, Cardale proposed a compromise.

 

“Take Michael with you, but he won’t report back. Will that work?”

 

“You really won’t ask?”

 

“That’s right.”

 

Cardale called for Michael and gave his instructions in front of Elise.

 

“You’ve been entrusted to escort the lady, but not to report back on the details.”

 

Elise finally seemed relieved, smiling gratefully.

 

“Thank you, Duke.”

 

‘Naive.’

 

As soon as he changed his mind, Michael would surely report back everything he had heard.

 

Moreover, even if Michael was the one taking charge of following Elise, his silence implied that the subordinates below him were also moving. 

 

In other words, there were several more unseen escorts for Elise.

 

The naive deer seemed to believe firmly that she could secretly hide her outing from the hunter.

 

The deer’s cheeks were faintly flushed, whether from excitement at going out alone or for some other reason.

 

Cardale deliberately spoke casually.

 

“Be careful out there.”

 

“I will.”

 

With a wide smile, she secretly gestured to Michael. The loyal subordinate nodded and moved to gather the shadows of Vassenberg.

 

To protect the deer from stray arrows or traps.

 



 

Elise stepped out of the carriage onto a street lined with upscale shops.

 

“Do you have something you want to buy?”

 

“Yes.”

 

As she nodded vigorously, Michael felt somewhat puzzled.

 

Elise Schuvan wasn’t particularly materialistic. 

 

While she appreciated the dresses or jewellery given to her by the master, she didn’t seem eager to acquire them herself. 

 

Seeing them neatly stacked in the dressing room, it seemed like she didn’t even consider them her own.

 

Linda, too, commented on this strange behaviour.

 

‘It seems like she’s more delighted by the fact that her master gave her gifts than the items themselves.’

 

Anyway, it was unusual for her to want to buy something.

 

‘Especially wanting to purchase something secretly from her master. What could it be?’

 

Michael asked her somewhat nervously, “What item are you looking to buy?”

 

“Ahh…”

 

As Elise hesitated to answer, he quickly added.

 

“I want to help you find whatever item you need, my lady.”

 

The persuasion worked. 

 

Elise nodded and honestly replied.

 

“I want to buy men’s jewellery.”

 

“….Pardon?”

 

For a moment, Michael doubted his ears.

 

“I’m sorry. Could you please say that again?”

 

Embarrassed, she confessed in a small voice.

 

“I want to buy a gift for the Duke.”

 

“Ah!”

 

Michael exclaimed with relief.

 

‘Oh, I see.’

 

Suddenly, all her unusual behaviour today made sense.

 

“Linda told me that the Duke’s birthday is coming soon.”

 

“I see.”

 

The truth was so simply absurd that Michael was completely lost.

 

“But actually…”

 

Elise hesitantly pulled out her purse, untied it, and showed its contents to Michael.

 

“I only have this much money with me. So…”

 

Michael understood what she wanted to say and nodded.

 

“I know of a place that boasts decent quality items at a reasonable price.”

 

Of course, Michael had money given to him by Cardale for times like these. But he didn’t feel the need to mention it. 

 

Elise Schuvan wanted to buy the Duke a gift with the money she had saved up on her own.

 

‘The Duke’s estate will be peaceful for a while.’

 

As an aide whose life’s difficulty varied according to his master’s mood, Michael was happy with this development.

 

So, Michael resolved to help Elise wholeheartedly throughout the day.

 



 

Following Michael’s guidance, Elise entered the store and was captivated by the interior, which was quite different from the dressing rooms she had seen before.

 

The owner was a man with a stylishly grown moustache, neatly curled at the ends.

 

“Welcome, my lady. Do you have something specific in mind?”

 

“Can you recommend jewellery for a gift?”

 

“Oh, of course! Who is it for?”

 

Elise was about to answer “the Duke” without thinking but hesitated.

 

‘The Duke won’t like it if I say something in a place like this without permission.’

 

As she hesitated, the owner asked again with a cheerful smile.

 

“Perhaps for your husband?”

 

That question was enough to fluster Elise.

 

“Oh, uh, well…”

 

Stammering, she was rescued by Michael, who answered in her place.

 

“It’s for a gentleman of similar age to the lady.”

 

Realising his mistake, the owner quickly corrected himself.

 

“Yes, yes! We’ll show you our finest products. Wait just a moment!”

 

Elise finally breathed a sigh of relief and sat down on the sofa provided for guests.

 

“Thank you for helping.”

 

“It’s nothing.”

 

In the owner’s returning hands was a luxurious flat box.

 

Placed in front of Elise, the lid opened to reveal various pieces of jewellery.

 

“As for this boutonniere, it is the most popular product in our store these days.”

 

‘It seems a little too decorated.’

 

Elise shook her head.

 

“Then there is also a gold watch chain. Take a look at this one. Isn’t the craftsmanship exquisite?”

 

‘But the Duke doesn’t carry a watch.’

 

Elise declined again.

 

“Or perhaps cufflinks? They’re a new accessory for men, worn on the sleeves…”

 

Continuing to decline, Elise apologised while shaking her head.

 

‘I wish it were something the Duke would use often.’

 

“Is there anything else you might like?”

 

With a hint of embarrassment, the owner reluctantly produced another small box.

 

“We do have a cravat pin…”

 

At the mention of a cravat pin, Elise’s face lit up. It was something Cardale used every day.

 

‘He already has several, but…’

 

Still, she hoped there might be something special about this cravat pin.

 

“Could you show it to me?”

 

The owner, somewhat reluctantly, opened the box, revealing a cravat pin adorned with a deep red gem.

 

“…Is the colour of the gem a bit much?”

 

Despite being a high-quality item brought in at great expense, it had often been rejected by customers for its blood-like appearance. The owner didn’t have high hopes.

 

But Elise’s eyes sparkled with excitement. She murmured in a trembling voice.

 

“…It’s beautiful.”

 

The crimson gem resembled the beautiful colour of Cardale’s eyes. It was perfect.

 

“May I ask the price?”

 

“Are you really considering buying it?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Delighted to finally sell some stock, the owner offered it at the original cost, allowing Elise to purchase it with the money she had brought.

 

After paying, Elise left the shop with Michael, holding the well-packaged cravat pin in her hands.

 

‘Somehow, my heart feels full.’

 

‘Did the Duke give me gifts with this kind of feeling?’

 

‘I hope he likes it, even a little…’

 

Elise was smiling excitedly as she looked down at her gift, then suddenly raised her head.

 



 

Startled, she dropped the velvet pouch from her hand.

 

Standing before her was someone she never expected to meet here.

 

“It’s unexpected to see you here, Lady Elise.”

 

Raymond greeted her.

 “Little Marquis Hartmann.” 

 

Elise’s voice trembled as she spoke. Seeing Raymond shocked her.

 

Though he was still impeccably dressed, his face appeared excessively gaunt. His cheekbones were pronounced, his eyes deeply sunken, and shadows lurked beneath his gaze. 

 

His lips were chapped, and he looked as though he hadn’t slept or eaten properly.

 

‘He didn’t look this bad the last time I saw him…’

 

The last time she saw Raymond was at the opera house. Perhaps something had happened between him and the Duke? 

 

Maybe the Duke had said something harsh to him.

 

She had to leave first, per Cardale’s orders, so she didn’t know what had transpired between them afterwards. Cardale hadn’t told her, and she hadn’t dared to ask.

 

Elise couldn’t help but feel that whatever happened might have been her fault.

 

‘…Because of me.’

 

Feelings of guilt and self-reproach washed over her. It was shameful that she had been enjoying herself while someone else was in such distress.

 

Her excitement over buying the gift quickly faded, replaced by a muddy swirl of emotions.

 

“I’m sorry for startling you.”

 

But this time, it was Raymond who offered an apology first.

 

“Oh, no…”

 

As Elise hurriedly tried to pick up the fallen pouch, he bent down and retrieved it.

 

It was only then that she realised she had dropped the gift.

 

“Oh…”

 

Raymond sighed as he examined the broken box inside.

 

“It seems the box broke when it fell.”

 

“What?”

 

Elise reached for the box in haste, but Raymond stopped her.

 

“Wait. The broken edges of the box are sharp and dangerous.”

 

He reached into the box himself, retrieved the cravat pin, and handed it to her.

 

“Is this what you’re looking for?”

 

“Yes, yes… That’s it.”

 

As Elise hastily took the cravat pin, her heart sank.

 

‘The pin…’

 

The pointed part of her needle was bent, probably due to the heavy impact of falling to the floor.

 

‘What should I do with this…?’

 

She won’t be able to find the same item. Even if she did find it, she no longer had the money to buy it.

 

Elise held back the stinging sensation around her eyes and blinked as it was about to become watery.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

At that moment Michael, who had been observing the situation from close behind, called out to her.

 

“Don’t worry too much. It’s just the pin that’s damaged, so it should be repairable.”

 

“Really? Can it be fixed?”

 

“The shop is right next door. I’ll go ask the owner.”

 

Finding a glimmer of hope, Elise handed the cravat pin to Michael.

 

“Please do.”

 

“I’ll be right back.”

 

Michael discreetly signalled to the shadow guards, ensuring that neither of them noticed, before entering the shop.

 

Elise briefly glanced worriedly at the closed door before turning back to Raymond.

 

“Are you alright?”

 

She forced a smile and nodded.

 

“If the pin can’t be repaired, I’ll do my best to find something similar to replace it. Or perhaps I can compensate you somehow…”

 

“No, that’s not necessary.”

 

Elise objected.

 

“I dropped it by mistake. That’s not your fault, Little Marquis.”

 

“But you dropped it because you were startled by me, didn’t you?”

 

“Well…”

 

Her words trailed off. 

 

Seeing Raymond’s crestfallen expression only intensified her guilt.

 

Moreover, he seemed burdened, as if he were embracing all the sorrows of the world.

 

“I… I just hope that you’re doing well, Little Marquis.”

 

It took her a while to muster the courage to speak again. The words that finally came out were sincere, and Elise tentatively continued.

 

“I heard that you haven’t been active in social circles since the engagement was called off.”

 

She truly didn’t want to deceive Raymond. 

 

That’s why she always felt guilty about the breakup and wished him well, even though he looked like he was in agony.

 

“I’m sorry. No matter how I ask for your forgiveness, it’s not enough. I know your precious time was wasted because of me… You should find a better lady…”

 

“Forgive me, Lady Elise.”

 

Raymond suddenly interrupted, as if he didn’t want to hear any more.

 

“I completely forgot that I have an urgent matter to attend to.”

 

“Oh…”

 

“Come to think of it, I still had your purse. I almost took it with me.”

 

As he handed over the tightly sealed purse, Elise accepted it with a wave of relief.

 

“The contents might be dangerous, so it would be best if you went back and opened it.”

 

Just as Raymond noticed Michael emerging from the shop, he offered Elise a courteous farewell.

 

“It was a pleasure to meet you by chance, Elise. May our paths cross again.”

 

With a slight nod to Michael, Raymond turned and walked away.

 

Elise watched him leave, then turned to Michael in surprise as he approached.

 

“Oh, Sir Michael. You’re here.”

 

“Yes. There’s a craftsman nearby who can repair it.”

 

“That’s a relief…!”

 

A faint light returned to her face, which had darkened with worry about Raymond.

 

“It’ll take about three days, so it shouldn’t be later than the date you need it. I’ll come back as soon as the repair is done.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

A little while later, Elise boarded the Duke’s carriage.

 

As she sat down and looked out the window, she saw Michael riding alongside, escorting her.

 

‘It would be nice if Sir Michael could ride in the carriage comfortably…’

 

But she knew that Cardale didn’t allow Michael to ride in the carriage. Unaware of this, she looked at the empty seat opposite her and thought.

 

Then, her thoughts turned to the purse she had just received.

 

She knew she would have to discard the box, but she still hoped she could use the purse.

 

As she untied the knot, she realised that it was badly broken.

 

“It’s really broken.”

 

Elise sighed, disappointed that the once beautiful box was now damaged.

 

As she carefully took out the box, a small piece of paper fell onto her lap.

 

‘What’s this…?’

 

When she picked up the note and unfolded it, she was surprised to find a letter written on it. Her blue eyes widened.

 

[Lady Elise.

 

I write this letter with the hope of meeting you again someday.

 

If you ever need my assistance, please feel free to contact me. I leave my address below.

 

<182 Thember Street.>

 

Until we meet again,

 

Raymond Hartmann]

 

The familiar handwriting undoubtedly belonged to Raymond. 

 

Considering his affectionate nature, the contents of the letter seemed fitting. 

 

It should be enough to acknowledge and move on with gratitude for his courtesy.

 

But…

 

‘Why do I suddenly feel so uneasy…?’

 

It sounded like a grim prophecy that she would somehow need his help.

 

Elise was grateful for her current life. Meeting her mother was her only wish and desire. She didn’t want anything else.

 

That’s why the thought of receiving help from Raymond made her feel more afraid than relieved.

 

Her anxious gaze fell upon the carriage window. Belatedly, she realised that the curtains were drawn open, and her face turned pale.

 

‘No, this can’t be happening. If someone sees…!’

 

Elisabeth hastily pulled the curtains shut and pressed her hand firmly against her chest.

 

Her heart was pounding. 

 

Sweat began to form on her palms. 

 

She felt consumed by fear, as if she were a guilty person hiding a secret.

 

‘It’s strange. I only read the letter… Why do I feel so restless and scared?’

 

Despite her thoughts, her instinct leaned towards hiding the letter at all costs.

 

Elisabeth carefully folded the piece of paper and placed it securely in her pocket.

 

‘It’ll be okay. Nothing will happen. It’s just my mind playing tricks on me.’

 

Yet, her trembling hand betrayed her, and the image of the words she had just read lingered like a haunting memory on her closed eyelids.

 

[If you ever need my assistance, please feel free to contact me. I leave my address below.

 

<182 Thember Street.>]

 



 

“Someone will tail you without being noticed. So, first go back to the Marquis’ residence and then get moving.”

 

Raymond faithfully followed the Princess’s advice.

 

After returning to the Marquis’ residence, he contacted his target separately. The person Raymond met through such a secret process was a craftsman.

 

Raymond arrived at the meeting with the hood of his cloak pulled low, hiding his face.

 

The heavy bag passed from his hand to the blacksmith.

 

A greedy smile appeared on the man’s face as he checked the gold coins within.

 

“I guarantee you a masterpiece.”

 

The blacksmith assured him.

 

“You must also be careful with your words for the rest of your life.” 

 

Raymond warned.

 

“I’ll leave the city as soon as my work is done, never to return. So, don’t worry.” 

 

The blacksmith chuckled as he pushed the pouch into his pocket.

 

“About the poison? You said you would prepare it.” 

 

Raymond momentarily hesitated.

 

But once the plan starts rolling downhill, it will be impossible to stop.

 

“I only have one vial, so handle it with care.” 

 

He finally handed over the deadly vial.

 

A little later, in a dark alley, the blacksmith completely disappeared from sight. Leaving behind a man who had made an irreversible decision.

 

Standing in place, Raymond silently gazed into the night, thinking of someone.

 

“How could I possibly do well without you?”

 

Recalling the voice, filled with nothing but pure sincerity, had been all the more cruel.

 

‘I hope you’re doing well, even without me.’

 

‘Just when I was hoping to find a good lady…’

 

Driven solely by pure sincerity, his voice became even more bitter.

 

‘But for the sake of your wish, I must do it.’

 

‘For you alone.’

 

Raymond’s eyes gleamed darkly.

Cardale absentmindedly glanced out at the garden, furrowing his brows. 

 

Firstly, because there was no target to observe.

 

Secondly, because the target was out with Michael.

 

Thirdly, he found himself repeatedly glancing out the window despite knowing that.

 

It was too hot, and his concentration was a mess.

 

Despite it being the tail end of summer, Cardale found his usually efficient work dragging, and he was aware of it.

 

‘Maybe it’s better to brew some strong tea to clear my head,’ he thought, about to pull the bellrope when a knock came from the door.

 

“Master, it’s Norman.”

 

The report brought by the unexpected visitor was surprising.

 

“There’s someone who wishes to see you, Master.”

 

“Was this visit scheduled?”

 

His questioning wasn’t out of ignorance but a reprimand for the servant who informed him of an unscheduled visit.

 

Not oblivious to this, Norman lowered his head and replied.

 

“I apologise, Your Grace. But it seemed necessary to report the items that the visitor brought.”

 

Norman placed what he had brought on Cardale’s desk.

 

Cardale’s eyebrows twitched as he recognised the ruby gemstone, vividly red.

 

“Are you saying that someone other than Gerhard Schuvan brought this?”

 

“Yes. Moreover…”

 

Norman stopped himself from saying more. It seemed he deemed it inappropriate to speak further without careful consideration.

 

“…According to him, there’s information that must be conveyed to you urgently. What shall we do?”

 

Cardale lightly tapped his desk with his fingers, like playing a musical instrument, before giving his command.

 

“Let him in.”

 

“Yes, Master.”

 

Soon after, Norman returned with an unexpected guest.

 

Upon seeing the man’s face, Cardale immediately understood why his butler had acted out of character.

 

Silver hair resembling moonlight, clear azure eyes like the cloudless sky.

 

The young man’s facial features were similar to someone he knew, like twins.

 

“Nice to meet you, His Excellency Duke Vassenberg. My name is Damien Lydon.”

 

Lydon. 

 

It was a surname that commoners often added after their first name. Two or three out of ten have it.

 

However, unlike his common name, his manners were impeccable.

 

“Are you from the academy?”

 

Damian looked at Cardale with slightly surprised eyes.

 

“There aren’t many places where commoners can learn standard etiquette.”

 

Cardale leaned comfortably against the back of his chair, clasped his hands, and looked at Damian.

 

“I don’t particularly enjoy wasting time.”

 

Understanding the implied request to get to the point, Damian spoke up.

 

“Have you verified the gem I brought to you?”

 

“I’m considering whether to report it to the security forces.”

 

It was a question of whether it was stolen. 

 

Damian replied calmly.

 

“I merely picked up the gem that was dropped while the owner was intoxicated, but even that could be considered theft.”

 

“The person who dropped it?”

 

“Is Fritz Schuvan.”

 

Cardale recalled his encounter with Fritz. It could have been either Gerhard or Fritz, but if it was Fritz, then the purpose was obvious.

 

So, he’s bringing evidence on his own, instead of leaving it for Cardale to find.

 

Cardale smirked.

 

“Fritz frequents a clubhouse.”

 

“A common hobby.”

 

“There’s a secret passage hidden there.”

 

A big fish was reeled in.

 

Cardale’s mouth pulled back so his teeth could almost be seen.

 

“I’ve seen Fritz Schuvan using those gems to enter through the secret passage.”

 

“So?”

 

“I suspect that the place within the headquarters is under the jurisdiction of the spies infiltrated by Helmut.”

 

The conversation was starting to get interesting. The prospect of dealing with someone like Damian was intriguing.

 

“In other words, what you’re saying is…”

 

Cardale narrowed his eyes and spoke.

 

“Fritz Schuvan is a traitor collaborating with Helmuth?”

 

“Yes.”

 

There was no hesitation in the response.

 

“I’ve heard that His Grace has taken on the task of rooting out traitors. That’s why I want to report what I’ve found.”

 

“How can I trust this?”

 

Cardale twisted his lips as he spoke.

 

“You’ve brought me stories without any evidence. Just circumstantial evidence and speculation. How can you prove it’s not a false report?”

 

In fact, the informants of Vassenberg had already confirmed Fritz’s connection with Helmut. Therefore, Damian’s information was likely to be true.

 

However, Cardale deliberately asked this to test the other party.

 

“If you search their hideout, you’ll surely find several more rubies similar to this one I brought you.”

 

He would, indeed. Cardale already planned to secure those pieces of evidence first if he raided the scene.

 

“But how will you implicate Fritz Schuvan?”

 

One ruby is here, and the rest are in the hideout of Helmut’s men.

 

“Just grabbing something that isn’t his won’t be enough.”

 

At that, Damian stared straight at him. His expression was neutral, but his eyes were piercing.

 

“You must know, Your Grace. The person who gifted those jewels to Count Schuvan was none other than yourself.”

 

How thrilling.

 

Cardale was slightly impressed.

 

Or perhaps it was just a casual remark, as light as air.

 

He scrutinised Damian with sharp eyes.

 

‘Not bad.’

 

Those eyes were alive. They conveyed not only determination but resolve.

 

Another pair of eyes of the same colour came to mind. They were gentle, soft, and round like a deer’s.

 

‘…How should I do it?’

 

Cardale’s thoughts were brief. He made a compassionate decision to add him to his plans for his deer.

 

So, he asked directly.

 

“Is there something you want?”

 

“No, there isn’t.”

 

Damian replied immediately, then added,

 

“I only wish Fritz Schuvan gets the punishment he deserves.”

 

After finishing speaking, he bowed deeply with proper etiquette.

 

Then, as he turned to leave, Cardale threw out another question.

 

“Do you want a peerage?”

 

His steps came to a halt. A slight confusion flickered on his expressionless face.

 

‘Did you say Damien Lydon?’

 

Cardale thought as he looked into Damian’s wavering eyes.

 

Perhaps the common surname might change soon.

 



 

If Elise had returned a little earlier, or if Damian had left later, they might have encountered each other.

 

At the very least, if Elise had pulled back the curtains covering the carriage windows, she might have spotted the silver-haired, blue-eyed young man leaving the mansion.

 

But that coincidence didn’t occur, and the two just passed each other.

 

For a moment, only Damian watched the back of the carriage entering the Duke’s residence, raising a cloud of dust.

 

As soon as Elise got off the carriage, she said to Michael,

 

“I’m a bit tired… Can I go in first?”

 

“I’ll escort you to your room.”

 

“No, it’s okay!”

 

She blurted out loudly, then quickly tried to recover.

 

“It’s, it’s okay. You’re probably busy too, and Walter… I can go to my room alone.”

 

“I apologise, my lady. But I was instructed to escort you to the entrance.”

 

However, Michael firmly refused her suggestion, and in the end, Elise had no choice but to accompany him.

 

She gripped the top of her pocket tightly. Sweat moistened her palms, causing the pocket to slip.

 

‘It’s okay. I tied the opening with a string, so even if it falls, I can pick it up again.’

 

Elise tried to remain calm as she followed Michael into the mansion.

 

“Miss, did you enjoy your outing?”

 

Linda and a few maids were waiting at the wide-open entrance of the mansion.

 

“Yes, yes. I did enjoy it.”

 

As more people gathered, Elise’s tension increased. She gripped her pocket tightly enough to whiten her knuckles.

 

Luckily, nothing happened until they reached her room.

 

“Miss, shall I prepare the bath for you?”

 

She knows what Linda went to buy today, so she smiled softly and said.

 

“Well, I’d like to take a break for a while. Can I ask you to do it later?”

 

“Of course.”

 

After everyone left the room, Elise quickly untied the string of her pocket and took out the note inside. She wanted to burn it before anyone saw it.

 

Luckily, it was late afternoon, so there were candles lit in the bedroom.

 

Elise hurriedly brought the note to the tip of the desk candle. The edges of the paper burned black, emitting faint smoke, and soon the fire spread.

 

‘Just a little bit faster…’

 

She was so anxious that even the short time it took for the small note to burn felt difficult to wait through.

 

Without realising it, Elise brought the paper closer to the candle flame, as if trying to push it. But then she quickly withdrew her hand.

 

“Ah…!”

 

She pulled her hand away from the scorching heat, but blisters had already formed on her burnt fingers.

 

“Ouch…”

 

As her fingertips stung and tingled, tears welled up in her eyes.

 

“Elise?”

 

Startled, as if caught red-handed, Elise turned her body abruptly. Cardale, who had just strode into the room, was now standing right in front of her.

 

He grabbed her wrist tightly and lifted it up in one swift motion.

 

“Sh!t.”

 

He cursed as he noticed her red, burnt finger with blisters.


Cardale’s voice commanding to bring cold water and burn ointment was rough.


Including Linda, the maids waiting outside the door quickly moved as soon as they understood the situation.


Soon, Elise’s hand was immersed in a bowl of cold water.


“How could you mishandle the candles?”


“I’m sorry, Duke.”


As Cardale scolded Linda, Elise urgently interjected, trying to defend her.


“I accidentally burned myself, Duke. Please don’t blame Linda.”


He narrowed his eyes as if displeased with someone, but said no more.


Instead, he personally treated Elise’s hand.


While Cardale cooled the burn and applied the ointment before wrapping it with a clean cloth, Elise bit her lip, pondering how to handle the situation.


‘What if the Duke saw it? What excuse could I give…’


She couldn’t bring herself to tell him the truth.


If she admitted to burning the letter, she would be questioned about the sender, and revealing it was from Raymond might upset him.


Moreover, she was even more afraid to disclose the contents of the letter.


Elise’s eyes flickered over the desk.


‘What if there’s any trace left from burning it?’


Fortunately, all of the paper was burned and no note was left. However, she didn’t know if there was any ash or debris scattered on the desk.


Her blue eyes flickered busily.


‘There doesn’t seem to be anything visible…’


“It’s all done.”


Elise snapped her gaze back. Cardale tied a knot in the thin cloth and finished the treatment.


“T-Thank you…”


She muttered a small thank you with a trembling voice.


But even as she did, she feared what he might say next. Sweat chilled on her uninjured hand, and her heart pounded.


“Elise.”


“Y-Yes…!”


“Why are you so tense?”


Her body jerked with a jolt. She couldn’t say anything, just pursed her lips.


“Did it hurt that much?”


Elise quickly nodded her head.


She hoped he hadn’t seen it so he would just overlook it.


His slender fingers suddenly appeared in front of her face and wiped under her eyes. The slight moisture under her eyes followed the movement of his thumb.


“You make so many mistakes and cry every time.”


“I’m sorry…”


“It’s not a deep burn, so you’ll be better in a few days.”


As she nodded, something warm and soft settled on her forehead. It was a gentle, brief kiss.


“Be careful not to get hurt in the future.”


“Yes…”


His fingers felt like they were digging into her hand as he slipped a ring onto her finger. She hadn’t seen it. Elise felt relieved but also guilty at the same time.


‘He’s being so affectionate… It hurts to deceive the Duke…’


But she couldn’t muster the courage to be honest this time.


She was afraid of losing his warmth, afraid that this affection would disappear like foam on water. She despised her cowardice and weakness, but she couldn’t bring herself to give it up.


It was too precious and dear to lose.


Even if just for a moment, she wanted to cherish it a little longer.


“I’m sorry…”


That’s why Elise chose to hide her secret and bury her deception.


For some reason, she felt like crying.





In the social circle of Inghel, there were several popular clubhouses. 


Although there were various types of clubhouses, recent attention was on a relatively new establishment near Clock Tower Square.


With its sophisticated and stylish atmosphere, word spread gradually but led to a recent increase in membership. Especially among the young nobility, including the gentry class.


Today, a special guest had come to such a place.


“Duke Vassenberg, this way please!”


Cardale saw a man waving his arm high, holding his hand up high.


Since access and membership to clubhouses was usually allowed through invitations from existing members, he must have been contacted by someone.


“Viscount Park.”


“It’s been a while, Your Grace! Have you been well?”


Cardale had some acquaintanceship with the Viscount from their days at the academy. Although his somewhat scruffy demeanour was not very noble-like, Cardale refrained from making any comments.


“It’s been a few years since I’ve had a conversation with Your Grace since graduating from the academy.”


Although he didn’t recall mixing words with him back then, Cardale didn’t bother to correct him.


“With so many people around you all the time, I need to find a gap to slip in. Oh, of course, it’s not Your Grace’s fault! It’s just a little frustrating, shall we say…?”


“Let’s go inside.”


Finally catching on to the atmosphere, Park promptly guided the Duke without further delay.


It was a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to take up some of Vassenberg’s time, and Park didn’t want to miss it by unintentionally offending the Duke’s sensibilities.


“Welcome. Would you like to show your membership card?”


The footman was welcoming guests at the entrance and recited his words according to the prescribed guidelines, casually turning his head to the side before being taken aback.


He had frequently seen noble figures, but this man was unlike any he had ever encountered before.


The perfectly formed man possessed an almost surreal appearance. His silhouette, hidden beneath the conquering attire, was overwhelming.


He seemed like the embodiment of a mythological war god appearing in the human realm. Such was this man’s perfection.


“Here it is, the membership card.”


“Ah, I’ve checked it!”


The bewildered footman finally snapped out of his daze and straightened himself, shouting.


The man who handed over the membership card then opened his mouth proudly with a grin.


“Do you know who the person I’m accompanying is?”


“Excuse me?”


“It’s none other than Cardale Vassenberg. The hero of the empire who led us to victory in the war against Helmut, Duke of Vassenberg!”


The footman’s face turned pale as if all the blood had drained from his body.


“Viscount, you’re being too loud.”


“Oh, I’m sorry.”


Understanding the meaning of being silenced, Park quickly clapped his hands over his mouth.


“I got a little too excited unexpectedly meeting someone so rare. Hahaha!”


Viscount completely failed to notice the change in the footman’s expression as he chuckled.


“So, please guide us to a good seat. After all, our guest is quite special!”


“Yes, yes! I understand.”


Meanwhile, Cardale had been observing the footman, and quietly twisted his lips upon seeing the complete disappearance of colour from his face.


As they walked away with the guide, Cardale carefully inspected the structure of the building. He had already estimated its overall size from the outside.


Their seats were strategically positioned, shielded by large pillars to remain out of sight from others, yet providing a slight gap to overlook the interior.


“How is it?”


“Hmm, it’s decent.”


Viscount Park chuckled and handed a coin to the footman.


However, the footman didn’t seem particularly pleased even after receiving the tip.


He seemed distracted, as if his mind was elsewhere, like someone eager to leave this place as quickly as possible.


Meanwhile, Cardale quickly scanned the interior and spotted someone.


Just as the footman left and Viscount Park ordered drinks from a staff member, he followed Cardale’s gaze to the same person.


“It’s Fritz Schuvan!”


“Does Fritz Schuvan come here often?”


“Yes. He’s a member of this club.”


Then, as if sharing a secret, Viscount Park whispered with a lowered voice.


“It’s almost like he’s a fixture here. There’s a joke going around among the insiders that some folks practically live in the clubhouse. He’s probably going to spend quite a bit of money again today, don’t you think?”


This was enough.


Having confirmed what he needed, Cardale turned without hesitation.


Viscount Park looked bewildered and asked.


“Y-Your Excellency? Where are you going?”


“I have some business to attend to.”


With that, Cardale left before Viscount Park could react. As they exited, a footman could be seen quickly heading somewhere down the corridor.


Cardale kept his gaze fixed on his target as he walked.


Step by step, the rhythmic sound of his shoes tapping against the marble floor echoed. He intentionally didn’t reduce the volume of his footsteps despite being able to. It was a deliberate choice.


It didn’t take long for the distance to close. When it was a narrow halfway, the footman suddenly turned his head upon hearing the sound.


“Ah!”


Turning his head abruptly, he gulped and quickened his pace. Cardale didn’t rush.


“Ahh!”


After a moment, the footman turned back and pondered, then began to run.


Soon, they reached a hall with stairs that lead to both the entrance and the second floor.


Cardale leisurely asked himself.


‘Which way will he choose?’


Depending on the choice, Cardale could close his eyes. Whether he catches the prey or lets it go doesn’t matter.


And the footman chose the stairs. Cardale observed as the man hurriedly climbed the stairs.


‘How foolish.’


Cardale grabbed the railing and leapt up, landing squarely on the stairs. In an instant, the positions of the two men were reversed.


“Hah, hah…!”


The startled footman attempted to turn around but it was futile. His legs wouldn’t move.


Realising something was amiss, his consciousness faded.


Cardale ascended the stairs, then found the secret passage Damian had mentioned effortlessly.


It was quite a sophisticated entrance, but it fell short of deceiving his eyes. Especially when he had already grasped the building’s layout thoroughly.


Cardale exited the clubhouse without any hindrance.


That was the signal.


Subsequently, the elite forces of Vassenberg raided the clubhouse, and it took no more than half an hour to apprehend the Helmut spies who were gathered there.


The regulars of the clubhouse were suddenly startled by soldiers storming in.

 

‘Damn it…!’

 

The moment the door opened, Fritz instinctively hid under the table, buying himself some time.

 

He curled up, surveying the situation around him. Cold sweat trickled down his spine.

 

‘What should I do? I need to get out of here…!’

 

However, the entrance was blocked, and the soldiers were systematically checking the faces, names, and identities of the guests.

 

“Take him away.”

 

“No, this is a mistake!”

 

The man who was just detained pleaded, but was grabbed by the soldiers and taken away. He was someone Fritz had shared a few drinks with before, an informant for Helmut.

 

‘Seems like he worked with Helmut, too.’

 

Fritz didn’t know all the spies and informants, not even for Helmut, he had dealings with.

 

‘Damn it, who the hell reported us? Or did some idiot get caught?’

 

Fritz didn’t even consider the possibility that he might be that idiot.

 

‘I’ll worry about it once I’m out. It’s pointless if I get caught!’

 

It wasn’t hard for Fritz to imagine ending up like the man who was just taken away if he didn’t escape soon.

 

Fritz chewed on his lip, contemplating.

 

‘Wait, come to think of it, there was an unused exit over there! If I sneak out that way without anyone noticing…’

 

Thinking of his escape route, Fritz practically crawled toward the back of the building. Tables, pillars, and decorations covered his movements.

 

There were several close calls, but luckily, he managed to reach near the back door.

 

‘It’s right here!’

 

He pushed aside some stacked items, and the door appeared. Fritz eagerly grabbed the handle, but his joy was short-lived.

 

‘Damn it!’

 

His face contorted in frustration. The door was locked.

 

‘Damn it, Damn it, Damn it…!’

 

The soldiers were advancing. There was only one exit, and their search was thorough. There was nowhere to hide.

 

If things continued like this, it was just a matter of time until he got caught.

 

With a desperate jerk, Fritz pulled and turned the handle as if possessed.

 

He was determined to break the door if he had to in order to get out, but as soon as the noise came out, his position was compromised.

 

“What are you doing?”

 

“Gah…!”

 

As the soldier aimed his gun at him, Fritz raised his hands and turned his head sideways.

 

“Come out.”

 

The soldier gestured with his chin to the side. Trembling, Fritz complied. His legs felt weak, making it hard for him to stand properly.

 

“What’s your name?”

 



 

Swallowing dryly, Fritz’s eyes jumped around the room. But fearing immediate execution if he remained silent, he spoke up.

 

“F-Fritz Schuvan!”

 

The soldier furrowed his brow, and then spoke to another soldier. Fritz watched nervously as they conversed.

 

After a moment, the soldier approached him.

 

“Go and stand over there.”

 

The soldier pointed to a place where civilians unrelated to the incident were gathered. Fritz quickly squeezed himself among them.

 

‘It seems my name wasn’t on the list. I panicked for nothing like a fool.’

 

Thanks to Cardale’s order, Fritz didn’t know he was excluded from the list.

 

For a while, faint vibrations echoed from the ceiling, followed by sharp sounds of metal scraping, screams, and gunfire.

 

After all the screening fell silent, startled people scattered in all directions. Fritz, fearing someone might recognise him, quickly left the scene.

 

He made his way to the bustling Clock Tower Square, hailed a cab, and slumped into a chair.

 

“Phew… thought I was done for.”

 

Fritz massaged his trembling legs and muttered under his breath.

 

“They must have caught them all…?”

 

He had no idea what happened on the second floor. However, as he left the building, he saw splatters of blood scattered on the stairs and in the hallway. It was a desperate situation, he presumed.

 

“Damn it…!”

 

Fritz roughly ran his hands through his hair. With their hideout compromised, it was as good as over for all of them.

 

“What should I do? That Helmut guy will definitely mention my name during his interrogation.”

 

Though he was fortunate to escape today, it was only a matter of time before he got caught.

 

Anxious, Fritz chewed on his fingernails, and his legs shook uncontrollably. The chase was right under his nose.

 

“That Damn Cardale Vassenberg. It’s all because of him. If it weren’t for him!”

 

He cursed vehemently, but it was futile. The traitor had only one option. Either be executed through torture, or be executed without torture in exchange for everything he knew.

 

But Fritz didn’t want to endure torture, nor did he want to die.

 

“I guess I’ll have to leave the Empire for a while.”

 

He couldn’t rely on Helmut keeping quiet. It seemed better to hide in another country until things calmed down and then return to the Empire.

 

“But my father won’t give me money… What should I do?”

 

Even to flee and find refuge elsewhere, he needed money. However, his father Gerhard had cut him off.

 

“Damn it, if I had known, I would have saved something to sell off. I wouldn’t have lost that ruby at least!”

 

Fritz cursed the Damn bastard who stole the jewel while he was drunk, rubbing his face furiously with his palm.

 

“Damn it, where can I get some money?”

 

It was then that someone popped into Fritz’s mind.

 

“Right, there’s that bitch!”

 

Fritz revealed a sly smile as he realised.

 

“Why didn’t I think of her before? She’s got the best source of money.”

 

Fritz recalled the luxurious jewels Elise had adorned herself with. With those alone, life in another country wouldn’t even be dull.

 

No. He realised he might not even need to return to the Empire with that kind of money.

 

“Well, I need to figure out how to meet the little devil.”

 

It was just the beginning of the autumn social season, a perfect opportunity for Fritz.

 



 

Elise hid her body under the blanket, leaving only her face peeking out as she watched Cardale.

 

He had just finished his morning training, showered, and left the bathroom.

 

“I hope it wasn’t too difficult for you.”

 

Despite tormenting her all night long, he would always wake up fresh and start his day at the appointed time.

 

Elise always found it fascinating, yet at the same time, worried about his well-being.

 

Cardale ran his fingers lightly through his wet hair. Because of his thin gown, his silhouette followed his movements.

 

With a flick, the gown fell, revealing the man’s entire physique.

 

Muscles carved around his sunken spine, a firm buttocks, and rock-solid thighs beneath his waistline were revealed in succession.

 

Knowing the pleasure that body could bring, Elise unconsciously blushed and quietly pulled the blanket up just below her eyes.

 

However, Cardale didn’t miss that subtle movement.

 

“You’re awake.”

 

Elise nodded, covering herself with the sheet as she sat up.

 

“No more sleep for you?”

 

Elise shook her head. There was something important she had to do today.

 

“I want to help you get dressed.”

 

Luckily, Cardale didn’t object to her proposal.

 

Thanks to her offer, Elise saw the marks left by her nails on the man’s neck and blushed at the realisation that he kept a handkerchief soaked with his cologne in the left drawer to indulge himself every night.

 

“I-I’ll tie your cravat for you.”

 

Even though it wasn’t her first time, she felt even more nervous than the first. Fortunately, when the knot turned out nicely, Elise smiled faintly and pulled away.

 

Now was time to secure the cravat pin.

 

“Um, please wait a moment.”

 

Elise quickly retrieved the gift she had hidden under the bed. It was something Michael had brought after it had been repaired yesterday.

 

‘I’m glad I can give it to him in time.’

 

Elise approached Cardale hesitantly, holding out the box.

 

“Happy birthday, Duke.”

 

The man’s eyes widened slightly. Cardale finally realised the reason behind her unusual request.

 

“Was that outing last time… to buy this?”

 

Elise nodded.

 

“I’m sorry. The box got broken on accident…”

 

“That doesn’t matter.”

 

Cardale opened the box, and in his large palm, the cravat pin rolled about. It was adorned with a vivid red gem.

 

“I bought it because it matches the colour of your eyes, Duke.”

 

In response to Elise’s confession, he smirked teasingly.

 

“My eyes usually look ominous.”

 

“No, they don’t!”

 

Elise was startled, not realising it was a joke. She quickly shook her head and said,

 

“They’re not ominous. They’re as beautiful as the sunset.”

 

For a moment, Cardale was taken aback. As his expression slightly stiffened, Elise felt a little flustered.

 

“…Duke.”

 

As his eyes, shining as brightly as the sun, seemed to pierce through her. Elise felt utterly captivated, unable to move a muscle.


It felt like her whole body was being pierced. Still, she couldn’t avoid his gaze.

 

‘Did I make another mistake?’

 

Her anxious heart was beating rapidly.

 

‘Maybe the Duke doesn’t like being called pretty. I should have said it’s a nice, magnificent eye colour…’

 

‘Why do my thoughts never come to mind when I’m speaking, only flood in after the words are spoken?’

 

‘If I had been more talkative than I am now… Maybe the Duke would see me as a better woman.’

 

She wanted to show him at least a little bit of her good side. She never wanted anything. Just…

 

Then, a warm hand gently touched her cheek. Startled, her body flinched, but she soon found herself leaning into the warmth of his palm.

 

‘How can his hand be so warm…?’

 

Even in the sweltering heat of midsummer, she didn’t mind the heat emanating from him. In fact, being embraced by his warm chest made her feel like melting away.

 

He looked down at her intently and finally opened his mouth.

 

“Yes, pretty.”

 

His fixed gaze felt so surreal. Surely, it must mean he likes the cravat pin, but because of his unwavering gaze, she couldn’t help but entertain nonsensical thoughts.

 

‘Could it be that he meant I’m pretty…?’

 

‘No. Don’t be mistaken.’

 

Elise quickly shook herself from her thoughts and looked up at Cardale.

 

“Fix it well.”

 

Her nervous mind was finally relieved, and relief spread throughout her body.

 

‘The Duke must like it since he accepted it. That’s enough.’

 

When she thought that way, she was able to push her slightly sad heart into an invisible corner. Instead, small joys and rewards came.

 

‘He accepted my gift. He also said the gift was pretty…’

 

Meanwhile, Cardale quietly looked at Elise’s face as it gradually brightened and beautifully bloomed.

 

Her round eyes folded in half, and her cheeks flushed pink. Her small, pretty lips curved slightly.

 

“May I… put on the pin for you?”

 

To the woman who shyly asked, Cardale gave an obvious answer.

 

“Yes, make it pretty.”

 

With a small nod, Elise took half a step closer to him. Her fragrance, like dew-drenched grass, brushed against his nose. It was her distinctive scent.

 

Suddenly, an impulse arose in him to pull down the thin negligee covering her body. To bury his nose in her neck and inhale her scent deeply.

 

The reason he barely managed to suppress the urge was solely because he wanted to see Elise carefully touching his cravat pin with her small hands.

 

A cheap pin with an unknown gem or a mere imitation of a gem.

 

Being brought such a thing as a gift and being so satisfied with it was a strange occurrence.

 

As she blushed and carefully assessed where to insert the pin, it suddenly seemed adorable to him.

 



 

At the thought that crossed his mind inadvertently, Cardale momentarily paused.

 

‘She is adorable, huh…’

 

It was a very unfamiliar word to him. It sounded like something from another world, so different from his life. He couldn’t understand it, nor did he feel the need to understand it.

 

Yet, he thought of such a word.

 

For the woman he would toy with and later discard.

 

Naturally, Cardale couldn’t accept or tolerate it. So, he changed it to a more acceptable, appropriate phrase.

 

‘I’m still not satisfied.’

 

It was just a slightly mocking and cute gesture. It could even be seen as playful banter.

 

It was when he managed to come up with an answer that pleased him. A tingling sensation arose under his neck.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Elise was startled and let out a short scream. Her hands were urgent as she lifted the cravat. Soon, her face turned white as she noticed something.

 

“Blood, blood…”

 

Only then did Cardale realise that she had hurt his neck by mistake. When he turned his head and checked the mirror, he saw a round drop of blood.

 

It was a minor wound. If he leaves it alone, it will heal completely in seconds. No, it was already healed.

 

However, the woman’s reaction was quite amusing to him.

 

With a casual gesture, he wiped away the droplet of blood and then covered his now clean skin with the cravat as he spoke.

 

“I also feel pain when I get pricked by a sharp pin.”

 

“I’m s-sorry… … .”

 

Elise hastily apologised, not realising it was just a mischievous joke.

 

“It’s just that the pin suddenly went in so deep… It’s, it’s definitely my fault, but… I’m sorry…”

 

Her flustered and apologetic expression was also a first. Cardale didn’t take his eyes off her for a moment, then threw a casual remark.

 

“Well, am I going to die if I bleed a little? It’s nothing to worry about.”

 

Eventually, Elise’s face became tearful. Although it could be explained as a joke, Cardale didn’t bother to do that.

 

He had no intention of missing the opportunity to tease her, which had been bothering him since earlier.

 

He leisurely wrapped his hand around Elise’s neck. Her tender and soft skin never seemed to wear down no matter how much he touched it.

 

“Well, then you should be the one to treat it.”

 

“Uh, th-then should I get some medicine…”

 

“Not that one.”

 

Cardale ran his fingers down her slender neck then back up, grasped her chin tightly, and bent down.

 

His touch was cold, and her long, dense eyelashes trembled slightly as she briefly lifted her mouth.

 

“Open your lips.”

 

He commanded as he lightly grazed the space between their sealed lips with his tongue. The tender lips naturally parted, welcoming him.

 

His warm and slippery tongue delicately explored her mouth, brushing against her teeth and gently caressing the mucous membrane before entangling with hers.

 

With each gentle suck, her slender body trembled. Cardale chuckled as he enjoyed the candid response from the woman.

 

“Mmm…”

 

He swallowed her lips again and wrapped his arms around Elise’s waist, pulling her close to him. His excited hardness rubbed against her skinny stomach. The excitement soared even more.

 

Cardale checked the time.

 

Because he woke up earlier than usual, he had plenty of time to spare. He gave strength to the arm wrapped around the woman’s waist.

 

“…Ah!”

 

As he lifted her up, Elise lost her footing on the ground and nestled into his arms.

 

His steps toward the bed were quick as he laid the woman down, completely trapping her slender body underneath him. A soft gasp escaped her lips, her blue eyes trembled almost pitifully.

 

Although she wasn’t as frightened as a captured deer, what could she really do?

 

He was hungry, and there was no room for leisure when his prey was right in front of him.

 

“Elise.”

 

If a predator had caught their prey, it was only natural for the prey to offer itself completely. Until the predator felt satisfied, the fate of the pitiful deer was to be picked apart and devoured.

 

“If you hurt someone, shouldn’t you comfort them?”

 

But the beast, disgustingly, sought permission.

 

It wasn’t for the sake of the pitiful prey.

 

He knew from numerous experiences that it would taste better if he devoured her like this.

 

“You usually act so caring and comforting. But now that there’s blood, are you going to pretend you didn’t see it?”

 

“T-that’s not it.”

 

Elise, feeling the sting of guilt as expected, hastily lowered her head.

 

Cardale, noticing that his words were getting through to her, and didn’t hesitate to exploit her weakness.

 

“Do something nice for me. It might make me feel better.”

 

Despite his absurd reasoning, he remained confident. Ironically, it was Elise who seemed unsure.

 

“B-but…”

 

She darted her eyes and nervously nibbled on her lip, speaking in a soft voice.

 

“You should… go back to your duties now…”

 

Even in the midst of this, she maintained an innocent expression while making mischievous noises.

 

As if to say, she was worried about getting devoured. No, it doesn’t matter, because soon she won’t be able to think about anything.

 

Of course, Cardale turned even this to his advantage.

 

“That’s why you should hurry, right?”

 

“Ah…!”

 

His hand clenched the negligee, and in the blink of an eye, the thin fabric was flipped, revealing her bare body underneath.

 

“Ah…!”

 

On the pristine white sheets, Elise was now completely naked and desperately covered her chest and lower body with her hands. Tears welled up in her eyes.

 

Cardale slid his index finger down the gap between her thighs, pressed together when he pulled the negligee tight. Her tender body trembled.

 

He let out a low chuckle.

 

This was why he bothered to strip her naked even though she could be touched as much as he wanted with her negligee on.

 

Because the sight of her blushing and embarrassed body was incomparable. 

 

Just a little touch here, and she would soon moan so prettily. If he tormented her more, she might cry out in pain and beg for mercy. Imagining this, his excitement intensified until it reached his lower abdomen.

 

Cardale resolved to unleash his impulses of lust and cruelty.

 

With a slick movement, he rose from the bed.


Elise looked up at Cardale with anxious eyes.


Her body trembled, unsure of what was about to happen. But it wasn’t just fear.


In the strange tension, he suddenly walked to the head of the bed and yanked open the curtains on both sides.





As the morning sunlight poured into the room, she flinched in surprise.


‘No, it’s too embarrassing…’


She curled up, trying to hide herself, but there was nothing to cover with except her two hands. Even the darkness had vanished.


So Elise shut her eyes tightly. Hearing Cardale’s footsteps approaching again, she pleaded softly.


“Please, close the curtains.”


“Why? It’s a good view.”


The bed sank as his weight settled on it.


“Open your eyes.”


For a brief moment, Elise hesitated. It wasn’t that she intended to refuse or say no. She just didn’t think she could dare to.


It was just that the bedroom was so bright with the curtains open. and she felt too embarrassed to see him scrutinising every inch of her body.


“You’re putting up a futile resistance.”


“Ah…!”


Her ankles were grabbed in an instant. As she opened her eyes in surprise, her body was pulled downwards. With her legs lifted high and her hips barely perched on the edge of the bed, Elise looked up at Cardale.


“Duke… ah!”


Suddenly, his finger thrust inside her. Thick, long, and calloused. It stimulated her immediately and her inner walls tightened.


“Relax.”


“Ah, haa….”


Her body, tormented all night, quickly remembered the pleasure and began to ooze sticky fluid.


“You take it so well.”


Another finger squirmed its way inside. Elise gripped the sheets tightly with both hands and trembled.


His fingers opened and closed like scissors, rubbing against her inner walls with a vulgar sensation. Squelching sounds from below filled her ears.


“Mm, ah…”


Excitement welled up inside her. No matter how much she tried to hold back, soft moans kept slipping from her lips.


His fingers increased in number. Although they were all on the same hand, his fingers stimulated different areas as if they were distinct entities.


As the tender flesh, still swollen from the long friction of the night before, was pressed and rubbed. Her body began to melt as if it were about to dissolve.


“Are you more excited because it’s bright?”


“N-no… ugh…”


“No?”


“N-no… I don’t like it bright… ah, the curtains… mm!”


Elise trembled with pleasure, pleading desperately. Cardale’s low laughter filled her ears.


“You have the presence of mind to worry about the curtains, so it seems you can still bear it.”


Now with four fingers, he expanded his range, twisting and thrusting deeper. As her insides were forcefully probed and her clitoris was rubbed with his thumb, a pleasure far greater than before struck her like lightning.


“Ah, ah… ahhh!”


Elise’s fingers turned white as she gripped the sheets tightly. She twisted her waist, trying to escape, but it was useless. Her ankle was firmly held by his large hand, and her thighs now devoid of strength, just trembled.


“Please, stop… please…”


“Don’t worry. Soon, you’ll forget what embarrassment even feels like.”


His fingers pressed down on her sensitive inner walls, suddenly curled and scraped down.


“Ah! Ha… mmm, ah!”


Her back arched upwards. Pleasure began from below and climbed up her spine, making her mind go blank.


His fingers plunged in and out of her relentlessly. The lewd sound of her wet hole being probed grew louder.


“Elise, your filthy juices are getting on my pants. What are you going to do about this?”


“Ah, ah, ahhh! Mmm!”


Elise could no longer respond. Cardale savoured the sticky inner walls clinging to his fingers as he shook his hand.


Her body, heated to the extreme, quickly reached its peak.


“No, no, ah, no… ahhh!”


Elise threw her head back, letting out a sharp, piercing cry. Watery fluids gushed out from below, and her body trembled uncontrollably at the peak of her climax.


Cardale watched her, drenched in ecstasy, then looked down at his wet hand with a sly grin.


“You came so messily.”


“Uh, ugh…”


He cupped her dripping entrance with his calloused palm, rubbing it. Elise whimpered, her eyes red from the overwhelming sensations.


In bed, he never showed mercy. He deliberately taunted her, making sure he heard every reaction she gave.


“You’re all red and twitching. My fingers aren’t enough for you, right?”


Feeling the lingering spasms of intense pleasure, she couldn’t deny his words.


The rough skin of his palm rubbed against her delicate entrance and swollen flesh, heightening her sensitivity.


A gentle, probing question slipped in like a guided interrogation.


“Do you still want the curtains closed?”


“No, ugh, no… ah!”


Even in her dazed state, Elise shook her head.


What she had just received was a punishment. She had been punished for forgetting her duty to open herself to him anytime and anywhere he desired, and for daring to complain about the daylight.


“I’m sorry, ugh, I’m sorry…”


In such moments, all she could do was beg for mercy. Elise clutched Cardale’s wrist as it toyed with her below and pleaded for his forgiveness.


“Are you sorry?”


“Yes, yes…”


“Just saying it isn’t enough. You need to show proper remorse.”


With a loud smack, a sharp sting blossomed on her buttocks.


“Get on your stomach.”


That statement implied there was no intention of leniency. Elise sniffled as she flipped over, assuming a submissive position on all fours. She heard a buckle being undone from behind, then felt something hot and solid pressing between her parted thighs.


“Ugh…”


Instead of plunging into her entrance, the pillar teasingly grazed against her tender flesh and swollen clit. Due to the prolonged torment, her throbbing entrance, swollen from arousal, eagerly enveloped the pillar. Each slide of the slick dick against her clit sent shivers of pleasure through her.


“Uh, ah, ahh…”


Her lips parted involuntarily as moans escaped her like a cat in heat.


“You seem to enjoy it when I tease you like this. You’d probably go crazy if I actually penetrated you.”


But still, he didn’t fill her. The frustrating pleasure continued. Her hips trembled, and her lower abdomen tightened. As she yearned for greater pleasure, Cardale relentlessly teased her, and then, smack. Her buttocks were struck again.


“Who said you could move your hips?”


“Huh…”


Elise knew what she was supposed to do in such moments. No matter how much she endured, it would only lead to ambiguous pleasure bordering on pain.


But the embarrassment was overwhelming…


Yet, as she was consumed by sweet pleasure. Elise’s mouth opened, and involuntary pleas spilt out.


“Please, ugh, please…”


“That’s not enough.”


“Ah, ugh!”


His large hand gripped her breasts. The soft flesh moulded like dough under his grasp, and as his thumb grazed her nipple, Elise threw her head back with a moan.


Cardale enveloped her as if dominating her from above, and pressed his lips close to her ear. Whispering softly.


“Who taught you the art of seduction?”


“Ah, ah!”


Her response was lost in the midst of her overwhelming pleasure.


Her nipples were twisted roughly, and a flash of light burst before her eyes. The electrifying sensation starting from her bright red peaks, spread through her entire chest, causing her vision to flicker.


Already heightened by arousal, Elise’s body convulsed incessantly with the overwhelming sensations swirling in her mind.


Amidst such stimulation, he pressed harder against her below, and warned her firmly.


“You should do as you were taught. Or do I need to educate you again?”


The menacing threat tickled her ears along with his hot breath.


As the relentless stimulation brought back memories of the endless ecstasy, Elise urgently spoke up.


“I-I’ll do it, ugh… I’ll do it…”


Finally, Cardale withdrew his body. With the stimulation on her chest gone, she could at least move.


Elise collapsed onto the bed, her upper body and head pressed against it. As she raised her hips high, she turned her head to the side. He had demanded to see her lewd face properly.


But it didn’t end there.


For a moment, she hesitated. But he immediately spoke in a chilling voice.


“How long do you expect me to wait?”


There was no room for choice. Elise released the grip on the sheets and reached both hands back to grab her own buttocks. Her thin fingers trembled.


“What are you doing? Grab them tightly and spread them.”

 Elise’s trembling grew stronger, but Cardale paid her no attention.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

With a sharp sound hitting something solid, a tingling pain shot through her abdomen. The swollen, sensitive flesh now surged with heat.

 

“Ah…!”

 

“Spread.”

 

The fear of being struck again if she hesitated further overwhelmed even the shame. Elise exerted pressure with her fingers, squeezing and pulling the soft flesh on both sides.

 

With a squelching sound, the tightly stuck flesh separated, revealing a split gully widening on either side. As the moist flesh was exposed to the cool air, her body trembled.

 

“Ugh, uhh…”

 

It was a blatantly lewd posture, as if begging him to look.

 

Just imagining his gaze fixed on her flesh made her stomach tighten again, saliva dribbled down her throat.

 

“It’s ripe.”

 

Covering Elise’s hand with his own large hand, he squeezed the round flesh, soaking it even more.

 

“It’s turning bright red, about to burst. No, judging by how the juice is flowing, maybe it already has.”

 

“Ugh…!”

 

With a light puff of breath, accompanied by a scorching touch to the moist flesh, her muscles trembled.

 

He grabbed her buttocks as if playing with a toy, spreading her wide to the side and then squeezing her back together repeatedly.

 

The sticky labia parted and closed, incessantly emitting a lewd sound.

 

“Ah, uhh…”

 

With each friction at regular intervals, the sensation alternated between hot and cold, gradually arousing the flesh. Her face flushed.

 

Every time her swollen clitoris was touched, Elise whimpered, pressing her cheek against the sheet.

 

“Now, what shall I do?”

 

A languid yet seductive whisper brushed against her ear. Elise, intoxicated by the strange sensation, parted her lips.

 

“Please, put it in. Please…”

 

“If you just whimper it’s pointless. Beg more beautifully.”

 

“Ugh…”

 

With the looming ultimatum, tears welled in Elise’s eyes. But the tingling pleasure alone was not enough to satisfy her. She needed more. Something strong and forceful to thrust inside and fill her completely.

 

Finally succumbing to pleasure, Elise shifted her body, trembling.

 

Pressing her upper body against the sheet, she raised her hips even higher. Thin fingers crawled towards her labia and spread it apart.

 

With just that touch, a moan escaped her lips. Soon, her hips swayed gently like a pendulum.

 

Cardale’s lips curled satisfactorily at the provocative posture.

 

“Come on, beg. Elise.”

 

With her face flushed, she opened her mouth. As her red lips quivered, his laughter grew deeper.

 

“Will I hear you if you speak so softly?”

 

“Ah!”

 

As Cardale casually flicked her clitoris with his fingertip, Elise twisted her waist and screamed. Despite this, she commendably maintained her posture, resisting the urge to collapse.

 

“You’re quite beautiful.”

 

He deliberately offered her praise. His touch on her moist flesh suddenly turned affectionate.

 

Speaking will make it easier. Shame is temporary, but pleasure lasts longer.

 

His words were sweeter than the devil’s temptation. The sense of relief that he softened a bit, coupled with the pleasure below, blurred Elise’s vision.

 

“Master…”

 

“Yes.”

 

Cardale’s lips tightened. He felt rewarded for suppressing his desires so far.

 

To see such an innocent doe unravelling so obscenely, begging for release…

 

He began to tease her flesh with the palm of his hand.

 

“Please…”

 

Elise’s delicate voice grew louder, but Cardale deliberately pressed his fingertip against her clitoris, intensifying the stimulation.

 

“Put it in, please…!”

 

“Speak properly.”

 

Cardale changed the hand tormenting her flesh. With his sticky hand, he grasped his shaft. By now, his excited cock was so hard it could touch his belly button, oozing precum from the tip. As he spread the precum, his penis gleamed smoothly.

 

He prepared himself and grabbed the soft buttocks with one hand, and aligned his tip with her entrance. Seeing the opening, seemingly eager to receive him, Cardale chuckled.

 

“Ah, ah…”

 

As if it would enter any moment now. Elise realised there was no further movement and whimpered, lifting her hips and moaning in pain.

 

“Please… do it, ah, please…”

 

However, Cardale only teased her hole with his taut tip.

 

“I told you to ask properly.”

 

“Ahh!”

 

As he firmly pressed against her clitoris, Elise’s mouth involuntarily opened. Tears rolled down her cheeks beneath her clouded eyes of pleasure. She begged fervently, intoxicated by the sensation.

 

“Master, please… put it in, ah! Please, ah! Please…!”

 

With a deep thrust, his tip penetrated her, pressing against her climax. Elise screamed in ecstasy.

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

Unable to hold back any longer, she released the hand gripping her buttocks. Her slender body trembled as her waist twisted. As her tight walls squeezed around him, Cardale exhaled deeply.

 

“Well done.”

 

Praising her like an obedient animal, Cardale lightly tapped her buttocks and firmly grasped her waist with both hands.

 

“From now on, it will only get better.”

 

With a low, thick voice, he withdrew his cock, only to thrust deeply into her again.

 

Before the climax fully subsided, Elise couldn’t close her mouth. Screaming as if her life depended on it as he relentlessly pounded into her.

 

“Ah, ah, ah…”

 

The intense pleasure violently struck her. She saw nothing but the overwhelming sensation as Elise clawed at the sheet uncontrollably.

 

“Ah, ah, ah…!”

 

Her body shook with each forceful thrust. Every time her hardened nipples rubbed against the sheet, her chest tingled and made her mind dizzy. It felt like her whole body had turned into a bundle of nerves.

 

He continued his relentless thrusts, seeming unfazed by her climax. Cardale lifted his hips as if to scrape every fold of her inner walls. His firm thighs, tense with exertion, bulged and the muscles of his tight buttocks tensed with each thrust.

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

Elise’s cries grew louder.

 

From her trembling, soaked flesh, a stream of fluid flowed steadily.

 

The sound of slapping wet flesh intensified. With every thrust of his thick shaft into her tight embrace, the firm buttocks smacked against his perineum, adding to his pleasure.

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

Cardale bore down on her relentlessly. The soft flesh clung lewdly to his penis, not letting go. As he withdrew, the lasciviously swollen flesh followed a lewd display indeed.

 

He looked down at Elise’s face. Her eyes were unfocused, blurred. Her lips parted, dribbling saliva as she moaned senselessly.

 

With flushed cheeks pressed against the sheet, her writhing form couldn’t have looked more beautiful in such ecstasy.

 

Each time her ample chest squeezed between them, deforming and jiggling, it was a sight to behold.

 

He can’t hold back anymore.

 

Cardale leaned forward, grabbing Elise’s arms. He pulled her backwards and her body lifted lightly.

 

“Ah, ah!”

 

Simultaneously lifting her hips, he plunged deeper from a different angle, eliciting a high-pitched cry from Elise. It was her favourite spot. With a low chuckle, Cardale squeezed the lifted woman’s breasts.

 

“Elise, shall we try something?”

 

“Ah, ah…”

 

“How many times do you want me to fuck you?”

 

“N-no… Ahh!”

 

Elise, even in her dazed state, urgently shook her head, but as her nipples were pulled and twisted, her mind went blank.

 

“Once.”

 

“Ah, ah!”

 

Cardale precisely targeted her most sensitive spot. Elise moaned, feeling as if she couldn’t breathe.

 

Thud, the same spot was deeply pressed again.

 

“Ah, ahh!”

 

“Twice. You’re enduring better than I thought.”

 

With a chuckle, he squeezed her soft breasts. Slipping his fingers into her moist folds as he whispered into her ear.

 

Elise’s eyes widened upon hearing Cardale whisper.

“Oh, no… please… hnng!”

 

He pulled out his penis from her small crevice, leaving only the tip of his glans, and ruthlessly stirred up the convulsing hole. Pounding against her walls.

 

As the deeply embedded shaft pressed against the swollen flesh of her cerv!x, Elise’s body sprang up like a fish thrown to shore with a thud.

 

“Ah, ah, aah!”

 

Until now, it seemed like a joke, but the thick flesh pillar began pounding relentlessly. Striking the climax from its root.

 

The pulsating penis, protruding forcefully between her stretched opening, was forcefully thrust in and out only a few times before withdrawing.

 

“Ah, aah! Oh…!”

 

Elise’s vision turned pitch black, then stark white. Her body trembled uncontrollably, and cries burst continuously from her parted lips.

 

Cardale, overcome with his own ecstasy, grabbed her chin. He turned her head to admire the face of a woman succumbing to pleasure. Meanwhile, he thrust his thick cock even more vigorously.

 

“You should be grateful for the pleasure I’m giving you. Instead, you act as if it’s a burden.”

 

“Ah…!”

 

With an unsatisfying sound, her nipple was held captive as it was pinched and twisted forward.

 

Her waist involuntarily arched forward, and as her breasts pushed forward, the blunt glans forcefully struck inward again.

 

“Ah…!”

 

“When this happens, squeeze down below and moan prettily. How many times do I have to teach you this?”

 

The massive penis forcefully plunged into her dripping crevice, wildly jolting her inner walls. Her cries and screams intensified.

 

An ecstatic sensation surged through Elise’s entire body. Her belly rang with excitement, and her mind flashed as if struck by lightning.

 

Elise begged frantically, tears streaming down her face.

 

“I’m sorry, I was wrong… Ah!”

 

Uttering impudent words without knowing gratitude, she forgot that her master willingly allowed her pleasure, even permitting her to leave at any time she wished. She forgot herself and threw another tantrum.

 

“P-please… forgive me… Ah!”

 

“First, receive your punishment.”

 

Cardale released the hand that had been squeezing her breasts and gently stroked her dry belly. As he felt a bulging in her abdomen shaped like his dick, his lips tightened. His hand that was caressing her tender skin, exerted pressure on her belly.

 

“Hng!”

 

Elise gasped. As her writhing body tightened against Cardale’s hips, his thrusts became even more intense.

 

Friction between the joined parts caused white foam to rise, and transparent fluid, like urine, splattered everywhere.

 

Elise couldn’t overcome the pleasure and burst into tears. Saliva dribbled between her parted lips as she cried out. Gradually, she lost the ability to think. Her head spun. It was just pleasure, and then more pleasure.

 

Cardale too was consumed by insatiable lust. He gripped the woman, who trembled senselessly under him, and continued to thrust relentlessly as if possessed. He couldn’t stop or restrain himself.

 

He wanted to devour this woman whole.

 

With the speed of a galloping horse, he thrust his cock deeply.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Elise felt the sensation of her entire body exploding once again as she reached another climax. Her walls convulsed around his penis, squeezing it tightly, as thick semen sprayed deep inside her.

 

“Haah… Ugh…”

 

Completely spent, her body collapsed into his embrace as she lost consciousness.

 

Cardale looked down at Elise. Her sweaty face trembled.

 

After a night of passion and another intense encounter in the morning, it was no wonder she was exhausted.

 

He gently laid the sleeping woman on the bed, covering her with a thin blanket before getting up.

 

Then, he noticed the contraceptive tea that had been prepared on the coffee table.

 

‘I forgot to drink it again.’

 

There was no risk of unwanted situations arising from occasional forgetfulness about drinking the tea. However, he often forgot to drink it when he was with Elise.

 

Cardale poured himself a cup of the tea. Due to being left out for too long, it had a deep, almost black color. He grimaced as he sipped the cold tea, which now tasted even more bitter.

 

Setting the empty cup down carelessly, he rinsed his mouth with water. As he did, a faint voice pierced his ears.

 

“Duke…”

 

“Are you awake now?”

 

The sound of footsteps approached his woman again. Elise had an exhausted expression from their intense lovemaking. But her slowly blinking blue eyes remained soft and lovely.

 

Cardale sat on the edge of the bed and gently brushed aside Elise’s silver hair as it clung to her cheek.

 

“Why did you wake up?”

 

“Just…”

 

Elise’s words trailed off, but he knew the answer.

 

After being brought to the duke’s estate to be tamed, if she fell asleep without permission after enduring rough treatment, she would be treated even hersher the next day.

 

Since then, Elise could only sleep after receiving his permission. Even if she momentarily dozed off from exhaustion after engaging in intense activities like today, she would quickly wake up again.

 

“It’s okay to sleep.”

 

“I-I’m sorry…”

 

Her blue eyes looked up at him and trembled.

 

Cardale reached under the blanket covering the small figure and gently held Elise’s hand. A faint blush appeared on her pale cheek.

 

Despite enjoying it so much.

 

Cardale leaned forward and pressed his lips lightly against Elise’s forehead. Then he trailed his lips down, leaving marks on her temple, jawline, cheek, and nose bridge, before finally reaching her lips.

 

He pressed his lips against her soft skin, leaving an imprint as her delicate eyelashes trembled. He kissed her red lips once again.

 

His tongue slid between her open lips without resistance. Slowly, he explored her tender and soft inside, eliciting a soft moan from Elise.

 

“Ugh…”

 

Cardale gently intertwined their tongues. The mingling of their saliva made the kiss stickier, but it wasn’t aggressive. The act of sucking her lips and caressing their tongues was strangely sweet and addictive. Satisfied with the pleasure he had derived, Cardale parted his lips from hers.

 

“Haa, haa…”

 

Elise breathed heavily. When Cardale exerted a little pressure on the hand he had been holding, she looked up at him. Excitement flushed her cheeks with a rosy hue.

 

“Did you enjoy it?”

 

“Y-yes…”

 

Her lips obediently responded and tasted like fruit soaked in honey. It was a trace of what he desired.

 

Despite the rough intercourse, Elise enjoyed slow and gentle kisses. Cardale knew the reason why.

 

For her, lovemaking was a consolation that she wouldn’t be discarded for the time being. The more he desired her, the more roughly he treated her, Elise felt both distressed and relieved.

 

Yet, occasionally, she felt fear. She feared his merciless thrusts and lewd cries, while simultaneously fearing his rough demands.

 

She believed that being admired was only a temporary whim of Cardale’s, which was why she had to be cautious.

 

In his view, any woman could be replaced at any time. Whether she expressed unreasonable desires or had expectations, it didn’t matter.

 

Therefore, Elise’s words and actions had to please him.

 

For a woman sold for a substantial sum of money, it was only natural for her to be cautious, fearing being discarded or driven away one day.

 

But why did this bother him so much?

 

Why did he feel so uncomfortable?

 

When did he stop liking this sight?

 

It was strange. Even though the woman was willing to desperately cling to him in order not to be abandoned, he occasionally felt a strange sensation as if a corner of his heart was being stabbed.

 

Like now.

 

Unable to tolerate this discomfort, Cardale unconsciously found a solution.

 

A way to free Elise from the fear of being discarded.

 

Then, he suddenly thought of the contraceptive tea he had just drunk.

 

Originally, he had no intention of having children. He had no intention of taking responsibility for a lifelong plaything for pleasure.

 

But if it was Elise…

 

‘If it’s a child like you, it wouldn’t be so bad.’

 

Cardale’s fingertips gently caressed the soft flesh of the woman’s cheek.


Elise rested her cheek on her palm as she listened intently. She softly called out the Duke’s name.

 

“Elise.”

 

“Yes, Duke.”

 

Duke. As the polite and respectful response came back, Cardale unconsciously twitched his eyebrows.

 

As always, she never crossed the line.

 

There were countless women who harboured futile hopes of gaining his favour by exchanging a few words and obtaining permission to use his name, but Elise had never attempted such things.

 

Despite bearing the label of nobility, she could have subtly asked for favours at least once.

 

Especially considering their daily intimacy, where she couldn’t even hide her fondness.

 

But ironically, it was the oblivious doe that made the hunter feel frustrated.

 

Pretending not to notice, Cardale observed Elise’s intentions.

 

“Do you want a child?”

 

No, he asked her directly.

 

Due to the torment endured until morning, Elise’s tired eyes widened for a moment. Her blue irises trembled like ripples on a riverbank.

 

‘A child…’

 

She never imagined she would hear such words from him.

 

Did she mishear?

 

Perhaps, due to exhaustion, she didn’t realise she was misunderstanding.

 

‘The Duke knows this too.’

 

Elise recalled the day she was first embraced by Cardale.

 

“Did the Count order you to bear a child?”

 

She had secretly brought the medicine her father gave her to the bedroom, fearing she would be caught and kicked out of the Duke’s estate. Trembling, she confessed.

 

“I-I can’t conceive…”

 

“I see. You can’t, then.”

 

At that moment, she received a response that seemed natural.

 

She was surprised for a moment but quickly accepted it. She thought that if it were the Duke of Basenberg, he would be able to uncover such a secret.

 

Or perhaps her father, the Count of Schuvan, had already informed him.

 

‘Maybe that’s why he chose me…’

 

Because she couldn’t bear children.

 

She had heard that her body was damaged from taking poison when she was young. Even if she were fortunate enough to conceive, she wouldn’t be able to carry the baby to term.

 

‘Mother must have prayed that God would take care of me…’

 

But it wasn’t meant to be.

 

Elise never dared to hope for such a miracle.

 

When the truth of being a bastard child was revealed, and she came to the Duke’s estate, she even thought it was better that way.

 

No matter how well-packaged, her purpose was merely that of a toy for satisfying desires. Used by the master until he got bored and discarded her.

 

That’s why she didn’t want to subject any child she might have to the same fate.

 

Not being able to live the ordinary life her mother wished for her was already too shameful and sad, but she could bear the thought of committing the sin of bringing a child into a predetermined unhappy future.

 

Yet, despite all that…

 

“I asked if you wanted a child.”

 

She couldn’t understand why he suddenly asked her such a question. Or why tears were welling up.

 

“I, I…”

 

Because she was a woman who couldn’t bear fruit even if seeds were planted, a woman who would remain unchanged no matter how much she was played with… That’s why the Duke probably embraced a lowly bastard like her.

 

Tears gathered beneath Elise’s azure eyes. It hurt as if her heart was being squeezed.

 

‘He probably doesn’t like seeing me cry…’

 

Elise bit her lip hard and blinked rapidly.

 

But instead of drying up, the tears that had accumulated rolled down her cheeks.

 

“Why are you crying?”

 

A warm hand wiped her eyes. The slow movement felt unexpectedly gentle, making it even harder to hold back her tears.

 

Sob…

 

“Is it because you don’t want to?”

 

Elise hastily shook her head.

 

“N-no, it’s not… Sob, that…”

 

At that moment, she realised. She had deceived even herself about her true feelings.

 

If only she had a healthy body. If she could bear and give birth to his child…

 

Then she could have been a bit more greedy.

 

Another buried memory surfaced.

 

‘Even though you seem so cold and indifferent… On the night you took me, you were so gentle.’

 

“Do you still love me?”

 

Now, Elise finally felt like she could understand the lingering affection in her mother’s gentle smile.

 

“Sorry….”

 

Up until now, she had deceived herself under the pretence of meeting her mother. But in reality, that wasn’t the case.

 

She didn’t want to be abandoned. Regardless of her mother, she wanted to stay here. Even if it meant bearing the disgrace of being associated as a mistress, she wanted to remain by his side, even if she was looked down upon as dirty and vulgar.

 

And if by some chance, if God were to take pity on her and send her a gift.

 

She wanted to bear his child.

 

“Sorry, Mother….”

 

By choosing a life her mother had so desperately wanted her to avoid, she felt guilty.

 

She felt remorseful, and yet, she couldn’t help it.

 

“Elise, what can I do for you?”

 

Just hearing his voice made her heart flutter. When they made eye contact, her heart raced, and his tender touch warmed her heart.

 

Could she live without these things? Elise couldn’t help but doubt herself.

 

“Duke, I…”

 

Elise looked up at Cardale with misty eyes.

 

Even if it was a fleeting affection, even if it was just a moment of tenderness, it was okay. She could endure occasional cruelty and harshness.

 

As long as he didn’t abandon her.

 

“I want to be by your side, Duke…”

 

Finally overwhelmed by her emotions, she burst into tears.

 

“Don’t cry.”

 

Cardale embraced Elise as she was pouring out tears. She buried her face in his chest and pleaded pitifully.

 

‘I’ll do my best. I’ll do anything you ask, my lord.’

 

“Please don’t leave me, please….”

 

His gentle caress on her back felt more affectionate than usual, making her even more sorrowful.

 

Elise poured out her tears in his arms.

 

During that not-so-short time, Cardale never let her go.

 



 

“We’ve located the place where the Lady’s mother stays.”

 

It was finally Michael’s report.

 

“As expected, it was a villa owned under the name of Count Schuvan. The security is strict. Not only the villa but the surrounding area is also restricted from access.”

 

As Michael spread out a map on the desk, Cardale twisted his lips, confirming the location.

 

“He hid her well.”

 

There was a faint admiration in his mocking tone.

 

A place not conspicuous to outsiders yet accessible by carriage, secluded enough to make escape difficult.

 

The villa itself resembled a fortress, hinting at the owner’s guarded temperament.

 

Of course, it had to be this way if one intended to keep what was theirs secure.

 

In some ways, Cardale understood Gerhard’s decision. He might have made a similar choice in the same situation.

 

No, he would have gone further, confining her in a more robust and perfect cage and making her sing beautiful songs every day. It wouldn’t hurt to threaten her weaknesses, making her cry every night.

 

Of course, his lovely mistress feels comforted in his embrace, so there was no need to resort to such measures.

 

Cardale even felt a strange sense of satisfaction in this fact.

 

“I want you to find a route to smuggle her out as soon as possible. Be especially careful not to alert Gerhard Schuvan.”

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

Norman knocked on the study’s door just in time.

 

As the butler entered, preparing tea as usual, Cardale spoke up.

 

“I’m done with the tea.”

 

“Should I prepare it again later, then?”

 

Norman politely inquired. It wasn’t unusual for the tea to be prepared according to the master’s mood.

 

“No. Don’t bother preparing tea in the future.”

 

Michael almost dropped the map he was holding.

 

No one in this room was unaware of what it meant for the Duke not to drink contraceptive tea and not to abide by the government.

 

Similarly, Norman was visibly taken aback, but he quickly recovered and asked.

 

“Should I make arrangements for Lady Elise to drink the tea from now on?”

 

As Cardale narrowed his eyes, Norman realised his mistake and quickly corrected himself.

 

“I apologise, my lord. I won’t serve contraceptive tea until you command otherwise.”

 

“Now leave.”

 

After Norman left with a bow, Cardale turned to Michael.

 

“You said there were two reports. What was the other one?”

 

Michael hesitated for a moment, wondering if it was the right time to report this, but eventually spoke up.

 

“On the day the Lady purchased your gift, she briefly encountered Raymond Hartmann.”


Raymond Hartmann.

 

At the mention of the familiar name, a slight furrow appeared on Cardale’s brow.

 

“Was there anything significant?”

 

“They exchanged simple greetings, asking about each other’s well-being.”

 

Michael didn’t mention Elise’s surprise at dropping the gift or repairing the pin.

 

He had noticed the pin on the Duke’s cravat.

 

‘Since the Duke doesn’t bother to repair what’s broken…’

 

Cardale had no qualms about discarding anything. Whether it was a person or an object, once it was broken, he would replace it with something new. To him, almost everything was disposable.

 

He judged that there was no need to inform the Duke of the repair of the cravat pin, considering the potential displeasure it might cause him.

 

And if the Duke were to be angered by it, it would be Elise Schuvan who had to bear the consequences of that knowledge.

 

Like others belonging to the Vassenberg Duchy, Michael also sensed that she was exerting considerable influence on the Duke.

 

And the direction of that influence seemed to be positive.

 

Therefore, Michael decided to discreetly cover up her mistakes within acceptable limits.

 

“That report is late.”

 

The Duke’s voice was quieter than usual. Despite being instructed not to report anything related to Elise’s outings, Michael bowed his head instead of making excuses.

 

“I apologise, Your Grace. I will make sure to correct it.”

 

Cardale glanced at his aide silently before turning his gaze out the window.

 

Usually Elise would be out for a walk around this time, but not today. She would probably be sound asleep in her bedroom.

 

Despite hearing about the encounter between Raymond Hartmann and Elise, Cardale was surprisingly calm. It wasn’t that he felt no discomfort. After all, the former fiancé still irked him just by existing.

 

But that was all there was to it. They simply exchanged greetings by chance, so what was there to be concerned about?

 

Not too long ago, a similar incident occurred at the opera house. Compared to what he did to Elise back then, it was hardly contradictory.

 

But Cardale was not a man to dwell on his contradictions or ponder them deeply.

 

What mattered now was that Raymond Hartmann was no longer even a consideration for restraint.

 

In fact, he had been convinced of this since the day he took Elise to the auction house.

 

She didn’t even realise that Raymond had been at the auction house. Despite his persistent gaze, she didn’t notice him.

 

She was merely intoxicated by the gaze and touch of her master, her cheeks blushing beautifully under his hand.

 

The woman who whimpered in his arms every night. The woman who made pretty sounds with her desperate face and expressed her heart with her whole body.

 

No matter how much Raymond Hartmann wandered around, Elise was now his.

 

Cardale looked down at the fixed pin in his collar.

 

“Happy birthday, Duke.”

 

“I bought it because it matches the colour of your eyes, Duke.”

 

Two hands cautiously offered the gift, trembling eyes watching for his reaction.

 

He gently touched the red jewel of the cravat pin that the woman had chosen carefully, his eyes downcast. His eyelids half-closed, casting a shadow over his gaze.

 

“The weather has become quite cool, hasn’t it?”

 

It was a question out of context, but Michael didn’t hesitate to answer.

 

“Yes. It seems like summer has almost passed.”

 

“Rottenbaum Park was opened around this time, I believe.”

 

Rottenbaum was a park owned by the royal family, temporarily opened to nobles during the social seasons of spring and autumn.

 

Luckily, Michael knew this as well, so he immediately replied.

 

“It opened last week, and it’s supposed to last until the first snowfall.”

 

“I’ve mostly stayed in the mansion, so it’s about time to start some outdoor activities.”

 

Michael finally guessed his master’s intention and asked.

 

“Should I arrange a walk for the Lady in Rottenbaum Park…?”

 

“If Elise wishes to, let her. You’ll be in charge of escorting her.”

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

After Michael left the room with a crisp farewell, Cardale’s gaze returned to the garden. It was an unconscious action, knowing there was no one there.

 

The face of the woman weeping bitterly was reflected in the glass.

 

Even the most obedient animal would become easily melancholic if confined to a narrow fence. A brief change of scenery would quickly lift their spirits.

 

Unaware of his desire to stop her tears, Cardale found a good excuse as usual. It was a plausible pretext.

 



 

The time was nearing sunset.

 

Vanessa had gone out and was waiting for someone for quite some time.

 

To avoid being noticed, she hid her body at the corner where an alley began and kept glancing at the entrance of a certain building.

 

“It should be time for them to come out by now…”

 

Although the textile factory was running day and night, the person she was waiting for was not just an ordinary labourer.

 

After some time, Vanessa’s face brightened as she spotted a young man with silver hair walking out of the large factory gate.

 

She checked her attire and walked towards the young man. Suddenly, a man blocking her path looked up.

 

“Nice to meet you, Mr. Damian.”

 

“Who are you?”

 

His question was polite, but there was a sense of wariness.

 

“I am Vanessa Lockwood, working under the Count Schuvan’s estate.”

 

Damian’s eyes sharpened. His blue eyes sank coldly like ice at the bottom of the deep sea.

 

“So you know who I am.”

 

Sensing the change, Vanessa smiled faintly. If the other party had already caught on, then this conversation would be easier.

 

“I have a proposal for you, Mr. Damian. Would you spare a moment?”

 

“Why should I?”

 

Despite the cold response, Vanessa remained undeterred. She had been through too much to be swayed by such a reaction.

 

And she knew exactly how to get what she wanted.

 

Vanessa shrugged her shoulders in response.

 

“Because you’ll regret it if you don’t listen.”

 



 

The two of them moved to another location.

 

They were inside the carriage that Vanessa had rented in advance.

 

She sat facing Damian, who was carefully hidden behind the curtains covering the windows. Her gaze seemed observant, as if she were studying him. Then she casually threw out a question.

 

“Are you aware that your biological father is Gerhard Schuvan, the Count?”

 

It was information that would shock anyone, but Damian remained completely unfazed. There was no change in his expression.

 

‘He knew after all…!’

 

Vanessa thought, feeling a sense of vindication. Her judgement had been correct.

 

Not long ago, she had seen Fritz at the Count’s estate. Even though he was never entirely sane, his restless behaviour of pacing back and forth while anxiously biting his nails had been unusual.

 

“Damn it, what should I do? If I don’t escape before he can confront me here, it will be a disaster.”

 

Listening in on the conversation discreetly, Vanessa soon understood the situation.

 

Fritz Schuvan had finally done something that would ruin the entire Schuvan estate.

 

‘This is beyond something Gerhard Schuvan can stop.’

 

Treason was a serious charge that could destroy a family just for being accused of it.

 

Not only the family members but also the employees affiliated with the family would be at risk. And especially as an aide to the Count, Vanessa herself was in danger.

 

As the situation became dire enough to worry about her own life, Vanessa began to brainstorm ways to survive.

 

The person she thought of was similar to Fritz.

 

‘As long as Elise remains within the Count’s estate… If I can manipulate this situation well, I might be able to get rid of Fritz and save the estate.’

 

Vanessa still vividly remembered the sight of Cardale and Elise she had encountered at the auction house. And if her judgement was correct, the Viscount seemed quite fond of his government.

 

Vanessa had to bet everything on that possibility. That’s why she approached Damian.

 

“Aren’t you resentful of your father who abandoned you?”

 

“Is that important?”

 

“Of course it’s important. If you want revenge, I’m willing to help.” 

 

Vanessa said firmly, her gaze meeting Damian’s as if trying to see through his thoughts.

 

Damian remained silent, staring at her intently. Seemingly trying to decipher her intentions in kind.

 

Vanessa casually met his gaze and after a while, Damian finally spoke up.

 

“Does the Count know that his most trusted aide is approaching me with such intentions?”

 

“Naturally, he doesn’t.”

 

“I could go to Count Schuvan right now and reveal this information to him.”

 

For a moment, Vanessa chuckled softly.

 

“No, you wouldn’t do that.”

 

A cool smile played on her lips.

 

“I know why you didn’t tell Count Schuvan you knew the truth.”

 

Damian’s hand clenched into a fist on his knee. Seeing this, Vanessa’s smile grew deeper.

 

“Take my hand. Together, we can retrieve Marissa and Elise.”

 

At the mention of their names, Damian gritted his teeth. Vanessa’s smile became even tighter.

 

“Of course, in the next turn, you’ll be the Count.”

 

A flash of intensity crossed Damian’s blue eyes.


Elise was walking in the garden as usual when she sat on a bench. Her face soon showed a look of disappointment.

 

“They’re almost all gone…”

 

The beautiful morning glories that had bloomed in purple throughout the summer.

 

However, the flowers had started to bloom less frequently since the weather had cooled a few days ago, and now they had become noticeably sparse.

 

“I won’t be able to see them much longer…”

 

Her murmur was full of regret.

 

Although she had pleaded with Cardale not to get rid of them, Elise hadn’t really expected her wish to be granted.

 

Therefore, this summer would be the last time she could see the morning glories at the Duke’s residence.

 

Determined to come out every day to see the flowers for their short time remaining, she stood up.

 

Just as she was about to leave the garden and enter the mansion’s entrance, she saw a carriage in front of the door.

 

A black carriage bearing the emblem of the Vassenberg Dukedom, used exclusively by the owner of this mansion.

 

While Elise stood hesitantly, Cardale stepped out of the carriage. His gaze shifted to the garden and found her.

 

“Elise.”

 

She approached as if drawn to him. She passed by the fierce-looking black horse that lightly pawed at the ground, without even noticing it.

 

“Your Grace.”

 

Cardale reached out his hand to Elise. Her hair, which Linda had neatly combed and half-tied in the morning, had become slightly dishevelled during her walk.

 

As he tucked some loose strands behind her ear, his fingers brushed against her earlobe.

 

Whether intentional or accidental, she couldn’t tell, but she was acutely aware of the warmth of his fingers. Her skin felt as if it had been burned, and her face grew hot.

 

“Have you been out for a walk?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“You should use a parasol. Isn’t the sun still strong?”

 

Elise blinked. Was he concerned about her? Her heart started to pound at the thought.

 

She wanted to feel the rays of the late summer sun, but she liked his subtle show of concern even more, so she quickly responded.

 

“I won’t forget to use it tomorrow.”

 

“Don’t skip it just because I’m not around.”

 

Elise’s eyes widened. She belatedly noticed Cardale’s attire.

 

His clothes, tailored to fit his solid build, were a uniform emphasising mobility. Cardale often left the mansion dressed like this, so she cautiously asked,

 

“Are you going out?”

 

“Yes,” he replied, looking down at her intently.

 

“It will take about a week.”

 

“A-a whole week…?”

 

Elise asked again, startled.

 

This was the first time he had been away for such a long period since her arrival at the Duke’s residence.

 

“Where are you going…?”

 

Elise asked unintentionally about his destination but then trailed off. As a maid, it was not her place to question where her master went or how long he would be away.

 

Apologetically, she lowered her head.

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

She looked down at the ground, apologising for her presumptuous behaviour.

 

‘But a whole week…’

 

Yesterday, the day before, and even the day before that, Elise had been held in Cardale’s arms every night.

 

She had grown more accustomed to sleeping in his bedroom than in her own.

 

The thought of spending long nights alone already made her feel a pang of loneliness.

 

‘Should I ask…?’

 

She wanted to ask if she could go with him. She wouldn’t be a bother or a nuisance; she just wanted to be taken along.

 

To ask if he didn’t need a woman to warm his bed.

 

‘No.’

 

She subtly bit lower lip hard. Otherwise, she feared she might forget her place and speak presumptuously.

 

She struggled to swallow the words she wanted to say when a soft voice came from above her head.

 

“Even if you miss me, you’ll have to wait patiently.”

 

His words, as if piercing through her thoughts, made Elise’s eyes sting with unshed tears.

 

‘But I want to be by your side, Duke…’

 

Instead of voicing her true feelings, which she couldn’t dare to say, she spoke the words appropriate for a maid.

 

“Please take care, Duke.”

 



 

“I’ll be here… waiting for you to come home, Duke.”

 

Please come back soon.

 

Waiting too long is lonely, exhausting, and hard…

 

Her head bowed lower and lower. It was an instinctive action to hide her tear-filled eyes.

 

At that moment, a large hand moved under her face and lifted her chin.

 

“Ah…!”

 

“Say goodbye while looking at me.”

 

Elise couldn’t meet his gaze, avoiding his piercing red eyes. However, she suspected he already knew everything.

 

‘…I’ve been caught again.’

 

He must be tired and annoyed by a woman who always ends up crying.

 

She hated herself for constantly repeating this pathetic mistake when she should only be showing her prettiest smiles.

 

“Elise.”

 

His gentle call was a soft command not to look away.

 

Elise raised her trembling eyes to look up at him. Thankfully, his face was as usual.

 

“Take care on your trip… oh!”

 

The softest and warmest part of his body landed on her lips. The surprise was brief; as his lips touched hers and then parted with a faint sound.

 

“I’ll come back as soon as I can, so don’t cry out of loneliness.”

 

Elise nodded as if entranced.

 

She loved the way his thumb gently brushed her tear-stained eyes. The ache in her heart from moments ago healed swiftly, replaced by a tickling warmth.

 

When she felt lonely and missed him, she thought she could endure by remembering this brief kindness he had given her.

 



 

The day after Cardale left the Duke’s residence.

 

Elise woke up at the crack of dawn, having slept in her own bedroom. She had fallen asleep early the previous night with nothing to occupy her mind, but the absence of the man who always warmly embraced her made it hard to sleep deeply.

 

It was when she had just finished changing her clothes and eating breakfast that Michael came to see her.

 

“Rottenbaum Park…?”

 

She tilted her head, unfamiliar with the place, so Michael kindly explained and then said,

 

“His Grace has assigned me to be your escort.”

 

‘So that’s why Sir Walter didn’t accompany him.’

 

Elise realised that Cardale had been thinking about her even when he wasn’t around.

 

He had permitted her to visit the nobles’ social venue and left Michael, his lieutenant, behind for her safety.

 

It was all for her, who would be alone in the mansion.

 

“If you wish to go for a walk, we can leave at any time. Would you like to visit Rottenbaum Park today?”

 

“Ah, well…”

 

Elise hesitated at the sudden suggestion, unprepared. Linda spoke up as she prepared nearby.

 

“Rottenbaum Park is a place that only those of certain status can enter. It’s managed by the royal family, so it’s relatively safe.”

 

Linda placed a fragrant cup of tea in front of Elise and encouraged her.

 

“It would be good to get a feel for the atmosphere before the autumn social season begins in earnest. You will be participating in many events with the master.”

 

At the mention of Cardale, Elise’s indecision quickly shifted.

 

‘As Linda said, this might be a good opportunity. I want to show the Duke a better version of myself than I did in the spring.’

 

Having made up her mind, Elise spoke to Michael.

 

“Then, please make the arrangements.”

 

“Yes, my lady.”

 

It turned out that Michael’s claim of being ready to depart at any time was true, since it wasn’t long before Elise found herself boarding the carriage.

 

As Elise watched the scenery through the carriage window, they soon arrived at Rottenbaum Park.

 

Carriages lined up in front of the main gate, each one opening to reveal well-dressed nobles stepping out.

 

“The carriages cannot enter the park, so you will have to disembark here.” 

 

Elise nodded and carefully got out of the carriage.

 

“Welcome. May I see your identification badge?”

 

While Michael handled the identification process with the guards, Elise looked around.

 

‘Everyone looks so happy.’

 

In the somewhat bustling atmosphere, people’s faces were uniformly bright. Those conversing in hushed tones occasionally burst into laughter.

 

Elise had a small smile on her lips, finding the scene pleasing, when suddenly, a child appeared out of nowhere. The child, running at full speed, didn’t see her and collided directly into her.

 

“Oh…!”

 

Elise let out a short cry as she stumbled and the child fell backwards from the impact.

 

“Oh my, are you okay…?”

 

As a startled Elise hurriedly bent down, the child quickly grabbed her hand and pressed a note into it.

 



 

A sense of déjà vu made Elise’s body freeze.


“Lady Elise, is something wrong?”

 

Michael came running, and Elise instinctively hid the note in her hand as she responded.

 

“A child running by bumped into me.”

 

“Oh dear, are you alright?”

 

Michael quickly checked her condition.

 

“I’m fine.”

 

While she was concerned about the child’s state, she was also eager to check the note in her hand.

 

‘It’s probably nothing. Maybe a mischievous child playing a prank.’

 

But her heart was pounding like it did when she found the note from Raymond.

 

“Let’s go inside.”

 

The park was adorned with green lawns, well-maintained shrubs, and towering trees. Early-blooming autumn flowers delighted the eyes of the visitors.

 

‘How can I check this note without getting caught?’

 

Elise’s gaze landed on the gazebos scattered throughout the park. People were chatting in the small gazebos with arched roofs. Seeing them, a plausible idea came to her.

 

It was the hottest part of the day. She raised her parasol to shield her face from the sun and asked,

 

“Is there… an empty gazebo somewhere?”

 

She knew all the nearby gazebos were occupied. Naturally, Michael wouldn’t find any empty ones.

 

She cautiously asked him,

 

“Could you possibly look for one? My leg hurts a bit from the collision with the child earlier.”

 

A look of concern crossed Michael’s face.

 

Elise Schuvan’s health and safety were his top priorities, and leaving her alone posed a risk.

 

But her physical well-being was also his responsibility.

 

He couldn’t ignore her claim of leg pain from the earlier collision.

 

“Please.”

 

Elise asked again.

 

Michael checked the soldiers patrolling the park for security.

 

This was Rottenbaum Park, owned by the royal family. It should be safe to leave her alone for a moment.

 

He pointed to a large tree providing ample shade.

 

“I’ll be quick. Please wait here for a moment.”

 

“Yes, don’t worry.”

 

As soon as Michael disappeared from sight, Elise hid behind the large tree trunk. She then opened her hand that tightly clenched around the note.

 

Her fingers trembled slightly as she unfolded the small, repeatedly folded note.

 

When she saw the familiar handwriting, her heart sank.

 

‘Little Marquis Hartman has sent another note. How did he know I would be here…?’

 

Since most of the capital’s nobles visited Rottenbaum Park around this time, he might have anticipated her visit and prepared the letter in advance, just like last time.

 

‘But why…?’

 

Elise couldn’t understand why Raymond kept trying to contact her. Aside from the emotional debt, his behaviour was becoming increasingly burdensome.

 

‘I don’t want to keep more secrets from the Duke…’

 

Just this once. Just this one time…

 

Elise silently begged Cardale for forgiveness as she looked at the letter. The contents, written in his characteristic elegant handwriting, were longer than the previous note.

 

[Dear Lady Elise,

 

Please forgive me for sending you another unsolicited note. There is something I must tell you.]

 

The brief apology led to the main message.

 

[It appears that your brother, Fritz Schuvan, has gotten himself into serious trouble. Although I cannot go into detail in a letter, it is a matter that threatens the very existence of the Schuvan family.

 

Fritz Schuvan is currently attempting to flee. If he is caught, both he and the entire Schuvan family will be in grave danger. This includes your mother.]

 

At the mention of her mother, Elise’s eyes trembled.

 

[I will meet you in person in four days to explain the situation in detail. It will be at the same place I mentioned before.

 

Yours sincerely, 

Raymond Hartmann.]

 

Elise pressed her chest tightly, crumpling the letter in her hand. She couldn’t even begin to imagine what kind of trouble could threaten her family’s survival. All she felt was fear from these ominous words.

 

“Mother…”

 

As Elise closed her eyes tightly in fear, clutching the letter, a chilling voice pierced her ears.

 

“There you are.”

 

She opened her eyes abruptly. The sight of the gleaming violet eyes right in front of her almost made her legs give out from under her.

 

It was Fritz. Elise gasped, swallowing her scream.

 

“Long time no see, my little bitch.”

 

Fritz grinned, showing his teeth, as he saw her terrified face. He was the same half-brother mentioned in Raymond’s letter, the one trying to evade capture.

 

“H-how are you here…?”

 

“Have you lost your mind from the heat? I’m a noble, of course I can get in. It’s you, the filthy half-breed, who shouldn’t be here.”

 

Elise quickly glanced around, but neither Michael nor the park guards were in sight.

 

“You really are a stupid bitch.”

 

Fritz sneered, watching her.

 

“Crying about wanting to rest in a gazebo and sending your guard off to check. Now you’re trying to find him? Thanks to your stupidity, I managed to get close to you.”

 



 

“Your guard is running around like a headless chicken, he won’t be back for at least ten more minutes.”

 

Fritz laughed, his eyes sweeping over Elise from head to toe. The silk ribbon in her hair, the light dress, the jewelled and laced shoes—everything she wore was expensive and luxurious.

 

“Even a dung beetle has its talents, huh? Seems you’ve got a knack for rolling around in bed.”

 

Her face went pale.

 

“Why so shocked? Did I say something wrong? You disgrace the Schuvan name by wh0ring yourself around, and you think you have the right to be here?”

 

As Fritz’s eyes glinted dangerously, Elise stumbled backwards, only to be blocked by the tree behind her.

 

“Hey.”

 

“Ouch!”

 

Suddenly, Fritz grabbed her shoulders. His strong grip made her wince in pain.

 

“Got any money?”

 

“M-money…?”

 

“Money, you idiot! Don’t you know what money is?”

 

Fritz’s face twisted as he yelled at her.

 

“The Duke must have given you money. Haven’t you received any for your services?”

 

“I-I haven’t…”

 

Elise shook her head frantically.

 

She had received money before, but it was for helping with tasks around the ducal estate. She had spent all of it on buying a birthday present for Cardale. Even if she had money, she didn’t want to give it to Fritz.

 

“You’re decked out in jewels, and you say you don’t have money? You liar!”

 

“Please, don’t hit me…!”

 

As Fritz raised his hand, Elise cried out in panic. He paused momentarily but then became even angrier.

 

“What did you just say?”

 

Seeing the murderous gleam in his eyes, Elise desperately tried to explain.

 

“If you hit me… the Duke will know. If he asks what happened… I’ll have to tell him.”

 

It was a desperate attempt to save herself, but it unexpectedly served as an effective threat against Fritz.

 

The moment he heard Cardale’s name, his aggression lessened.

 

“Then hand over the jewels you’re wearing!”

 

“These belong to the Duke…”

 

“You Damn bitch, always talking back!”

 

Fritz’s eyes flashed with fury and he shouted more obscenities. Elise flinched reflexively.

 

“Damn it…”

 

He ran a hand through his hair and took a deep breath.

 

Whether it was the lingering heat of the season or the frustration of seeing over a year’s worth of work potentially go to waste, he was struggling to control his temper lately.

 

The only reason he managed to stifle his rising anger was the realistic realisation that Elise was his only source of money.

 

‘Selling stolen jewels is risky. They can be traced back.’

 

Money was the safest option—gold or silver coins. They were hard to trace and could be used if he fled to another country.

 

Having regained his composure, Fritz decided to pull out his trump card.

 

“Hey.”

 

He jabbed his blunt finger into Elise’s pale forehead. Her head kept hitting the tree trunk behind her, but she remained silent.

 

“Do you know what I’ll do to your mother?”

 

At his words, Elise’s eyes widened in terror. Seeing her reaction, Fritz’s mouth twisted into a sinister grin.

 

“M-my mother…”

 

“Of course, I know where she is.”

 

After the threat came the persuasion.

 

“Just bring me the money. Then I’ll help you and your mother escape secretly.”

 

Now Elise’s eyes began to sway like a ship encountering a storm.

 

‘I can’t believe him. I mustn’t.’

 

Elise knew Fritz’s villainy well, he was completely untrustworthy.

 

‘Moreover, the Duke promised to let me meet Mother.’

 

She bit her lip, recalling Cardale’s promise to return soon, Elise pressed her lips tightly together.

 

“Why, the Duke said he would at least find your mother?”

 

Fritz struck a nerve.


Upon hearing Fritz’s words, as if he had seen through her, Elise visibly flinched. Fritz twisted his lips and openly sneered.

 

“If the Duke really intended to find your mother, she would have shown up a long time ago. Even if my father refused, how difficult would it be to use Vassenberg’s intelligence to find a mistress who was a maid?”

 

Yet ironically, Fritz himself had no idea about Marissa’s whereabouts either.

 

Nevertheless, he saw Elise as a convenient target for blackmail.

 

But no matter how thoroughly he searched, he couldn’t find even a trace of Marissa.

 

‘Anyway, she doesn’t know that I don’t know.’

 

Fritz only aimed to shake Elise up with lies to get what he wanted.

 

“You foolish girl. The Duke just played around with you.”

 

His words stabbed Elise’s heart like a dagger. Her blue eyes shook like those of wounded prey.

 

“Who would listen to the annoying pleas of a woman to be discarded, unless he’s insane? Especially someone like the Duke, who has nothing to lose.”

 

Elise bit her lip and rapidly blinked her eyes, a habit she had developed to hold back tears.

 

“Did you really think the Duke would keep you forever?”

 

Knowing her well, Fritz didn’t miss a chance to mock her, and her head drooped low in response.

 

Confirming that Elise’s spirit was completely broken, Fritz explained his plan.

 

“You know there’s a fall hunting festival coming soon, right? Find a way to come with the Duke. I’ll also find a way to sneak your mother away from your father’s sight.”

 



 

“While men are hunting, women gather separately. That’ll be the perfect opportunity to avoid the Duke and my father’s eyes.”

 

Elise couldn’t respond.

 

She feared that if she opened her mouth, she wouldn’t be able to hold back her tears. Sensing her hesitation, Fritz grew increasingly frustrated and burst out angrily.

 

“Why aren’t you answering? Bring the money, then. In gold or silver!”

 

His clenched fist rose high. Overwhelmed by the learned terror of violence, Elise shrunk her shoulders and stuttered out slowly.

 

“I-I don’t have, a-any money…”

 

“Even if you have to sell the jewellery you’re wearing!”

 

“These aren’t mine. They belong to the Duke…”

 

“If you’re wearing nice clothes, eating well, and living comfortably, it doesn’t matter what happens to your mother, right?”

 

The ominous tone was clearly a threat. Elise knew how cruel and terrifying Fritz could be when he made such expressions and spoke with such a voice.

 

“You just have to do as I say. Understand?”

 

He tapped her shoulder, and there was no way to resist. Terrified, Elise nodded her head.

 

After finally hearing his desired response through intimidation, Fritz relaxed his expression. He glanced around cautiously, lowered his voice, and continued.

 

“It’s the hunt. If you don’t show up that day or if you don’t have the money, consider your mother gone forever. Even the stupidest girl would understand that much.”

 

Yet even then, he couldn’t shake off his unease and didn’t forget to issue a final warning.

 

“If you say a word to the Duke, you know what’ll happen, right? Your mother will be done for that very day. Watch your mouth.”

 

Elise couldn’t breathe until Fritz’s figure disappeared completely. Suddenly, as tension evaporated, her body swayed heavily.

 

“Ugh…”

 

Though she managed not to collapse by grasping the nearby tree. She felt dizzy and nausea crept over her. Her head spun, and a cold sweat broke out all over her body.

 

“Lady Elise, are you alright?”

 

Just as Michael returned and saw her in such a state, he rushed over, wearing a concerned expression.

 

“S-sir Walter.”

 

Elise managed to regain her composure and asked with a shaky voice.

 

“Was there any trouble while I was gone?”

 

As Michael’s gaze drifted off into the distance, Elise flinched. It was because that direction was where Fritz had disappeared.

 

“Ah, there was nothing at all.”

 

She quickly shook her head and replied.

 

“I just felt a little dizzy because it’s still hot outside.”

 

Her heart raced nervously, afraid that the other might catch her lie. Fortunately, Michael turned back to her without any further action.

 

“I’ve prepared a gazebo not far from here.”

 

Elise actually wanted to return to the mansion. The events that had unfolded in such a short time were enough to drain her energy.

 

‘But if I suddenly want to go back, he might find it suspicious.’

 

Moreover, it was her who had insisted on finding the gazebo as an excuse. Now she couldn’t change her mind.

 

‘Let’s just stay a little longer and then go back.’

 

As she finished her thought and was about to nod, Michael made a suggestion.

 

“But how about using the gazebo later and returning to the mansion now to rest? You don’t seem well.”

 

“Is… is that okay?”

 

“Of course.”

 

Elise visibly relaxed, not noticing Michael’s expression darken slightly.

 

“I’m sorry for the trouble, even though you went out of your way to help.”

 

“No problem. Can you walk?”

 

She nodded. Though she worried she might run into Fritz again while leaving the park, thankfully, such an encounter didn’t happen.

 



 

“Are you sure you don’t want me to call a doctor?” 

 

Michael asked, concerned.

 

Elise quickly responded, “It’s not that serious.”

 

She was afraid that if he called a doctor, her lie about her leg hurting would be exposed. So, she adamantly refused.

 

“If you fell hard enough to trip, it might be better to see a doctor.” 

 

Linda also expressed her worry and urged again, but Elise shook her head.

 

“I just need to rest for today. Don’t worry.”

 

Before they could insist any further, she quickly added.

 

“I’m just feeling tired from being out for so long… Can I rest?”

 

“Of course, Miss.”

 

With a nod from Linda, Michael went outside. As she followed him out, she urged again, “But if you’re feeling unwell, please be sure to let us know.”

 

“I will.”

 

Finally left alone, Elise sank onto the sofa. Her mind was still troubled with unresolved issues.

 

She didn’t trust Fritz’s words. The promise to bring her mother might also be a lie.

 

‘But…’

 

If things didn’t go as planned, she couldn’t predict what Fritz might do to her mother. And there were more worries beyond that.

 

[Fritz Schuvan is currently attempting to flee. If he is caught, both he and the entire Schuvan family will be in grave danger. This includes your mother.]

 

From the note, it seemed like Fritz intended to use her to secure escape funds.

 

The mention of the entire Schuvan family being in danger implied that perhaps everyone associated with the count was being watched.

 

‘I don’t know what to do.’

 

She found herself wishing the count was here. Perhaps if she explained everything, he would help.

 

So, other than receiving a note from Little Marquis Hartmann…

 

“Come to think of it, I need to burn that note.”

 

Elise remembered belatedly as she opened her handbag lying next to her. However, the note was nowhere to be found.

 

“Where could it be?”

 

Rummaging through her bag in a panic, she ended up spilling its contents onto the coffee table.

 

But amidst the few items, there was no note to be seen. Not even a scrap of paper.

 

Panic-stricken, Elise jumped up from her seat. Her eyes darted around aimlessly.

 

It was definitely there when she left the park. She had put the note in her bag as soon as she got on the carriage.

 

“Then, did I drop it in the carriage?”

 

Elise dashed out of the room in a hurry.

 

“Miss?”

 

Linda called out in surprise, but Elise didn’t even turn around. Pushing open the front door after passing through the mansion’s central hall, her hands were eager.

 

But the carriage was already gone. Instead, Norman noticed her and approached.

 

“Miss, what’s the matter?”

 

Elise clutched his sleeve, lost in thought.

 

“W-where is the carriage?”

 

“I just sent it to the stables… Did you drop something?”

 

As Elise nodded desperately, Norman responded with a compassionate look on his face.

 

“Don’t worry. The coachman cleans the carriage every day, so he’ll find and bring it back soon.”

 

“But that won’t do…!”

 

Elise exclaimed. She was so panicked that she didn’t even realise her actions might seem strange to others.

 

“I have to find it myself.”

 

Though Norman was puzzled by her inexplicable behaviour, he called a servant.

 

“Go to the coachman and tell him to bring back the carriage he just took to the stables.”

 

Meanwhile, Linda and even Michael followed Elise outside. They were just as surprised by her incomprehensible actions.

 

A little while later, when the coachman brought the carriage back, Elise hurriedly went inside.

 

‘It’s not here…!’

 

No matter how hard she looked, it was nowhere to be found. She was overwhelmed with fear, trembling with apprehension as she got off the carriage.

 

Seeing Elise’s crestfallen face, Norman spoke to reassure her.

 

“If you tell us what you lost, we’ll help you find it.”

 

Ah.

 

Only then did Elise snap out of it. Looking around, she saw the puzzled faces of the servants.

 

“I, I think I must have been mistaken. I’m sorry.”

 

Bowing her head apologetically, she quickly fled to her room.

 

Norman watched Elise’s retreating figure with a worried expression, then turned to Michael and asked,

 

“Sir Walter, what happened today?”


Michael reflected on today’s outing. There were a few trivial incidents, but they were common occurrences.

 

“I’m not sure. But…”

 

However, there was one thing that left Michael feeling uneasy.

 

“I think I saw Fritz Schuvan at the park.”

 

More precisely, he had caught a glimpse of a man with silver hair.

 

Silver hair was not a common colour. It was not for nothing that it was called a symbol of the Schuvan family lineage.

 

Norman tilted his head.

 

“But even if your guess is correct, they wouldn’t have met.”

 

“…I was briefly away from my place.”

 

Norman’s expression darkened at Michael’s explanation.

 

Linda, who was nearby, also made the same face. Norman turned to her and asked.

 

“Linda, please check on the young lady.”

 

“Yes, sir.”

 

Linda hurriedly walked towards Elise’s room.

 

‘She hasn’t looked well since she returned to the mansion.’

 

Linda was the one closest to Elise. It wasn’t difficult to notice that the young lady who had entered the mansion had suffered abuse in her childhood.

 

Even if they didn’t know the culprit, they could guess who it might have been based on the nobles’ behaviour.

 

‘I wonder what he muttered to the young lady, causing such a shock… Hm?’

 

In her haste, Linda noticed a small piece of paper on the ground. It was a neatly folded note.

 

Without thinking, she picked it up and unfolded it.

 

After a moment, as she read the contents, her eyes widened.

 

‘Oh my…’

 

Linda looked up and glanced ahead.

 

Elise’s bedroom was right there.

 

She stared at the closed door for a while, as if she couldn’t believe it, then carefully tucked the note into her pocket.

 

Linda’s face had stiffened, almost as if carved in stone.

 



 

From the dark night sky, raindrops began to fall with a tap, tap, pitter-patter. The weather had been overcast all day, but it finally seemed ready to pour rain.

 

However, despite the miserable weather, the long-awaited operation proceeded smoothly.

 

The elite agents infiltrated the villa, which Gerhard Schuvan had purchased under a pseudonym, successfully.

 

Of course, it was unexpected that Marissa was still awake at that hour.

 

Their original plan was to take her away while she was asleep.

 

“…Who are you?”

 

Meanwhile, Marissa realised that the individuals who had come to find her were not mere thugs or kidnappers, but trained knights.

 

It was thanks to her keen eye developed over years of serving as a maid.

 

“We have come here under the service of a name.”

 

“On whose orders?”

 

“Under the orders of Duke Vassenberg.”

 

However, she couldn’t help but be surprised at the mention of the Duke as the one who instructed her to be abducted.

 

There was a possibility of deception or traps. But living in this villa was as terrible as death itself.

 

Dealing with the Count’s occasional lust was bearable. It was a miserable life she had resigned herself to endure.

 

But not seeing her daughter’s face for years was too painful and agonising.

 

She also longed to see her son, who she now knew was alive.

 

So Marissa decided to take a gamble.

 

“Please lead the way.”

 

Thanks to her compliant cooperation, they were able to leave the villa earlier than expected.

 

As Cardale waited for Marissa in the rendezvous area, he sensed approaching footsteps and glanced at his watch.

 

“Fast.”

 

It was better this way. As time passed, the raindrops would turn into a downpour.

 

“Your Excellency, it’s raining.”

 

His subordinate opened an umbrella for him. But Cardale paid it no attention, silently staring in the direction where he could hear the footsteps.

 

Not long after, when Cardale confirmed Marissa’s face, he had only one thought.

 

‘She looks like Elise.’

 

As the distance closed, Marissa also spotted him. After a moment of hesitation, she resumed her steps.

 

In those blue eyes, there was deep mistrust. Resentment was also simmering within.

 

It was resentment toward the man who had turned her daughter into a mistress.

 

There were no pleasantries exchanged. With a casual nod from Cardale, the door of the carriage prepared to take Marissa opened.

 

Before she boarded the carriage, she turned to him and asked.

 

“Why… are you helping me?”

 

It was a curious question. Cardale wasn’t helping Marissa.

 

In reality, her existence was nothing more, nothing less than Elise’s mother. If it weren’t for his woman’s request, they would never have met.

 

“I’m not helping you. I’m fulfilling my woman’s wish.”

 

Marissa’s eyes widened, but soon, a deep sense of relief washed over her face.

 

It was the tender gaze of a mother who believed her daughter hadn’t endured such harsh living conditions.

 

“We must depart soon. Please, come inside.”

 

A maid led Marissa inside. Following behind, another maid and a doctor also boarded the carriage.

 

Cardale, having secured Marissa’s enlistment, headed towards his carriage.

 

The sound of a drumbeat echoed from the umbrella held over his head as he walked briskly.

 

Before long, the raindrops had turned into a fine drizzle.

 

There were no issues with the operation. In fact, thanks to the sound of rain and the hazy visibility, any evidence would be obscured.

 

However, there was a reason why the rain wasn’t welcome.

 

Suddenly stopping, Cardale spoke up.

 

“Does it rain on the islands, too?”

 

The shadow of the Count wore an unusual expression at the Lord’s question.

 

“I’m not sure, Your Excellency.”

 

He had spoken unnecessarily.

 

Cardale couldn’t help but think of the deer that would likely be in the mansion. Could something be so frightening and terrifying for her to fear, even the rain?

 

On days like this, he would bury his face in his pillow, seeking solace in his bedding, waiting for sleep to finally come. If it were raining in his jurisdiction, he wouldn’t be able to sleep alone.

 

‘I’m here… I will be waiting for the Duke to return home.’

 

He couldn’t bring himself to urge her to come back quickly. Instead, he swallowed the words he wanted to say.

 

It took him two days without rest to reach the island. And even after arriving, there were places he needed to stop.

 

Cardale felt a strange sense of urgency and thirst. Perhaps it was because he hadn’t satisfied his desires for days.

 

Upon boarding the carriage, he gave a brief order.

 

“Hurry.”

 

“Yes, Your Excellency.”

 

The attendant he had assigned to Marissa hurried over and bowed deeply.

 

“The doctor advises that the patient may have difficulty with prolonged carriage travel due to her poor physical condition.”

 

Cardale fell silent for a moment at the unwelcome report.

 

Wasting unnecessary time was abhorrent. But after all the effort, he couldn’t bear to leave the sick mother behind without showing her to Elise.

 

After reaching a conclusion, he gave his command.

 

“For now, prioritise getting out of Count Schuvan’s territory. Then, assess the patient’s condition and bring her up. I will head to the islands first.”

 

“What about the escort?”

 

“Not necessary.”

 

To move alone without any guards surprised his attendants internally.

 

The fact that a Duke would endure such hardships for a mere mistress’s mother was shocking enough.

 

Moreover, the Duke had come to the operation site himself, as if he were welcoming her.

 

Though no one voiced it aloud, the elite soldiers of Vassenberg couldn’t help but feel certain now.

 

Elise Schuvan was indeed special.

 

Whether the Duke was aware of this fact or not, whether she knew it or not.

 

“Let’s go.”

 

With the command from their master, the coachman cracked his whip. The horse began to run with a rough neigh.

 

The large carriage wheels left deep marks on the muddy ground, but they were soon erased by the pouring rain.

 



 

The rain had been falling since the previous evening.

 

There was no thunder or lightning, just a gentle drizzle. Thanks to the newly installed windows, even the faint sound of raindrops couldn’t be heard.

 

However, Elise couldn’t sleep all night. Whenever she closed her eyes and drifted into unconsciousness, she was plagued by the fear of nightmares.

 

She huddled at the head of her bed, burying her head in her knees.

 

“Duke…”

 

She longed for his embrace. The warmth of his body, the sensation of being held close. When she was in his arms, even the intense fear that had plagued her for so long would disappear.

 

Just a few months ago, the pain had been hers alone to bear. When did she start relying on him like this?

 

Elise shivered faintly.

 

Finally, sunlight began to filter into the room as dawn broke.

 

Despite the difficult night finally passing, Elise still breathed with anxiety.

 

<At Number 182, Themberd Street…>

 

Today was the day Raymond had promised to meet her.


But Elise didn’t know how to meet Raymond.

 

Even finding the meeting place was a challenge. Sneaking out of the mansion without the knowledge of the servants would be difficult enough, let alone eluding her guard, Michael.

 

‘I must find out what happened…’

 

Elise had been restless for days due to Fritz’s threats. She couldn’t eat properly, constantly feeling sick or losing her appetite.

 

‘Perhaps I should go to the park for now…’

 

She had avoided it since the first day, fearing she might encounter Fritz again. But today, she had no choice.

 

‘Any other place outside the park would raise suspicion. I can’t risk being caught.’

 

Perhaps Raymond would realise her situation and contact her in another way.

 

In the end, Elise decided to head to the park after much deliberation.

 

This time, Michael had arranged a gazebo for her in advance.

 

“I’ll stay a bit further away.”

 

Being alone in close proximity could arouse suspicion, even with a guard.

 

As Michael moved away, Elise let out a small sigh.

 

‘What should I do…?’

 

The beautiful green scenery around her, the delicate carvings on the arches and columns, the flowers and decorations around the tables and chairs—all of it went unnoticed.

 

‘With Sir Walter keeping watch like that…’

 

Even if it was Raymond, it didn’t seem it would be easy to approach her with Michael guarding her.

 

Still, as she hesitated to give up hope and remained seated, she heard some voices nearby.

 

“Oh, there’s someone here too.”

 

“What should we do? There’s not a single empty spot.”

 

Turning around cautiously, Elise saw three ladies elegantly dressed, each holding a parasol with disappointed expressions.

 

‘I must have occupied this place for too long.’

 

Thinking she should make way for them, she grasped the edge of her skirt, but one of them spoke to her cautiously.

 

“Um, excuse me…”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Would it be alright if we sat together?”

 

Before the request could even finish, Michael swiftly approached and stood in front of Elise.

 

“What is the matter?”

 

It was a polite but firm inquiry. The ladies seemed slightly taken aback by his demeanour, but soon one of them calmly responded.

 

“We are looking for a place to rest as there seems to be no available seats. We were wondering if you could kindly accommodate us.”

 

Michael’s sharp gaze scanned them from head to toe.

 

‘Thin arms that could not have been used to lift heavy objects, a thin chemise dress that would be difficult to hide even a dagger, and a corset that was extremely tight and restricted movement.’

 

At least they were ordinary noblewomen rather than trained individuals or assassins.

 

Having made his judgement, Michael relaxed his guard slightly, although their approach still didn’t sit well with him.

 

It was uncertain how these ladies would react to Elise Schuvan, the Duke’s mistress. Sometimes, ladies’ tongues could be sharper than any blade.

 

Moreover, since the incident during their last walk in the park, Elise had been wary of going out. Hence, Michael was more vigilant than usual.

 

“Perhaps you should look for another place…”

 

“Sir Walter.”

 

Elise called him in a low voice. Michael approached her, bowing slightly.

 

“Since there are empty seats, would you please inform them they can come and rest?”

 

“But, my lady.”

 

“I will be fine.”

 

Elise understood Michael’s concern, but she also remembered Linda’s advice about the upcoming autumn social season.

 

“Before the proper autumn social season begins, it would be nice for the lady to get a feel for the atmosphere. Since you will be attending various events with the master.”

 

“Yes, that’s right. I originally planned to practise socialising here.”

 

Although meeting Raymond had been a failure, she still hoped to gain some social skills.

 

So, Elise gathered her courage.

 

“Would you like to join us for a conversation?”

 

“Why not, of course, if you’re offering.”

 

They didn’t hesitate and occupied the empty seats at the round table.

 

Fortunately, contrary to Michael’s concerns, they were discreet. Perhaps they noticed the silver hair and guessed her identity, but they didn’t mention Elise’s background or lineage at all.

 

They were kind to Elise and led the conversation delicately. Thanks to them, the atmosphere soon softened.

 

These days, lace and hair accessories are in fashion. Newly laid embroidery, and books as part of refined leisure activities were all stories of a new world for Elise. She listened attentively to each one, storing them in her memory one by one.

 

“I heard there’s a new tea house in Inghel. Have you heard about it?”

 

“No. Is there such a place?”

 

The eyes of those listening widened in surprise.

 

The mention of a place accessible only to women piqued their curiosity.

 

“I’m really curious. What about going there now?”

 

“How! You said what I wanted to say!”

 

They clapped their hands and burst into laughter. Then, their gaze simultaneously turned to Elise.

 

“What do you think?”

 

“Well, I…”

 

Elise tried to decline with an embarrassed expression. That is, until the woman sitting to her right slightly opened her palm to reveal a small note with just two nails visible.

 

<182 Themberd Street>

 

In an instant, it was as if cold water had been poured over her, snapping her back to attention.

 

Her azure eyes widened dramatically, like an earthquake had just occurred.

 

Seeing her reaction, the woman grinned.

 

“I assure you, you won’t regret it if you go.”

 

Her gentle voice settled over Elise like a comforting blanket.

 



 

Elise apologised to Michael at the door.

 

“I’m sorry, Sir Walter. I’ve caused you trouble.”

 

“No, you haven’t. I’m just doing my job.”

 

The tea house was divided into separate rooms. While men were allowed to enter upon signing the guestbook, entry into the rooms were prohibited.

 

“I’ll be right out.”

 

“No, please take your time to talk.”

 

Elise gave a slight smile and then entered the room. As soon as the door closed behind her, she let out a long breath. Her heart had been pounding with tension all the way here, making it hard to bear.

 

“Your seat is over here, my lady.”

 

The maids greeted her and pointed to the innermost chair. As Elise walked over with a tense expression, someone rose from their seat.

 

It was the woman who had shown her the note earlier.

 

“This place not only has great tea and desserts but also many other fascinating things.”

 

The woman lightly pressed the nearby wall where Elise stood. Suddenly, a portion of the wall opened outward, revealing a hidden door.

 

Outside the back door seemed to lead to the shop’s garden. A quaint area adorned with flowers and trees came into view.

 

“What do you think?”

 

Elise looked at the woman again. The friendly face was filled only with a smile, as if she knew nothing.

 

Taking her gaze off the woman, Elise cautiously stepped into the garden. The door slid shut behind her with a soft click.

 

Now she could see the gap between the door and the wall. But even a few steps away felt like a world apart.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

“Huh!”

 

Startled by the voice from her right, she turned around.

 

“Oh, Little Marquis Hartmann.”

 

“It’s nice to see you again.”

 

Raymond greeted her warmly, naturally taking her hand and kissing the back of it.

 

She was taken aback by the sudden gesture.

 

“It’s been a while, Lady Elise.”

 

But even after the greeting, Raymond didn’t let go of her hand.

 

Elise quickly pulled her hand away. His face momentarily stiffened, but she was too flustered to notice.

 

Instead, she clumsily asked about the important information he had to tell her.

 

In response, Raymond looked at her intently, as if burdened. There was a strange intensity in his green eyes. Just as Elise unconsciously began to step back, sensing something, Raymond spoke up.

 

“Fritz Schuvan has committed treason.”

 

Thud. 

 

A dull shock struck Elise’s head.

 

She hesitated for a moment, her lips trembling, before managing to speak up.

 

“T-treason?”

 

“Yes. He was providing funds and information to the enemy, Helmut.”

 

Raymond showed her a newspaper article.

 

“It says here that the headquarters of the spies was raided at the clubhouse a while ago.”

 

The clubhouse. It was a place Fritz often frequented. She remembered her father, Count Schuvan, being furious, accusing him of drinking every day.

 

Elise looked up at Raymond with a pale face.

 

“And the one who received the Emperor’s orders to root out the traitors is…”

 

For a brief moment, his lips seemed to curl upwards.

 

“The Duke of Vassenberg, Cardale Vassenberg.”

-----

Continue in Part 3!!

